O'HALLORAN;
OR,
The Insurgent Chief.
CHAP. I.
The moment came, the hour when Otho thought,
Secure at last the vengeance which he sought.
That morning he had freed the soil bound slaves,
Who dig no lands for tyrants but their graves.
Such is their cry; some watch-word for the fight,
Must vindicate the wrong, and warp the right.
Religionfreedomvengeancewhat you will
A word's enough to raise mankind to kill.
Byron
.
It
was on the evening of the fourth of June, that
a messenger arrived from Belfast, at O'Halloran
Castle. He delivered to its owner the following
note, and passed on to circulate others of a similar
import throughout the country.
Belfast
,
June 4th
, 1798.
The signal is given. The mail coach has
not
arrived. Our informant says it was stopped
yesterday
at Swords. The south is in armsWexford is
taken. Let the
rising
be on the 7th
inst
. The
general
rendezvous for this county is Donegore hill.
The small parties of the military quartered in the
country towns must be captured, if possible, by
surprise. The bearer will proceed with intelligence
along the coast. You will despatch messengers
through the interior, by Ballynure, Ballyclare,
Ballyeaston, Ballymena, &c. Expedition is
requisite
.
HENRY M`CRACKEN.
To Henry O'Halloran, Esq. &c.
O'Halloran immediately assembled his
coadjutors
,
and couriers were soon despatched agreeably
to the foregoing instructions.
All was now preparation, bustle, and eagerness,
among the populace of Larne; but every one was
unusually sober, and good humoured. Not a drunken
man was to be seen, nor even a woman heard to
scold, during this awful period of secrecy, suspense,
and anxious activity. Even the military were
treated with more than usual complaisance, and all
men were not only quiet, but apparently contented
and happy. Thus in a profound calm were the
populace of this district employed in collecting all
the elements of irritation, hatred, and ferocity, which
were soon to burst into the most dreadful storm of
destruction that ever swept that unhappy country.
The sixth of June, the eve of the insurrection,
came. Mirth seemed to engage the young;
friendship
,
good humour, and hilarity, the middle aged;
while the old looked on in portentous silence and
meditation. All business, every species of labour,
spontaneously ceased after mid-day. The
merchant
,
indeed, still kept his shop open, but it was
only to lean over his counter; for he neither
desired
,
nor obtained customers. The mechanic also
kept his work-shop open, but in it there was no
sound of hammer, nor saw, nor axe, nor shuttle to
be heard. Spades, mattocks, and hoes were thrown
aside, or disappeared as if they had in reality
been converted into swords and spears.
Towards the evening, an increased degree of
mirth and jollity pervaded the younger part of
the community; while even the more sedate and
advanced in life, relaxed, or, growing weary of
A 2
their thoughtfulness or their idleness, joined in
athletic
sports, such as wrestling, running, leaping,
hurling, and various other kinds of rural pastimes.
Such an unsual degree of mirth and idleness
among the people, excited the attention of the
friends of government, and a vague whisper of
some disturbance being intended during the night,
reached the ears of the commander of the small
party of military then quartered in Larne.
This party consisted of about fifty of the Tay
fencibles. Their captain's name was Small. In
consequence of the rumour which had reached
him, he thought proper strictly to enforce the
general
orders which had been several months
before
issued to the military dispersed over the
country
,
to cause all persons in the disaffected towns
and villages to keep within doors after 9 o'clock
at night; but the execution of which, from the
continued
appearance of tranquillity in his
neighbourhood
,
had been lately induced to relax.
He therefore as soon as
tattoo
was beat, which
for many months had been regularly done at 9 o'clock at night, paraded the streets with a patrole
of twenty men, and compelled the people to
relinquish
their sports, and retire to their respective
homes, under pain of being taken to the guard
house. Men, women and children, all complied,
and the streets, which a few minutes before
displayed
such a full scene of life, resounding with all the
noise of rural mirth and manners, were now totally
deserted, and as silent as the habitations of the
dead. The soldiers had retired to their barrack, and
a deep portentous calm continued for several hours.
During this interval, a number of the most
intrepid
and zealous of the United Irishmen, stole
cautiously to their appointed rendezvous, at a place
called the
Green Holme
, about a half a mile from
the town. It was a solitary spot, at the foot of a
high hill, a short distance from the public road,
from which it was screened by two intervening
thick hedges, and was selected for their meeting,
not more on account of its privacy and
contiguity
to the town, than on account of a cold, clear
and beautiful spring of water it contained. Here
O'Halloran and M`Cauley arranged the plan of
an attack upon the barrack, the other leaders
having
gone off to head the insurrection in different
parts of the country.
It was about one o'clock in the morning, and
every thing was quiet in the town, when
O'Halloran
,
after having distributed among his little band,
whiskey, and other refreshments, gave orders for
proceeding to the attack.
They were about eighty in number; about
thirty
of whom were armed with muskets, and the
remainder
with pikes. Their plan was two-fold.
If the soldiers were retired to sleep, which they
presumed would be the case, but which they
could easily ascertain by the show of resistance
that would be made on their first appearance in the
street that contained the barrack, they should
proceed
at once to the assault. But if their
adversaries
should be on the alert, they were to retreat
so as to attract them in pursuit, while M`Cauley
should hasten with a body of twenty men, twelve
of whom had muskets, to form an ambuscade
behind
the wall of a rope factory, which joined one
of the streets, and to which O'Halloran at the head
of the main body, should direct his retreat, in
order
to bring his pursuers between two fires.
The barrack was situated near the centre of a
long street, on arriving at the upper end of which,
the insurgents perceived that they must relinquish
their first plan, as the garrison were evidently on
the watch.
Captain Small, who was a vigilant and active
officer, had kept above a third of his troops under
arms, for fear of a surprise, and had ordered the rest
to sleep in their clothes, that they might be ready
for action at a moment's warning.
M`Cauley was now despatched to lay his
ambush
,
and Darragh was ordered to pass through a
by street, at the head of twenty men, to possess
himself of the barrack, in case Small should leave
it with his whole force in pursuit of O'Halloran.
Having made these arrangements, and given the
detachments time to execute them, which as it was
considerably dark, and as they kept very silent,
they accomplished without alarming their enemies,
O'Halloran ordered his men to advance a few
paces
into the street containing the barrack, and,
after discharging several muskets at the garrison,
to retire immediately to the shelter of that
adjoining
.
They fired. In a moment the royal drums
beat to arms, and the troops to the number of
fortythe remainder, in conjunction with some
loyalists who had joined them on the preceding
evening, being left to guard the barrackformed
in two lines, and, each taking one side of the street,
marched at a quick pace towards the insurgents.
But before their approach, O'Halloran had eluded
their attack by removing to another street, at the
end of which he stopped for a moment, to fire on
the advancing troops, by which several of them
were wounded. He then continued his retreat
into
the Rope-walk street, where M`Cauley lay
concealed
,
and halting at the upper end of it, awaited
the approach of his pursuers, who steadily
advanced
until they were within three hundred yards
of him.
Not a shot having been as yet fired in this street
by either party, Small stopped, and exclaimed,
front division, ready! Now my lads,
fire sure
,
and cut down the rebels!immediately a volley
of musketry from behind, brought six of his own
men to the ground. He turned round, but no
enemy
was visible. His van had fired at
O'Halloran's
party, two of whom were killed and several
wounded. They immediately returned the fire,
and two more of the soldiers pressed the ground.
Small now gave orders for a retreat, when
O'Halloran's pikemen rushed down upon him.
But he checked them by his front presenting
bayonets
,
and his rear division advancing and firing
amongst them, and they were obliged, in their turn,
to withdraw and seek shelter at their former stand.
He had just ordered his opponents to be pursued,
when another volley from his invisible assailants,
brought down four more of his men.
A retreat, at all hazards, was now necessary to
save the remainder of his troops. It was,
therefore
,
again attempted; but on coming opposite the
rope-walk gate, M`Cauley, with the view of
capturing
Small, rushed with his little band of
pikemen
upon him; but they were too weak to make
any impression, and a front of bayonets being
instantly
presented to them, they were compelled
again to seek refuge behind their wall, though not
until
M`Cauley, with his own hands, had given Small
a dreadful wound in the groin with a pike. As
O'Halloran's men appeared coming to the aid of
their companions, the troops did not think proper
to pursue M`Cauley, but hastily passed on in their
retreat to the end of the street, where they only
halted to reload. They then continued their
retreat
,
practising for their safety the same
expedient
that the insurgents had practised in drawing
them into the ambush.
On coming opposite a lane through which
Darragh's
small party were retiring, after having made
an unsuccessful attempt on the barrack, they were
fired on by this party, and two of their number
killed. They returned the fire, but it did no
execution
;
for Darragh's men, immediately on
discharging
their pieces, had taken refuge behind a
low garden wall which formed one side of the lane.
After this their progress to the barrack was
unmolested
.
On arriving there, Captain Small found
that he had left seventeen of his men in the hands
of the Insurgents, and of those he had brought
back, five, besides himself, were severely, and four
slightly wounded.
Thus one half of the soldiers who had gone out
on this skirmish, were now unfit for duty. During
the affair, only two of the insurgents were killed,
and about seven or eight wounded.So that,
although
they had failed in their object of reducing
the barrack, they had obtained a considerable
advantage; they had weakened and disheartened
their enemies.
Darragh's attempt on the barrack, had failed
from the weakness of his party. He had, indeed,
been directed to make no attempt, unless the whole
strength of the troops should be drawn out in
pursuit
of O'Halloran. But, as from the number
which appeared to be drawn out, he concluded
that very few, indeed, could be left, he was
induced
to hazard an effort. Accordingly, he
advanced
boldly with his followers into the middle
of the street, when he was assailed with such a
firing as, although his men escaped uninjured,
convinced
him of his inability to succeed. He,
therefore
,
withdrew, and was on his way by a
circuitous
route to join O'Halloran, when he encountered
the retreating troops as before-mentioned, and
added to their misfortunes.
The inhabitants of the town, by this time, were
flying in every direction, as their wishes or their
fears prompted them, either to join that party to
which they adhered, or to seek refuge in the
country
from that fate, to which many of them believed,
that all who remained in the town would be
doomed
.
During the skirmish they had, in terrible
suspense
,
awaited the issue; those, especially of the
popular party, who had relatives engaged in the
affair, endured a dreadful agony of mind, not
knowing
but that every shot they heard was the
death-knell
of a husband, a brother, a son, or some other
dear relative or friend. The shouts of the
combatants
,
as either side gained the advantagethe
groans of the wounded and the dyingthe shrieks
of the alarmed women and children, who, even
from within their houses, louldly proclaimed their
fears, formed a scene terribly painful to the
imaginations
of all, but such, if there be such monsters,
as delight in human misery.
Notwithstanding his success, O'Halloran did not
think it prudent, immediately, to renew the attack on
the garrison. His strength was every minute
increasing
,
and he expected in a few hours, to be able
to overwhelm all opposition. The distance to
Donegore
hill, the appointed rendezvous for the county,
where the great stand was to be made, and where
it was his duty to be with his followers, at four
o'clock that afternoon, was only about fourteen
miles. He had, consequently, sufficient time to
wait for such an accession of strength, before he
renewed his attack on the troops, as would render
resistance hopeless, and, perhaps, lead to a
surrender
of the place without bloodshed.
To these suggestions he yielded as much from
humanity as policy. In the meantime, he was not
inactive. Small parties were despatched in every
direction to arouse their friends, and intimidate
even their enemies, to come to their assistance.
Multitudes came voluntarily; but it must be
confessed
,
that numbers whose fears or principles
rendered
them reluctant, were compelled to take the
field with the pike at their breasts. These
recruiting
and impressing parties, were ordered to be
again on the ground by eight o'clock, A. M. at
which time it was intended to make a grand
assault
on the barrack.
In the meantime, every avenue to and from the
place was strictly guarded, so that none of the
loyalists
in the country could join the garrison, nor
any of those in the town carry intelligence from
it. The garrison, however, notwithstanding their
disaster, had been joined by nearly a hundred of
the town's people who were attached to the
government
,
and many more would have flocked to their
aid, had they not been forced either to conceal
themselves, or to fall into the ranks of the
Insurgents
.
CHAP. II.
Sir, you may counsel though you are our foe,
Because you are an honourable man;
We'll hearken to you, and those friends of yours,
Whom we have vanquished, may have terms of truce,
If they will take them of our framing, for
'Tis not our wish that human blood should flow
For useless purpose. So haste on the treaty.
The Irish Soothsayer
.
O'Halloran
was afraid that before he should
have numbers sufficient to overcome the garrison,
after it became strengthened by the loyalists of
the town, as has been just mentioned, a
detachment
of the army which lay in considerable force
at Carrickfergus, only nine miles distant, might
come to its relief. He, therefore, took the
precaution
to station scouts on horseback on the roads
leading to and from that place, so that he might
have the speediest intelligence of any such
detachment
,
and be enabled to meet it on suitable ground.
When the time fixed for assaulting the garrison
arrived, he found his party about twelve hundred
strong. Not more than three hundred of them,
however, had fire arms, the rest being armed in
the most miscellaneous, and some of them in the
most unserviceable, manner. About four hundred
had tolerably good pikes, the handles of which
varied from ten to fifteen feet long, and
consequently
in close combat, possessed a great
advantage
over the guns and bayonets of the king's
troops; and were expected by the projectors of
the insurrection, to be capable of doing so much
execution, as almost to atone for their deficiency
B
in fire arms and ammunition. The remainder were
armed, some with common hay forks, some with
scythes fixed on the ends of poles, and many with
dung-forks, spades, or other implements of rural
industry.
O'Halloran having made the necessary
dispositions
for the attack, in order to animate the
courage
of his men, addressed them in the following
words:
Irishmen! you have this day, with a glorious
effort, thrown off a yoke which for centuries bound
your ancestors to the feet of tyrants. A great task
is yet to be performed, a mighty struggle is yet to
be maintained, before you can convince your
oppressors
that they cannot replace you in your
former
degradation. You are now freemen. I
congratulate
you! But remember that it is only while
you have arms in your hands, and your enemies
are unable to wrest them from you, that you are
so. Be united in sentiment, and firm in combat,
and the latter will never be the case. Oppression
will be driven out of the country, and your
freedom
will be established forever. You will then
have your prosperity as a nation in your own
hands. No foreign power, actuated by jealousy or
fear of your growing greatness, will presume to set
bounds to your external commerce, or to lay
restrictions
on your internal industry.
But why need I allude to the attempts of your
late masters to keep you in poverty. Had they
done you no other injury, you might have forgiven
them. But have they not shackled the consciences of
two-thirds of your countrymen? and do they not
compel them, together with nine-tenths of the other
third, to support an expensive and extravagant
prelatic
church establishment, which their consciences
disapprove, and their feelings detest? Have they not
driven thousands of your ancestors into exile; and
have they not plundered and disinherited
thousands
more? As to yourselves, have they not of
late years, heaped on you insult upon insult,
injury
upon injury, until your hearts have bled with
agony? Have not your unoffending neighbours
been dragged in hundreds from their fire sides,
and treated as malefactors? They have been
lodged in loathsome cells and dungeons; they
have been scourged, and hanged, and shot, and
gibbetted, without the common formality of law;
without even the appearance of justice. But this
was, perhaps, a more merciful mode of destruction;
at least it was a more honest and courageous
species of tyranny, than indictments before
pensioned
judges, and bribed and drunken juries.
But I need not recount your wrongs. Your
hearts feel them, and rankle with them, and burn
this day for vengeance. Ah! I see rage against
your oppressors sparkle in your eyes, and fury is
now the expression of your countenances. But
let justice rather than rage direct your conduct; and
be brave for freedom rather than vengeance. In
aid of the multitudes of your compatriots, who are
this day in arms for the same holy purpose, you
will be strong, not so much, I trust, with a view to
revenge, as to terminate your sufferings. Like men,
we shall conquer our enemies; and, like christians,
we shall forgive them: for it will be glorious to
show them, that we can feel and practice towards
them a virtue which they never felt, which they
never practised towards usthe virtue of
mercy
.
This evening we must join our countrymen at
the county encampment on Donegore, there to
assist
them in the glorious struggle. But we cannot
leave our homes at the mercy of our enemies. We
must capture those troops we have already
defeated
,
if, in our absence, we wish our wives, our
children
,
and our properties to be safe. Should we
depart without taking this garrison with us, the
look that we should give our habitations from
yonder
hill would be the last. We might return
victors
over our oppressors; but we should return to
desolated streets and ruined walls. Be strong, my
countrymen; consider the object for which you
are to fight, your families and your homes.
Remember
the cause in which you are engaged is
the sacred cause of your country. Fear nothing.
Your quarrel is righteous; and God is on your
side. Resolve, each man who hears me, resolve
now to conquer or die. Let our war word be
Erin and Freedom!
He was answered by loud acclamations, and the
sounds of Erin and Freedom, for several
minutes
continued to reverberate through the air.
By dividing his men into two parties, one of
which he entrusted to the command of M`Cauley,
he made dispositions to attack the barracks in both
front and rear at the same time.
The standard of the United Irishmen was now
hoisted. It displayed a gilded harp formed on a
banner of green silk, surrounded with the mottoes
of Erin-go-bragh, and Liberty and Equality.
In martial music the insurgents at Larne were
deficient
;
for they had only one drum and one fife;
but these animated their spirits with the sounds of
national airs, and they had just begun their march
to the tune of The Volunteer's Quick Step,
when an accession to their strength of nearly two
hundred men arrived from one of the adjoining
parishes, bringing with them as a prisoner, George
M`Claverty, Esq. the magistrate, who, as the
reader
will recollect, examined Edward Barrymore
so closely at the Antrim arms, when in pursuit of
the murderers of M`Bride. O'Halloran halted his
men, and they hailed the arrival of their
confederates
and their prisoner, with loud huzzas.
On being informed of their design to attack the
garrison, M`Claverty, who, although disliked among
them on account of his political principles, was
much respected for his other amiable qualities,
attempted
to dissuade them from it.
The capture of such a handful of men, said he,
will tend nothing to the ultimate success of your
cause, and forbearance may induce the government
to forbearance with you on some similar occasion.
Sir, replied O'Halloran, you are now our
prisoner; as such we shall treat you as well as
circumstances
will permit; but we do not wish you to
be our counsellor. We know your feelings
towards
us too well for that. In the meantime, I
may inform you that we do not attack this
garrison
from any thirst of revenge or fondness for
blood-shed
,
but, as we cannot remain here to protect our
families and properties from their violence, we are
resolved that where we go, they shall go also.
He then gave his men orders to proceed. But
an incident at that moment occurred, which, by
delaying their march for a space, gave M`Claverty
another opportunity to interfere. A man of the
name of Shaw, an inhabitant of the town, who had
borne a captain's commission under George II. in
his German wars, and had fought at the battle of
Dettingen, and was an enthusiastic loyalist, excited
to a temporary madness by the scenes he beheld,
rushed out of his house, armed with a drawn sword, in
spite of the entreaties and tears of his three
daughters
,
into the midst of the insurgents; and with the
most terrible imprecations on them as rebels, called
on them to lay down their arms and disperse. A
man whom he attacked was about thrusting a pike
into his body, when M`Cauley rushed forward, and
saved him. He was instantly disarmed, and
delivered
to his daughters, with strict injunctions to
B 2
confine him, under a threat, that if he again
molested
them, his life should be taken.
Struck with the humanity and magnanimity of
this action, M`Claverty determined to make
another
effort to prevent the effusion of blood.
Summon the garrison, cried he, before you
attack it. You are all my neighbours and friends,
and this action makes me proud that you are so. I,
therefore, earnestly entreat you to consult your
own safety and welfare on this occasion, and avoid
the useless destruction of human lives, even if they
should be those of your enemies. Send a flag of
truce to the garrison. Its commander will,
perhaps
,
treat for its surrender, and human lives will
be spared, while your interests will not be injured.
O'Halloran now consulted with the other
officers
of his small army, and gave it as his opinion,
that M`Claverty's advice pointed out nothing more
than their duty; and that policy as well as
humanity
required them to adopt it. They were all of
the same opinion, except Darragh, who observed
that, if they should now fight, they would be
certain
of victory; but if they negociated, they might
be out-witted, and lose, by the deceit and cunning
of their enemies, all the advantages they had
gained
by their own valour. However, said he, if
you are all agreed to this measure, I wont resist it:
but in managing it, I beg you to keep your wits
about you.
O'Halloran approached M`Claverty. Sir, said
he, We esteem you for the sentiments you have
expressed; and shall take your advice. But first it
is necessary, that we should apprize our enemies
of our strength, in order to convince them that
resistance
is useless. They will believe your
statement
.
Write to them an account of our number,
our unanimity, and our enthusiasm; and exhort
them to deliver themselves, and those loyalists who
have taken refuge with them, together with all
their warlike stores, into our hands; and we promise
them, that not only the troops, but the refugees,
shall be well treated, and their families and
properties
protected from injury.
I shall make this statement, said M`Claverty,
but I would not encourage you to expect that
they will agree to such an unconditional surrender.
However, I shall open the negociation, and
ulterior
arrangements may be afterwards discussed.
He accordingly wrote as follows:
I am now a prisoner in the hands of the
insurgents
;
and you may be sure I am well treated,
when I inform you that I have had influence
enough to persuade them to postpone an attack,
which, just as I was brought here, they were on
the point of making upon you.
I know your gallantry would induce you to
make a brave and persevering resistance; but their
numbers, (they are now about sixteen hundred
strong) and their enthusiasm, make them
formidable
,
and would ensure them ultimate success,
although
,
doubtless, at the expense of many lives.
However, I will not assume the responsibility of
advising you to an absolute surrender. Your duty
forbids such an alternative, until resistance is
proved
beyond doubt, to be useless. But I entreat you
to open a door for negociation. Something short
of unconditional submission may probably be
obtained
.
The cause of humanity will be consulted,
and, perhaps, his majesty's interests also, by means
of a treaty the terms of which it may be in your
power honourably to accept.
I have just witnessed an instance of magnanimity
which speaks much for the humane dispositions of
those people; and renders them entitled to more
indulgence, than, as rebels, they would otherwise
deserve.
I have the honour to be, &c.
GEORGE M`CLAVERTY.
To Captain James Small,
company of Tay Fencibles.
This letter was accompanied by the following
from the insurgent leaders.
To Captain Small.
Sir, we are to the number of sixteen hundred
men in arms, prepared to attack the garrison
under
your command. But to give you an
opportunity
of saving your soldiers from destruction, we
have thought proper, first, to apprize you of our
intention
,
and to summon you in the name of our
country, to surrender your party, both military
and others, with all your warlike stores, into our
hands. As our prisoners your lives will be safe,
and as much attention as possible paid to your
comforts. The lives, families and properties of
such of our town's-men as have joined you, shall
also remain unmolested. Our attack shall be
suspended
,
in expectation of your compliance, for three
quarters of an hour, but no longer.
We have the honour to be,
Your obedient humble servants.
HENRY O'HALLORAN,
JOHN M`CAULEY,
WILLIAM JOHNSTON,
Commanding the army of the United Irishmen in
Larne.
In less than twenty minutes the following answer
was received.
To George M`Claverty, Esq.
Sir, enclosed is my reply to the rebel
chieftains
.
By it you will see that you anticipated truly,
when you supposed that I would not agree to an
unconditional surrender. I am sorry that you are
in their power; but it is pleasing to find that they
are not disposed to abuse their good fortune, by
acts of wantonness or cruelty. It may yet be in
my power to show that I can esteem humanity,
even in such an enemy.
I have the honour to be, &c.
JAMES SMALL, Capt. &c.
The following was the reply received by the
insurgents
.
Gentlemen,
In answer to your message, I have to inform
you that rather than comply with your demands,
my party and myself are resolved to meet
destruction
amidst the ruins of the place, which it is our
duty to defend. Do not, however, suppose that we
shall fall an easy prey. It is true, your number
exceed ours by ten to one; but were they a
hundred
to one, as we are fully supplied with the
means of defence, we know too well how to use
them, not to make our enemies deplore the
dearness
of any victory they may gain over us. In
your case, it is apparent that victory is at least
doubtful. Some traits of humanity displayed by
you have been communicated to me, in
consideration
of which I give you my promise, and all the
gentlemen of the town, who have so gallantly come
to my assistance, will guarantee its performance,
that if you lay down your arms, and return
peaceably
to your allegiance, all that you have yet done
shall be overlooked, and pardoned, and the full
and free protection of the laws of your country
shall once more be extended towards you. Should
you reject this offer, I can only deplore your
infatuation
;
I must resist you unto destruction, and
the blood of those who may fall on both sides, be
upon your heads.
JAMES SMALL, Capt. &c.
The insurgent officers now held another
consultation
,
in which it was agreed to send a second
message to the garrison, proposing to withdraw
peaceably from the town, if Captain Small, and the
loyalist gentlemen who were with him, would
guarantee
the safety of their families and properties
after their departure.
To these proposals Small replied that he would
agree, provided, the insurgents would liberate
George M`Claverty, Esq. Sir Geoffrey Carebrow,
and a Mr. John Hill, together with the wounded
soldiers they had captured.
O'Halloran replied that he would, without
reluctance
,
deliver up the wounded soldiers; but on
no account would he part with the three
gentlemen
,
except in exchange for an equal number of
the United Irishmen then imprisoned in
Carrickfergus
,
and for whose safety he would keep these
prisoners as hostages.
Tell Captain Small, said he to the messenger,
that this is our last proposal. If it is not acceded
to in twenty minutes, the barrack shall be attacked
in front and rear; and for whatever blood shall be
shed, let him be accountable.
Small held a short consultation with the
gentlemen
of the town who had joined him, who, willing
to prevent matters from coming to an extremity,
advised the acceptance of these terms. Within the
prescribed time, he therefore, returned an answer
to that effect. The articles of the treaty were soon
exchanged in proper form, and the wounded
soldiers
given into the hands of Dr. Ferral, who had
them safely conveyed to the barrack.
As nothing now remained to prevent the
insurgents
from proceeding to the Donegore encampment,
O'Halloran ordered them to take some
refreshment
,
and prepare for the march. But being anxious
to know what success his coadjutors had met with
in raising the people in other parts of the country,
he committed the command of the party to
M`Cauley, and accompanied with ten men, well
mounted and armed, departed without delay to
Donegore. Before setting off, however, he gave
M`Cauley directions to bury the soldiers who had
been slain in the skirmish, with due respect, in
the adjoining church-yard; and to follow
immediately
after, at a steady pace, so as to arrive at
the encampment about four o'clock in the
afternoon
.
M`Cauley obeyed in every particular. The
bodies of the soldiers were interred with military
honours. Funeral music accompanied the
procession
to the burial ground; and when the grave
closed on the dead, three rounds of musketry were
fired over them, by twelve men selected for the
purpose. It is said that M`Claverty was so much
affected on seeing this generous proceeding, on the
part of an enemy, from whom he had expected
nothing but outrage and ferocity, that he shed
tears; and turning to his fellow prisoner, Sir
Geoffrey Carebrow, he exclaimed.
What a pity it is, that men of such generous
hearts should possess such erring judgments!
Sir Geoffrey made no reply. He and Berwick
had been brought from their confinement in the
Point cave, in order to be conveyed to Donegore
with the other prisoners. Those who conducted
him from the cave, had diverted themselves with
his fears, by informing him that he was going to be
tried for his crimes by the victorious United
Irishmen
;
and that he should undoubtedly be hanged
before the evening. He was in consequence much
depressed in spirits, and in no humour to
interchange
ideas of a pleasant nature with the more
courageous and liberal minded M`Claverty.
CHAP. III.
Ere the ruddy sun be set,
Pikes must shiver, javelins sing;
Blade with clattering buckler meet,
Halbert crash, and helmet ring.
(Weave the crimsoned web of war,)
Let us go, and let us fly;
Where our friends the conflict share,
Where they triumph, where they die!
Gray
.
M`Cauley
now assembled his men on a height
to the north-west of the town, where he occupied
about the space of an hour in arranging them into
into companies, and putting them through different
military evolutions, after which they proceeded to
Donegore hill.
They had scarcely departed, when a
detachment
of cavalry, about eighty in number, who had
been for some time concealed behind the heights to
the southward of the valley in which Larne is
situated, now entered the town, in great fury, under
the command of a captain Claverill, and was
preparing
,
in the wantonness of revenge, to set fire to
the houses, when Small informed them of his treaty
with the insurgents, and declared that he would,
with all the force under his command, cause it to
be respected. The loyalists of the town joined him
in the declaration, protesting that they would
oppose
with their whole power any infringement of
the treaty.
If you violate this contract, said they, the
first news you may expect to hear from the rebel
c
camp, will be that M`Claverty and his fellow
prisoners have fallen victims to your perfidy.
By this firmness the town was saved from the
destroying hands of barbarians, who had not the
courage to show themselves while it was occupied
by that enemy, whom they now affected to despise
and detest.
When the first intelligence of the insurrection at
Larne reached Carrickfergus, this troop of cavalry
had been detached there to assist the garrison in
suppressing it. On arriving at the vicinity of Larne,
they were informed that the soldiers had been
defeated
,
and nearly all slain; and that the survivors,
who with their wounded captain had taken refuge
in the barrack, were expected soon to surrender
to the insurgents, whose numbers, courage and
warlike
equipment were described in the most
exaggerated
terms. Intimidated by this account, they
did not venture to enter the town, until the enemy
had departed.
At about eleven o'clock, O'Halloran arrived at
the place of encampment. He had expected to
find thousands assembled: but he only found about
a hundred and fifty men busily employed
entrenching
the ground. These, however, soon satisfied him
that there was no want of zeal in the country.
They informed him that, less than half an hour
before
,
upwards of five thousand men had marched
thence, under the command of Porter and M`
Cracken
for Antrim, in order to dislodge the military
stationed in that town, and to capture a number of
magistrates, who, they were informed, had
appointed
to meet there that day on some county
business
.
At this intelligence, O'Halloran's heart leapt
light within him. He put spurs to his horse, and
followed by those who had attended him from
Larne, in less than forty minutes overtook the
insurgent
army.
It had just halted at the entrance of the town to
form its plan of attack. His arrival was hailed by
loud cheers from the assembled multitude; and on
relating the occurrences that had taken place in
Larne, the air again rang with acclamations; and
Porter, M`Cracken, and all the other chiefs, as well
as the whole body of the insurgents, with one voice,
requested him to assume the command. He
consented
,
on condition that Porter and M`Cracken,
should be considered as having equal authority, as
well as equal responsibility, in all the measures that
should be adopted; for, said he, I am
determined
to adopt none of which they shall disapprove.
He then inquired into the strength of the
opposition
they were to encounter, and was informed
that there were two hundred and fifty infantry, and
one hundred and fifty cavalry, stationed in the
town, under the command of a major Siddons,
which force would perhaps be augmented by the
junction of from fifty to a hundred loyalists. It
was stated, also, that they had three or four pieces
of cannon; but it was supposed that their
ammunition
was not abundant.
O'Halloran now reviewed the strength and
appointments
of his own party, and found that it
consisted
of between seven and eight thousand men,
who were promiscuously armed with pikes,
muskets
,
swords, hayforks, &c. They had also two
small pieces of cannon, with some experienced
cannoniers
,
who had formerly been in the royal
service
,
to manage them.
By people from the town, he was informed that
major Siddons, apprized of the intended attack, had
drawn up his men in the main street, in the open
area, between the market-house and the entrance
of the street, his cavalry forming a compact body
in front of the market-house, and his infantry lining
the sides of the street.
On hearing this, O'Halloran made a short
encouraging
address to his men, which he concluded by
observing that they were to fight this battle almost
in view of the residence of William Orr, the most
lamented martyr in these latter times, for the cause
of Irish liberty, that glorious, animating cause for
which they had now taken up arms. He exhorted
them to fight valiantly in order to avenge his death.
Reflect, said he, that his disconsolate widow,
and bereaved children, will, this day, hear the
dying
,
repentant cries of his destroyers, and that your
shouts of victory will be to them the intelligence,
that a portion at least, of their proud and
relentless
oppressors are humbled to the dust. Let,
therefore, our word of battle be `
Remember Orr!
'
He now selected five hundred men whom he put
under the direction of Samuel Orr, the brother of
their favourite martyr, with injunctions to take a
circuitous route towards the Shane's-castle road,
and enter the town from the south-west, while the
main body should, as soon as they ascertained the
proximity of Orr's approach to the enemy, enter
from the eastward by the road on which they were
already stationed, by which means the enemy
would be attacked on both sides.
As O'Halloran expected that major Siddons
would endeavour to disperse his men, as soon as
they should enter the town, by a charge of cavalry;
he placed in his van a phalanx, consisting of four
hundred pikemen, forming a compact square of
twenty men on each side. This phalanx was
divided
into five files, each containing four men in
front, and the whole range of the twenty men in
depth. The second and fourth of these files, were
ordered, as soon as the expected charge should
be made, to give way and permit the horsemen
to follow into the spaces they should thus leave
vacant
,
while the first, third and fifth files remaining
firm, should fall upon them on all sides with their
pikes.
A considerable number of musketeers were
ordered
to station themselves in the houses of such
of the inhabitants as were friendly to their cause,
and, from thence, to direct their fire upon their
troops.
The four hundred pikemen, composing the
phalanx
,
were selected both on account of their
enthusiasm
and their personal activity. They were
supplied
with the best manufactured pikes in their
whole army, and each division or file was under
the conduct of an officer who perfectly
comprehended
his duty.
A promiscuous multitude of thousands on whom
no regularity could be imposed, and over whom it
was impossible to exert any controul, followed
close to the phalanx, which insured its steadiness,
while their officers took care to prevent the
pressure
from being so great as to derange its
operations
.
In front of the whole, their two pieces of cannon
were placed; but it was not intended that they
should take them farther than the bend of the
street, which opened on the military. At this
place O'Halloran wished to await the attack of
the cavalry, whom he hoped his cannon would
throw into some confusion, as they advanced. For
this purpose, he also placed a number of men with
muskets on the sides, and somewhat in advance of
his phalanx, who were directed to keep their
station
,
and not fire on the enemy until the latter
should approach to the charge. They were then
to retreat by the sides of the streets, and leave the
phalanx to its operations.
c 2
Having made all his dispositions, and having no
time to lose, as he understood the loyalists were in
momentary expectation of a reinforcement from
Belfast, O'Halloran on ascertaining that Samuel
Orr's detachment had nearly reached its
destination
,
rode up to the van exclaiming
Lead on, my boys!
Remember Orr!
Remember
Orr! was reiterated by the whole
multitude, and they immediately moved forward.
On arriving at the end of the street, whence
they had a full view of the enemy, they fired both
their cannon and their muskets with such effect
that about twenty of the dragoons, ten or twelve of
the infantry, and all the men who were stationed
at one of the enemy's cannon, were killed. The
fire of the troops did comparatively little
execution
,
the insurgents having chiefly withdrawn
themselves
behind the corner of the street. Five or
six, however, were killed, and one of their cannon
was dismounted!
As O'Halloran had expected, Siddons supposing
their disappearance, at that moment, a mark of
their intimidation, thought to decide the affair at
once by a charge of his cavalry. He
accordingly
gave orders to that effect; on perceiving
which, the insurgent musketeers speedily
retreated
,
as they had been directed, which encouraged
Siddons hastily to advance at full-gallop, calling on
them as rebels to lay down their arms and disperse.
On the approach of the cavalry, the front men
of the three divisions of the phalanx that were to
remain firm, presented their pikes, and prevented
their progress; but the other two divisions retiring
as they were directed, the cavalry followed into
the vacancies; and, in a few minutes, every man
and horse was prostrated to the earth. A torrent
of pikes which they could neither escape nor
resist
,
rushed upon them from every direction. It
was in vain that they called for quarter. Their
cries were either unheard or disregarded, in the
terrible tumult. The fatal war-word
Remember
Orr
alone resounded from every quarter, and
deafened the voice of mercy.
Siddons, on seeing this disaster, rode back to
call his infantry into action; but they were panic
struck, and on the appearance of Samuel Orr's
party had fled behind the wall that surrounded
Lord Massareene's castle, which fronted the end
of the street; and even of this refuge they would
have been deprived, had it not been for the
cowardice
of Orr. On perceiving them flying towards
the castle, past the one side of which he was
entering
the town with his men, he supposed that
they were advancing to attack him. He,
therefore
,
took the alarm, and putting spurs to his horse,
set off on an absolute flight. His men seeing their
leader fly, without staying to inquire the cause,
followed
his example, and dispersed in all directions,
in consequence of which Siddons's infantry were
enabled to effect their escape into the castle yard.
Siddons seeing it vain to attempt to rally
cowards
,
and in despair for the fate of his cavalry,
gallopped
back to the scene of slaughter, to beg
quarter
for such as survived, or to die along with them.
O'Halloran, who had been unable to restrain the
fury of the insurgents, or to save a single
horseman
,
perceiving his approach, and aware of his
danger, burst furiously through the crowd, calling
after some men who were rushing towards Siddons,
to halt and not slay him; and he reached them just
in time to arrest the arm of one man who had
aimed at him a deadly blow. Although broken in
its force, the weapon still descended and knocked
off Siddons's hat, without, however, inflicting any
wound. O'Halloran ordered the man to lift the
hat, and present it to Siddons, and was obeyed.
I am your prisoner, said Siddons, and he held
out the handle of his sword to O'Halloran, which
was accepted. O'Halloran hastily gave him in
charge to three men, who stood convenient, and
returned to where the work of destruction was still
going on upon the cavalry. He had scarcely
done so, when some of the troops firing from
behind
the wall where they had taken shelter, upon
Siddons's guard, brought the whole three to the
ground. Siddons immediately turned his horse,
and in another moment was also in shelter of the
castle wall.
The carnage of the cavalry was now nearly over,
and O'Halloran had succeeded in saving only five
from destruction. He found afterwards, however,
that Porter and M`Cracken had saved seven others,
but four of them were supposed to be too severely
wounded to survive.
In a few minutes his attention was drawn to
another
fatal incident, which was taking place near
the Court-house, which stood between Lord
Massareene's
castle, where the infantry had taken
refuge
,
and the scene of battle. He perceived a
gentleman
on horseback hastily advancing, and four
men rushing to attack him with pikes. He
clapped
spurs to his horse to save him, but he was too
far distant, and before he could reach the scene,
not only was the stranger wounded in several
places, but three of his assailants were shot dead,
by a volley fired from the troops from behind the
castle wall. O'Halloran, however, approached,
screened from the fire of the troops, by the
Court-house
;
and ascertaining that the stranger was the
Earl O'Neil, whose private character he much
respected
,
he caused him to be carried into a house,
and ordered him to be well treated; and
immediately
despatching a messenger for surgical
assistance
,
again joined his companions.
CHAP. IV.
But that vain victory has ruined all,
They form no longer to their leader's call;
In vain he doth whate'er a chief may do,
To check the headlong fury of that crew;
In vain their stubborn ardour he would tame,
The hand that kindles cannot quench the flame;
The weary foe alone hath turned their mood,
And shown their rashness to that erring brood.
Byron
.
Although
the insurgents had gained a complete
victory and were in absolute possession of the
town, Massareene Castle excepted, their exultation
was but short lived. Indeed they had scarcely
time to be sensible of its existence before they
were thrown into great perplexity by the hasty
arrival of some of their friends, with very
discouraging
intelligence. They informed them that
general
Nugent was rapidly advancing, and was now
only a few miles distant at the head of two
thousand
men, and a heavy train of artillery, in order
to attack them.
Various were the opinions now given concerning
what measures should be adopted. Some were
immediately
for storming the walls behind which
Siddons's infantry had taken shelter; others were
for marching to meet Nugent, and attack him in
the open country; while some, more timid or less
zealous than the rest, hinted at the propriety of
taking advantage of their recent success, by
opening
a negociation with the approaching army.
Great clamour and confusion took place in
expressing
these different opinions. Scarcely any one
was silent; and so many spoke at once that
scarcely
any one understood what another proposed.
O'Halloran at length obtained a hearing among
the principal officers, who, after several unavailing
attempts to procure silence and attention amidst
the irrepressible confusion of the multitude,
separated
themselves from it.
After deploring the unmanageable dispositions
of their followers, my friends, said he, we must
even with such materials, attempt by some means
to stem the tide of misfortune, before we give up
all for lost. We must not despairbrave men
never despair in a good cause. The irregularities
of these people may grieve you; the timidity of
some, the fanaticism of others, and the
ungovernable
temper of all, may excite anxiety in your
minds concerning our approaching enemy. But in
the midst of anxiety, duty must be performed; by
what method, reason must be consulted. The
unthinking
and giddy crowd, will not, cannot reason.
You must, therefore, both reason and decide for
them, otherwise they will become a feeble, and
almost resistless prey, to their enemies. I shall
give you my opinion.
It has been proposed to negociate, but unless
you intend absolutely to abandon the cause, to
assert which, by force of arms, we have been so
many years preparing, and for which you have
this day so gallantly fought, and obtained, by the
blessing of Providence, so signal a victory, you
will not listen to this proposal. By our enemies
nothing under present circumstances will be
expected
but unconditional surrender, which would
be followed by unmerciful slaughter. We have
commenced, we must go on with the workit
would be ruin to go back.
As to the proposal of attacking Massareene
castle, the advancing enemy is too near, according
to our information, to permit that. It is evident
that their coming on us while engaged in such an
attack would be attended with the most disastrous
consequences.
No rational counsel, in my opinion, has yet
been offered for your consideration. The most
salutary that has been offered seems to be that
which advises you to march out and oppose
Nugent
on the field; as in so doing you might have a
chance, though I think it would be but a very slight
one, of overcoming so numerous and well appointed
an army as his.
My opinion, taking all circumstances into view,
is that we should immediately withdraw from the
town, and return to the encampment at Donegore,
where, during the evening, we may expect to be
joined by large reinforcements from all parts of
the country, and where from the entrenchments
already thrown up, and the nature of the ground,
no army can attack us but at a great disadvantage.
There we may await the occurrences of favourable
opportunities to harrass our enemies, or if they
shall have the hardihood to attack us, the chance
of victory will be much on our side.
The officers agreed to the wisdom of this opinion,
and having by great exertions, at length procured
an audience from the multitude, earnestly pressed
its adoption. But that multitude was now greatly
diminishedmore than one-half of its number had
disappeared. Some were panic-struck at the
approach
of so formidable an army; some were
horror-struck
at the scene of carnage they had just
witnessed, and could not bear the idea of seeing it
repeated; while others were disgusted at the
dissonance
of opinion, clamour and confusion which
had taken place, and anticipating that numbers
would imitate the treachery of Orr's party, and
desert the cause, since there was no authority or
regulation by which defection could be prevented,
resolved not to be the last to get rid of so
troublesome
and perilous an enterprise.
From these various motives, while the leaders
were deliberating on what measure to adopt,
several
thousands had withdrawn from the insurrection
standard; so that when they came to make known
their decision, as before stated, they found that
nearly one-half of their number had left them.
The brave phalanx, however, to whose
intrepidity
the victory they had gained was altogether
owing, still remained. It had lost about a third of its
original number. But the gallant spirits who
composed
it, were elevated by the excitement of their
successful fighting, and by the plaudits of their
companions
.
They now received the thanks of
O'Halloran
,
delivered publicly in the name of the other
officers, and of their country, for their good
conduct
,
and the services they had performed.
Had Orr's party only acted with half your
heroism, said he, in concluding his address of
thanks, we should now have been in possession
of Massareene castle; and, protected by its walls,
we might have bade defiance to the coming enemy.
As it is, we must now withdraw to Donegore, and,
fortified in that position, where we shall receive
large reinforcements, we can await with advantage
the assault of our opponents.
A headstrong enthusiast of the name of
Campbell
,
who had during the battle performed prodigies
of valour, now stepped from the ranks, all covered
as he was with blood and dust, and addressed
O'Halloran.
Why should we retreat? he exclaimed. We
have gained a great victory. Let us wait for the
enemy here. I'll warrant we shall give a good
account
of him. It is time enough to fly when we
are beaten. Surely, Mr. O'Halloran wont turn
coward, like Orr.
Bravo! bravo! shouted numbers of the most
violent and determined. Campbell is right! We
shall fight them here!
It was in vain that O'Halloran expostulated with
them, and represented the imprudence and even
madness of their determination. They could not
understand his reasoning. The majority had
indeed
,
by this time, become too intoxicated to
understand
it, for they had plundered the ardent
spirits contained in the houses of the royalists.
O'Halloran deplored their infatuation and
misconduct
;
but he determined not to desert them.
Perhaps, said he to Porter, some means
may yet be found to save these people. It is our
duty to stand by them, and to do our best to avert
their ruin.
He then told them that although he disapproved
of their wishes, he would comply with them; and
make an immediate stand against the enemy. But
we must choose better ground, said he. Will you
submit to my directions? Heaven may yet grant
us success.
He was answered by loud cheers of approbation,
and he immediately commenced making his
arrangements
for receiving the enemy.
At the eastern entrance of the town there was a
large meadow, surrounded by a thick hedge, at
one corner of which two roads met. Along one of
these roads it was known that the enemy was
advancing
,
and here O'Halloran was determined to
make his stand, with the view of having the other
road, which led to Donegore, open and convenient
for his men, in case they should be worsted, to
retreat
to that rendezvous, without being scattered in
a confused flight, which he knew would be the
case if they should be defeated in the streets.
Vol. II. D
He lined the whole range of the hedge, along
the road on which he expected the attack, with
musketeers, directing them to remain in shelter of
the ditch, to be steady and not to expend their
fire until they were sure of their object. His
phalanx
was not of much service, in its embodied form,
in repelling an attack to be made, as he expected,
with fire-arms; nay, that very compactness which,
together with the nature of its weapons, rendered
it so formidable to a charge of cavalry, or of the
bayonet, would here have been a disadvantage.
Instead, therefore, of arranging it as formerly, into
the form of a solid square, he drew up the men
who composed it, into that of a semi-circle, and
stationed them a few paces behind the musketeers,
with instructions, in the event of being attacked
with artillery or musketry, to throw themselves
flat on the grass; but, to fall immediately into their
former compact square form, in case they should
be attacked with the cavalry or charged with the
bayonet. His few pieces of artillery, he planted
at the eastern end of the field, on the left of his
phalanx, and in such a situation as would permit
them to be the most efficiently employed against
the enemy.
The rest of his followers not being under much
discipline, nor, indeed, as he plainly perceived,
likely to be of much service during the conflict, he
placed in various groups about the field, desiring
them, while the fire of their adversaries continued,
to shelter themselves as much as possible among
the long meadow grass, or in the ditch that
surrounded
the field; but if a close charge should be
made, to be prompt in assisting the phalanx to
repel
it.
He now, after exhorting them to firmness and
bravery, reminded them that Donegore hill was the
place of rendezvous, to which, in case of a defeat,
every man should be careful to direct his course.
He had scarcely finished this exhortation when the
eastern hill, at the distance of about a mile, began
to glitter in the sun, and a forest of bayonets
appeared
gradually approaching. The whole hill
became covered with the scarlet uniforms of the
royal troops, who kept steadily advancing to the
military music of Croppies lie down. They
halted when within a quarter of a mile from the
field occupied by the insurgents. Immediately
nine pieces of cannon were wheeled round, and
drawn at full gallop somewhat nearer, to the top
of a rising ground, and their muzzles turned to
the field. Four companies of infantry were at
the same time marched into an adjoining pasture
field.
As yet not a shot was fired, and every voice was
silent for a few minutes; even all motion seemed
suspended, while the insurgents gazed, during this
dreadful pause, on the terrible army that was
thus brought against them, with the most intense
anxiety and awe.
But this pause was indeed short; for on the
other road, on which no enemy was expected, a
large body of both horse and foot made their
appearance
.
Nugent, who had reconnoitred the
position
of the insurgents before he appeared in view,
had detached this body by a circuitous route,
under
the command of colonel Lumly, to attack them
on that side, by which means they would be
nearly
surrounded.
In a moment the cannons opened their mouths,
and a destructive fire was at the same instant poured
both by Lumly's troops and those which occupied
the pasture field, on the unfortunate insurgents. The
cannon of the latter, was also fired; but it was only
once, for their cannoniers either fled or fell, while
the terrified musketeers, who were concealed
behind
the hedge, discharged their pieces at random
and fled also. The pikemen also started up to fly;
for a fiery death was around them, and fast
enclosing
them on all sides.
As Lumly's party occupied the road by which
they endeavoured to escape, O'Halloran at the
head of a considerable number of pikemen, the
majority of whom belonged to his heroic phalanx,
made on it a rapid and resolute charge, which
succeeded
in throwing it into confusion, and opened
the way for escape. Immediately the whole
insurgent
force rushed in desperation to that quarter,
for unabated destruction continued to assail them
from every other; and by the weight and fierceness
of their attack, and the length of their pikes,
over-threw
all opposition.
O'Halloran individually fought with wonderful
energy and success. Twice when Lumly had
rallied
a portion of his troops to arrest his progress,
at the head of his chosen body did he break his
way through. A third time Lumly attempted it, and
it proved fatal to him.
That officer must be slain or we shall not
escape
,
exclaimed O'Halloran, who perceived the
whole of Nugent's force fast approaching from
behind
;
and as he made the exclamation, he dashed
his horse forwards, and Lumly and he instantly
met. Their swords were in a moment shivered to
pieces, but a stump of O'Halloran's still remained,
with which, at one blow, he brought his antagonist
to the ground.
To Donegore, my men! said he. Stop for
nothing; and without minding the fallen Lumly,
they rushed over him with the speed and ferocity
of wild animals, presenting a terrible front of pikes,
which cleared the way as they flew along.
Lumly's
party seeing their commander fall, did not,
however, offer much more opposition, so that the
way was easily kept open for their flight. Nugent
now despatched his cavalry in pursuit of the
fugitives
,
who soon scattering, fled in all directions;
not, however, until numbers of them had fallen
victims to the firing of the carbines of their
pursuers
.
As they took into the fields or into the by-roads
and private avenues, the cavalry separated into
small parties, in order to follow them. One party
pursued some of them as far as Templepatrick, to
which town, after pillaging it, they set fire, and
consumed upwards of a hundred dwelling houses,
besides committing many acts of violence and
cruelty
on the inhabitants. Night alone put an end
to the havoc, destruction and horror of this
disastrous
day; and, at a late hour, the pursuing cavalry
rejoined their companions in Antrim.
Such of the wounded of the insurgents as had
fallen into the hands of the victors, were carried to
the court-house, and in a summary manner tried by
martial law, and sentenced to die the next morning.
Between seven and eight hundred of them, had
been killed during the day, and between eighty
and ninety were now under sentence of death.
Of the military, about one hundred and seventy
had fallen in both actions. But the deaths which the
royalists most lamented were those of lord O'Neil and
colonel Lumly. The latter, on being unhorsed by
O'Halloran, had received a mortal stroke with a
pike from one of the insurgents, another of whom
had rolled him into the ditch, by the road side,
where, after the conflict was over, he was found by
some of the soldiers just expiring.
Lord O'Neil suffered extremely from his wounds
until the next morning, when he also expired. He
had begged Nugent, almost with his last breath, to
spare the lives of the deluded people, and not to
Vol. II. D 2
permit any feelings of revenge to excite him to
unnecessary severity in the execution of his duty.
For the prisoners now under the sentence of death
he particularly pleaded, and had their lives
granted
to his intercession.
CHAP. V.
Lo! comes a flag to summon their surrender.
To fight or yield is now the question with them:
To fight for what?a cause they scarce approve of,
And which, even if they did, they see is hopeless.
To yield unbargained, would betray too much
Of cowardice, as if they feared a battle.
It would be madness too without conditions,
To throw themselves into the power of those
Whose power they have insulted. But negotiate!
Negotiate! is the cryget terms or fight.
Irish Soothsayer
.
O'Halloran
, after the discomfiture of his forces,
rode in company with M`Cracken, Porter, and a
few others, at full speed to Donegore, on reaching
which he found that his old associates from Larne,
had just arrived. A vast concourse from other
parts of the country had flocked to this rendezvous;
and the number was every moment increasing; so
that before night came, it was supposed that the
encampment contained no fewer than ten thousand
men.
They were not all, however, equally zealous.
The news of the defeat at Antrim, filled some of
them with considerable dismay; and a great many
took advantage of the night to withdraw from such
a dangerous enterprise. When the morning came,
the diminution of their numbers, from these
desertions
,
was very perceptible; and seemed very
generally
to shake that mutual confidence in each
other, which is so necessary to the success of
warlike
operations. Hence doubt and perplexity
began
to reign over the whole camp, a circumstance
which did not escape the penetration of M`Claverty.
He conceived it to afford a favourable opportunity
of once more attempting to dissuade them from
persevering
in their designs. He accordingly
addressed
them, promising to negotiate for them, an
absolute
pardon for all they had done, if they would
quietly lay down their arms and disperse.
He was listened to with the more attention, even
by those who were not intimidated by the
preceding
day's misfortunes, (and who still formed a
sufficiently
numerous body to enforce the adherence
of the rest, if they should think proper to do so,)
by intelligence which had been just received of the
massacre of the Protestants at Wexford, and the
other atrocities committed by the insurgents of the
Catholic persuasion in the South.
The nine-tenths of their number being
Presbyterians
,
were easily excited on this subject, and
without much difficulty made to believe that they
had entered into a rebellion which was likely to be
converted into a war of religious vengeance, like
the former Irish rebellions, against the atrocities
of which they had, from their infancy, been taught
to feel the most inveterate abhorrence.
M`Claverty was well aware of this circumstance,
and did not neglect to avail himself of it. After
enlarging on the extreme improbability of final
success attending their exertionsAnd for what
is it, my friends, said he, that you are making
these exertions, at the awful risk of your lives and
of every thing else dear to you? Your views, no
doubt, are confined to the acquirement of some
civil or political right, of which you suppose
yourselves
deprived, whereas, you may rely on it, that
by far the greater portion of your confederacy, at
present in arms throughout the kingdom, have very
different views. Their's is a religious warfare.
They regard civil grievances as of comparatively
little importance, to those religious restrictions
which they conceive an heretical government has
imposed upon them. Wishing for your aid, they
have, until they got you, as they supposed, too far
involved to retreat with safety, kept the real object
of their sedition out of view. But they have now
thrown off the cloak. They have put themselves
under the absolute direction of their priests, who
alone govern in their counsels, and command in
their battles; and whose chief desire is the
extirpation
of that religion you profess, and the
infliction
of a malignant, but as they teach their
fanatical
followers, a holy revenge on its professors.
In selecting their victims, you perceive that already
they do not inquire, are they royalists, but are they
Protestants? Lay your hands upon your hearts,
and ask if your conscience will justify you in
fighting
with such confederates, in such a cause? Pause,
I beseech you, and reflect that the moment the
power and influence of Britain is expelled this
country, Protestantism is also expelled. You would
have neither equal numbers, nor equal ferocity
with your Catholic confederates; you would,
consequently
,
be utterly unable to prevent the
establishment
of Catholic supremacy and intolerance
in the Island. Oh! my friends, withdraw from this
unnatural confederacy ere it be too late. Perhaps
there are some among you who think that it is
already
too late; who will tell you that you have
even now gone too far to retrace your steps; that
you have offended the constituted authorities past
forgiveness; and that you have no alternative but
to persevere. Do not listen to such deceitful
language
.
You have not yet done any thing, as a
body, but what I am persuaded, the government
will freely pardon, on condition of your returning
peaceably to your allegiance. Now is your time
successfully to negotiate for pardon. You are still
in force, with arms in your hands, but after your
defeat, and that defeat is easily foreseen, from
the force which is now coming against you, you
may in vain implore from the clemency, what
you can now in some measure demand from the
policy of the government. General Nugent whose
victorious army will be here in a few hours, is my
friend. With him, if you permit me, I will
negotiate
for you, and I pledge my honour, that in
doing
so I shall consult your interests as faithfully as
if I were of your party.
The majority of the insurgents listened to this
reasoning with seeming approbation, but there were
a few who acted very differently. They were
either Catholics, or Protestants who had already so
openly signalized themselves in the rebellion that
they were hopeless of pardon. These began to
raise the cry of cowardice and treachery, against all
who appeard wavering, which soon produced much
dissention throughout the camp; and the
approaching
army was considerably advanced, without any
resolution being formed either for battle or
negotiation
.
At length the royal standard was seen floating
in the air, and all the glittering pomp of war
perceived
,
at the distance of a few miles, to be
approaching
the hill. Contention ceased for some
minutes, while every eye contemplated this
imposing
spectacle in profound and awe-struck silence.
M`Claverty sprung again to his feet. All eyes
were directed to him.
O, my neighbours, my friends! he exclaimed,
Negotiate now or perish! Another hour may
place pardon beyond your reach.
We will, we will negotiate, was the
spontaneous
cry which now burst from almost every
mouth.
O'Halloran, M`Cracken, Porter, M`Cauley and
Darragh, (the two latter of whom were Catholics,
and the whole five either already proscribed or
without expectation of pardon,) at first
endeavoured
to check the expression of this resolution, and
to inspire the multitude with more firm and
courageous
sentiments. But they soon found
themselves
obliged to yield to the torrent.
O'Halloran, indeed, now began to perceive that
the cause had become desperate. No French aid
had arrived to afford its adherents a rallying point,
while the bigotry and cruelty of its friends in the
South, cooled and disgusted those in the North,
and tended more to its abandonment and ruin than
the whole power of the government. He,
therefore
,
who was still recognized as their commander,
made but a faint opposition to the cry for
negotiation
.
M`Cracken and Porter soon also withdrew their
opposition; perhaps as much from having fallen
into a similar train of reflection, as from the
apparent
impossibility of resisting the general
decision
.
They were employed in drawing up proposals
to be presented to general Nugent as the conditions
of their surrender, when an officer from the royal
army appeared advancing on horseback towards
the hill, bearing a white flag. O'Halloran, M`
Claverty
,
and one Watt, an influential man among
them, who had been very strenuous in
recommending
negotiation, were appointed a committee to
receive
the messenger, and report his business to the
people. They advanced some distance down the
hill to meet him, carrying with them the
propositions
they had prepared.
M`Claverty soon recognised the flag-bearer to be
an intimate friend, a captain Hutton, whom he
knew to be a man of honour and humanity.
What! said Hutton, as he approached M`
Claverty
,
I understood you were the prisoner of
these people. I now perceive you to be one of their
confidential agents.
Fate has, indeed, made me their prisoner,
said M`Claverty. But humanity has at present
induced me to become their agent, and they have
had sufficient confidence in my honour to entrust
me with the office.
I am glad of it, returned the other, for it
augurs favourably for the termination of the
business
with which I am entrusted. I have been sent
to summon these people to deliver up their arms,
and throw themselves on his majesty's mercy.
Surely, said O'Halloran, your commander
does not expect an unconditional surrender from
men with arms in their hands, strong in numbers,
strong in position, and if urged to extremity, strong
also in courage and determination. To prevent the
effusion of human blood, we will disperse if the
requisite terms are granted us. If they are refused,
however, we can fight, and a few hours may give
us the power of dictating instead of begging terms.
I look on myself, said M`Claverty, as a
mediator in this case. To the government I am
attached from principle, and to those whose
prisoner
I am, and who, confiding in my pledged word,
have deputed me to assist in the management of
this affair, I am bound by honour. To them I am
also bound by gratitude for the respectful
treatment
I have received since I fell into their hands.
In giving my advice, therefore, both parties may
be assured that I do it with a view to their mutual
advantage. I can conceive of no detriment that
the government would sustain by granting an
absolute
pardon to these people for the delusions and
errors into which they have fallen, on condition of
their returning quietly to their duty; and to accept
of such a pardon, I believe, they are already
convinced is to consult their true interest.
Gentlemen, said Hutton, my powers do not
extend to the granting of a pardon. I have been
merely sent to demand an unconditional surrender;
but whatever proposals you may please to make, I
shall convey them to our commander, and return
in one hour with his answer.
Here are our proposals, replied O'Halloran,
producing the written documents to the messenger.
Submit them to your general; and tell him, that
rather than submit to terms less favourable than
these, we are resolved, in God's name, to try the
issue of a battle.
The officer received the papers, and was about
departing, when M`Claverty called on him to stay
a moment.
Convey my earnest request to general
Nugent
,
said he, that he will sooth the feelings of
the people as much as possible. They now see
their delusion, and are desirous of reconciliation
with the established authorities, not so much from
fear, as from conviction of their error. The
accounts
from Wexford have made great
impressions
on them; and, I believe, that they sincerely
repent having joined such a confederacy. Tell
him also, that I, and their other prisoners, have
been treated well; and that, notwithstanding their
irregularity and total want of discipline, they have
hitherto committed no excess repugnant to
humanity
.
I shall with pleasure deliver your message,
replied Hutton. Good morning, gentlemen. I
sincerely hope this affair will terminate without
more bloodshed. He then spurred his horse, and
hastened towards the royal army.
Nugent having perused the proposals, called
his officers together to deliberate concerning
them. They were to the following effect: That
general Nugent and the principal officers under
Vol. II. E
his command, shall guarantee to the army of the
United Irishmen, now encamped on Donegore hill,
a full and free indemnity for all past transactions,
in which indemnity, all the United officers as well as
private men, and all the prisoners for matters of
state, now in the jails of Carrickfergus and
Downpatrick
,
or at the camp of Blarrismoor, or in the
towns of Belfast, Lisburn, Antrim and Ballymena,
shall be included; on which conditions the said
army of the United Irishmen, shall immediately,
without committing any further act of hostility,
disband, and the individuals composing it, return
to their respective homes.
Gentlemen, said Nugent, you will perceive
that some of these demands are absolutely beyond
our power to grant. We have no controul over
any prisoners but those we have ourselves taken
and have now in custody; neither can we fly in the
face of the civil authority, by guaranteeing a
pardon to several individuals now known to be in
the rebel camp, who are already in a state of
proscription
for their crimes and treasons. It is my
opinion, therefore, that we cannot, in duty, listen
to these terms; but on account of the favourable
report given by Mr. M`Claverty, of the present
dispositions of these blind-led people, as well as
from humane considerations, I will, should it meet
with your approbation, make another effort to
induce
a submission without blood-shed.
It was then agreed that Hutton should return
to the insurgent camp with the following note.
General Nugent, and the officers under his
command, find some of the terms required by the
insurgents on Donegore hill, beyond their power to
grant. They cannot interfere with the intentions
of government respecting any prisoners, but such
as they have themselves taken, and have in their
immediate custody. These they are willing to
discharge
.
There are several individuals in the
insurgent
army, already pointed out by the
government
as persons whose offences render them
unworthy
of pardon. Over the fate of these persons
they have no controul; neither do they think it
their duty to include, in any promise of pardon,
those mischievous men, whose delusive doctrines
have seduced their fellow-subjects into the
criminal
and unfortunate measures they have adopted.
From the general pardon, therefore, which they
agree to guarantee to all others now assembled on
Donegore hill, who shall, within one hour after
they receive this notification, deliver up their arms
and return peaceably to their homes and
employments
,
they exclude the following persons, and
description of persons, viz. Henry O'Halloran, the
Rev. James Porter, Henry M`Cracken, Thomas
Story, Thomas Archer, and all who may have been
guilty of assassination, or of wantonly burning the
houses, or otherwise destroying the properties of
the loyal inhabitants of the country.
CHAP. VI.
Alas, poor country!
Almost afraid to know itself! it cannot
Be called our mother, but our grave; where nothing,
But who knows nothing, is seen to smile;
Where sighs, and groans, and shrieks, that rend the air,
Are made, not marked; where violent sorrow seems
A modern ecstacy; the dead man's knell
Is there scarce asked for whom, and good men's lives
Expire before the flowers in their caps,
Dying or e'er they sicken.
Shakspeare
.
Previous
to the return of Hutton with the
foregoing
note, containing Nugent's ultimate offer, a
man on horseback, who said he had travelled all
night, arrived at the insurgent camp, with the
following
letter for O'Halloran:
June 7th
, 1798.
Dear SirIt has fallen to my lot to
communicate
to you the unfortunate news of the forces we
assembled this morning, being completely defeated
and dispersed, after a severe conflict with a large
body of the king's troops, near Ballynahinch, in
which it is supposed, that we lost upwards of one
thousand men.
According to previous arrangement we began
about midnight to assemble in the neighbourhood
of Saintfield, where we had a slight skirmish with
a small body of militia stationed there, over whom
we obtained the advantage, having, with only the
loss of one man, killed six of theirs, and compelled
the rest to retreat.
We then proceeded to Ballynahinch, and
encamped
on lord Moira's demesne adjoining the
town. Here our numbers increased so rapidly,
that before noon, we were nearly twelve thousand
strong. Colonel Munroe joined us about ten o'clock
with a large body from the neighbourhood of
Lisburn
and Hilsborough. About one o'clock the
king's troops arrived from the camp at
Blarrismoor
,
and halted on a hill opposite, part of the
town being between us.
They soon commenced a cannonade, which we
attempted to return, having three small field-pieces,
but we could not manage them to much
advantage
,
whereas their fire annoyed us extremely.
Being
conscious of our superiority in point of
numbers
,
it was, therefore, agreed that we should rush
over the intermediate ground, and charge them
with pikes. For this purpose, we had completed
the necessary arrangements, and were proceeding
forward, when we were attacked with a volley of
musketry from behind, by a party, which,
unnoticed
by us, they had detached round the hill, and
which thus took us in the rear by surprise. Many
of our men immediately fled; but the greater
number
rushed on to the intended attack.
When within thirty yards of our opponents,
we received a dreadful discharge of musketry,
which checked us for an instant by levelling
hundreds
of us to the ground. My left arm was
broken
on this occasion; but I was impelled along
by the press of the multitude, which had resumed
its motion forwards.
We soon reached our adversaries, and made
on them a very effective charge, for in a few
minutes
they were compelled to retreat some distance
from the hill, but there, facing about, they poured
upon us another fire so destructive that hundreds
Vol. II. E 2
fell to the ground, while hundreds more threw
down their arms and fled.
At this important crisis, the troops behind us
also repeated their fire and increased our
confusion
.
To prevent our rallying, for though much
broken, some of us would still have made a stand,
their cavalry now galloped furiously amongst us
and completed our defeat.
The cavalry in continuing the pursuit,
committed
dreadful havoc throughout the country. The
greater part of Ballynahinch, the whole of
Saintfield
,
and country houses without number, have been
consigned to flames, and are now only smoking
ruins.
The destruction is not yet over. From the hill
on which I am concealed, we can see every
moment
new volumes of conflagration arising. My
heart sickens at the disasters of the day. I trust
in God, you have been more fortunate in your
county. If not, I much fear that the cause for
which we have been so long and so anxiously
preparing
to make this struggle, is indeed lost, and that
we shall now have, each of us to await with what
fortitude we can, the fate which an oppressive, cruel
and highly incensed government, may think fit to
award us.
The unfortunate religious jealousy that exists
among the people has been one great cause of our
failure. Some accounts of the misconduct of the
Catholics in the South arrived here the day
before
yesterday, which cooled the ardour of the
Presbyterians, in whom consisted our main strength.
Not one in ten of that persuasion, in whom we
confided
,
have joined us; and although, as you well
know, the Catholic population of the county is not
one to twenty, yet more than the half of those who
took arms were of that body.
If you be yet in force, endeavour all you can,
I bessech you, to prevent the poison of the Wexford
news from infecting the minds of your men,
otherwise
all hopes of liberty for poor Ireland will
indeed
soon be over. It is to put you on your guard
in this matter, that I make such haste to dispatch
this courier, who, as he is acquainted with the
country, and has the advantage of the night to
travel in, will, I hope, reach you in safety.
Munroe and several of our leaders have been
captured. Death, no doubt, will be their portion.
Their doom is perhaps already awarded, for our
merciless pursuers will lose no time, when they
seize any of us, in glutting their vengeance.
May heaven preserve you from such
misfortunes
as we have experienced! I am, with an
aching
heart,
Your friend,
M. RY.
When O'Halloran had communicated the
contents
of this letter to his fellow chiefs; it is in
vain, said he, to contend longer. A battle here,
even if we could persuade our men to risk one,
would only be additional slaughter. A victory
itself
could scarcely retrieve the prospects with
which we set out. It is our duty, therefore, for the
sake of these people, to accept whatever conditions
may be offered. For myself, should I be
demanded
as a sacrifice, I am resigned to my fate, and
shall submit, I hope, without murmuring. I did not
engage in this enterprise without calculating on
the chance and consequences of failure, and
preparing
my mind, if it should be necessary, to
endure
the severest forms of death.
Porter and M`Cracken deliberated a few
moments
.
They then exclaimed, It must be so; we
must yield to fate! Since we can do no more for
our country, we care little for ourselves; and to
whatever lot Providence has ordered for us, we
shall, as becomes us, submit. But Nugent's
messenger
returns; let us hear the terms, and then, all
resistance out of view, we can decide as to the
steps we must take.
The reply of Nugent to their proposals was given
to O'Halloran. He read it aloud to the people.
When he had done, all remained silent in
expectation
of receiving his opinion; he perceived it;
and spoke as follows:
My friends, you have sufficiently proved your
attachment for the cause of liberty and your
country
.
Fate forbids that cause to prevail; and it is
now become necessary for you to relinquish the
pleasing hope, and yield once more to that
government
you have attempted to resist. These are the
terms offered for your submission. You will
obtain
no better. From their benefits, I and some of
my dearest friends are excluded. But we must
give way to our destiny. I should abhor myself,
if from any personal consideration, I could be
withheld
from giving you what I conceive to be the
most salutary counsel, in your present situation.
You ought to accept of these conditions, and
surrender
.
I have just become acquainted with
circumstances
which leave you no other alternative.
Our friends in the county of Down have met with a
total and irretrievable overthrow. Farewell! I and
my proscribed friends, will provide for our own
safety, as prudence may dictate.
He immediately mounted his horse, and
accompained
by Porter, M`Cracken, and the other
exempted
persons, galloped from the hill. The
multitude
,
struck with admiration, for several minutes
gazed after them in profound silence. M`Claverty
then addressed the people.
My friends and fellow subjects, said he, I
admire the magnanimity of your late leader, and
sincerely hope that he may ultimately escape the
dangers that surround him. A free pardon is
offered
to you, will you accept it? The messenger
awaits your reply.
We willwe will accept it, was answered by
a thousand voices. A man of the name of Quin
now stepped forward, and said aloud to M`
Claverty
Sir, be our representative in this affair. Be
it your care to prevent any infringement of these
conditions.
It shall be my care, replied M`Claverty. The
people then threw their arms on the ground, and
returned every man to his own home.
Thus terminated this insurrection in the North,
the only part of the kingdom, of which, from the
intelligent and persevering character of the
people
,
the government was seriously apprehensive;
and thus, in a few days, was blown into air, those
magnificent but impracticable schemes of social
equality, and national independence, over which
the fond imaginations of thousands of Irishmen
had for years been brooding.
The impolicy of the Southern insurgents in
betraying
so early a zeal for the destruction of that
religion which was by far the most prevalent
among their Northern coadjutors, unquestionably
contributed more to the speedy overthrow of this
ill concerted conspiracy, than either the vigilance
or force of the government. Indeed so much were
the Northerns disgusted and alarmed at the conduct
of their Southern confederates, that out of the nine
counties of Ulster, which contained upwards of two
hundred thousand United Irishmen, in only two
had the insurrection been of any consequence; and
in these two, a coolness in the cause was
immediately
manifested by the populace when
intelligence
was received of the Southern atrocities.
CHAP. VII.
Still as I haste the Tartan shouts behind,
And shrieks and sorrows load the saddening wind;
In rage of heart, with ruin in his hand,
He blasts our harvests, and deforms our land;
Yon citron grove, where first in fear we came,
Droops its fair honours to the conquering flame:
Far fly the swains, like us, in deep despair,
And leave to ruffian hands their fleecy care.
Collins
.
After leaving Donegore hill, O'Halloran and
his companions did not relax their speed until
they reached Ballyclare, a town about five miles
distant. Here they stopped for some refreshment,
and with a view to consult on what measures they
should adopt for their safety. But here they had
not been many minutes, until the town was beset
by a troop of horse, that had just arrived from
Larne, on their way to join Nugent in his attack
upon the insurgents at Donegore.
These were the men who, as the reader will
remember
,
entered Larne the preceding day under
the command of Captain Claverill, and would have
set fire to the town after the insurgents left it, had
they not been prevented by Small and his party.
They were now informed of the encampment at
Donegore being broken up, for which the valiant
Captain Caverill swore he was damned sorry, as
he had expected to have some good fighting with
the rebel rascals that evening. But come, my
lads, said he to his dragoons, this cursed town has
been a nest for rebels. Apply your matches and
burn the damned hole.
The dragoons obeyed him after having for some
time galloped through the streets, uttering the
most horrid imprecations against the inhabitants,
who were mostly women and children, for the
majority of the men had been at Donegore, and
were not yet returned. In a few minutes the town
was emptied of these miserable inhabitants, terror
driving them in all directions, over the surrounding
country.
O'Halloran and his companions had also started
off. But the troopers having received some
intimation
concerning them, they were pursued. The
fleetness of their horses, however, saved them all,
except Porter, whose horse stumbled and threw
him, in consequence of which he was taken.
When O'Halloran and M`Cracken had reached
Ballybolly hill, about two miles distant, perceiving
that the pursuit had ceased, they slackened their
pace, and turning round, perceived the town in
flames.
Ah! said M`Cracken, what have not these
villains to answer for?
Regret is now useless, replied O'Halloran,
but I am afraid that we also have some of this
to answer for. But our motives were good; our
judgments only were in error.
Surely, said M`Cracken you do not repent
your efforts in the cause of your country's
freedom
.
I meant well for my country, replied
O'Halloran
,
but my efforts have only encreased her
chains. I wished to make her happy, and more
prosperous, and I have contributed to make her
more miserable and degraded!
M`Cracken only replied with a sigh; and in this
tone of mind, each absorbed in his own reflections,
they rode slowly and silently until they came to a
small cottage on the verge of Agnew's hill. They
stopped at the door, and a neat, cleanly looking,
middle aged woman, with a child in her arms,
opened it. She appeared to have been weeping,
for the tears still shone in her eyes. On first
seeing
the gentlemen, she startled as if she
apprehended
some danger; but soon recognising O'Halloran,
her fears vanished, and being asked if they could
obtain some refreshment, she replied
Yes, and welcome; such as I have.
They now alighted and entered. Upon a small
table, near a blazing turf fire, over which a
teakettle
was suspended, they found a large bible,
lying open, on looking into which, O'Halloran's
attention was arrested by the following
consolatory
passage, at the beginning of the 46th Psalm.
God is our refuge and strength, a very present
help in trouble. Therefore will we not fear, though
the earth be removed, and though the mountains
be carried into the midst of the sea; though the
waters thereof roar and be troubled; though the
mountains shake with the swellings thereof.
He read the passage aloud; and turning to
M`Cracken, I am not superstitious, said he, but
really there is consolation here. Dependence on
God is, indeed, the firmest rock on which to build
hope, and the unlooked-for occurrence of this
passage
,
appears to me something like an assurance
that heavenly power will protect us from our
enemies
.
Mr. O'Halloran, replied the other, you are
surely not serious in laying such emphasis on any
accidental incident? We must expect no miracles
now-a-days; and I believe that the best way to
preserve ourselves from our enemies is to keep out
of their reach.
I believe, however, observed O'Halloran,
that whether out of their reach or in it, we
require
the protecting arm of Providence to
accomplish
our safety. I confess that from the time that
we left the camp, until this moment, I felt much
dispirited. I felt as if I had no support in my
distress
,
no refuge to fly to from the vengeance of our
pursuers; but this passage has, in an instant,
dispelled
my fears, or rather it has restored my
courage
,
for it has reminded me that, come what will,
I have an unchangeable friend, who will not desert
me in my need.
M`Cracken, astonished at the seriousness of his
companion, replied, I hope, however, that, in
relying
on preternatural protection, you will not
neglect the usual earthly means of safety, a
proper
concealment from your enemies.
I will not neglect earthly means, said
O'Halloran
,
for it is my duty not to neglect them; but
I shall not, henceforth, be so solicitous about the
result; for should my enemies find me, here, said
he, placing his finger on the passage, here is my
support.
The woman now modestly observed to
O'Halloran
,
Ah! sir, that is, indeed, a comfortable
passage
.
I also, just before you came, derived great
consolation from it; for I have been, both
yesterday
and to day, in great trouble; but this precious
book has enabled me to support it. I have passed
the time in reading the various promises which
God makes to his children in affliction, and I have
had my sorrows sweetened. But, gentlemen, as I
find you have been at Donegore, may I ask you if
there has been any blood shed? My husband left
me yesterday to join the United Irishmen there?
At what time of the day did your husband go,
inquired O'Halloran.
In the afternoon, Sir.
Then said he, be comforted, for he is safe.
There was blood shed at Antrim, but none at
Donegore
;
and your husband did not depart in time to
Vol. II. F
have reached Antrim before all was over. You
may expect him home this very evening, for the
people assembled at Donegore, have voluntarily
dispersed, after having stipulated with the
government
for a pardon.
O God! I thank thee, that my children are not
yet fatherless! she cried, falling on her knees.
Thou hast heard my prayer, and hast
protected
him. Make me thankful all the days of my
life, for thou hast delivered me out of this great
calamity.
She then rose with a countenance brightened
with joy; but still serious. Gentlemen, said she,
you must excuse me; for really I could not
refrain
for returning instant thanks to the Author of
all good, for this unlooked for mercy to me and
mine.But you must want refreshments. Shall I
prepare you any?
They assented. She called aloudPaddy!
and a little boy of about ten years old appeared,
whom she directed to lead the gentlemen's horses
into the stable, and give them oats.
The gentlemen seeing the boy so small, went to
assist him. When they returned they found a
comfortable
meal prepared for them. During the repast,
Mrs. M`Kinley, with a countenance expressive of
some anxiety, requested to know if the pardon they
had mentioned, extended to all who had been in arms
on Donegore hill, for, said she, you were there;
and yet you speak of being in danger.
The pardon was not granted to all, replied
O'Halloran; but very few were excepted, and it
was our fate to be among the unfortunate number.
You may be assured, however, that your husband
is included in it.
Gentlemen, said she, I am sorry for your
situation. In this remote place, however, you are
in the meantime safe; and my husband will gladly
contribute all in his power to your concealment.
Poor man! he left me yesterday with a sore heart;
but, he said, he must go, as his oath compelled
him.
Shortly after tea was finished, little Paddy came
running into the house, with intelligence that he
saw his father coming, and then ran off with the
fleetness of an arrow to meet him. Mrs. M`Kinley
hastily got up, and was speedily in her husband's
arms.
Thank God! thank God! was all she could
utter for some minutes, while her husband kissed
off the tears of joy that trickled down her cheeks.
He now perceived O'Halloran and his companion;
and advancing respectfully towards them,
welcomed
them to his house.
Gentlemen, said he, you must be carefully
concealed, for Claverill's dragoons are scouring the
whole country. They have caught Porter; and
had it not been for M`Claverty, they would have
put him to death in Ballyclare; but he prevailed
on them to send him to general Nugent, to be
disposed
of as the government may order. It was
well for us all that M`Claverty came with us to
Ballyclare, as they would otherwise have
discredited
,
or at least disregarded, our having obtained
pardon; and many would have fallen victims to
heir ferocity. They had more than three-fourths
of the town in flames, when he arrived; but by his
exertions the remainder has been saved.
O'Halloran signified his intention, if M`Cracken
would accompany him, to proceed, as soon as it
should be dark, by unfrequented roads, to his own
castle, in the neighbourhood of which, they might
find means of concealment till an opportunity should
offer of escaping to Scotland, whence they would
easily obtain a conveyance to America. M`Cracken
at first preferred taking the road to Slimiss mountain,
where M`Cauley, Archer, and the other
unpardoned
insurgents had proposed to take refuge, as they
believed that they might there, for a long time,
elude the pursuit of the government; but the
advantage
of being near a sea-port, from which means
might be found to escape to another country,
appeared
so inviting that he yielded to his friend's
proposal. They accordingly set off as soon as it
became dark, expecting to arrive at O'Halloran
castle long before day break.
When within two miles of the castle they were
surprised to find the road, at the house of a man
named Howley, guarded by armed persons in
military
uniform, on whom they had advanced before
they were aware. They turned suddenly back,
and endeavoured to escape at full flight, which they
would both have done, had not a shot, fired at
them by one of the military, wounded M`Cracken's
horse. The animal immediately fell with his rider
under him, who was instantly seized by three
men who had followed in pursuit of them.
Who is your companion? demanded they. A
gentleman, he replied, whom I pray heaven
you may never discover.
Where were you journeying to at this
unseasonable
hour? was the next question.
To Larne, was the reply.
We'll send you there to-morrow, said one of
them; but to-night, you must be so good as to
lodge with us. Culbert and Craig, continued he,
addressing two of his party who had come forward
on horse back, pursue the other runaway! They
must be a couple of the damned rebels who are
now flying from justice.
They obeyed him with all their speed; but
O'Halloran was considerably in advance of them,
and knew the country so well, that although their
horses were fresh and swift, he finally escaped.
However, as he was now obliged, if he continued on
horseback, to keep the main road to Larne, which
he wished to avoid, judging rightly that it would be
the whole of the ensuing day beset with parties of
military and royalists, in pursuit of their prey, he
thought it best to abandon his horse, and seek
safety on foot. He, therefore, turned into an
avenue
leading to a farm house, with the principles of
whose owner he was acquainted; but not wishing
to disturb the family, for fear of attracting his
pursuers
,
he threw his saddle and bridle into a ditch,
and turning his horse loose betook himself for
shelter to one of the out houses.
He had scarcely secreted himself when he heard
the sound of his pursuers galloping rapidly past
the avenue to the house. He, therefore, conceived
that he was for the present safe; and endeavoured
to compose himself to rest on some straw that he
found on the floor. For a considerable time, the
agitation of his mind, on account of M`Cracken,
kept him awake; but the fatigue of his body,
together
with his having slept none for the two
preceding
nights, at length overcame him, and he fell
into a slumber, from which he did not awake until
he was startled by the entrance of a man in the
morning.
He arose, and found that the threshing floor of
a barn had been his couch. He also found that
the man whose entrance had aroused him, was the
owner of the place. His name was Blair; and
although
he had not been active among the
conspirators
,
his sentiments and feelings were known to
be on their side. He conducted O'Halloran to the
dwelling house, and ordered breakfast to be
prepared
for him in a private room. O'Halloran
recounted
to him the incidents which had brought
him there, and requested to know by what
accident
Vol. ii. f 2
the military were stationed on the road at
Howley's house.
They are a party of the Glenarm yeomanry,
said Blair; and, I believe, it is for the purpose of
making a parade of his loyalty that Howley has
brought them to his house. The United Irishmen
had taken him prisoner, in Glenarm, on the
morning
of the
rising
, and carried him to their camp on
Belair hill, adjoining that town. The catholics
from the northern part of the county, who disliked
him on account of the officious discoveries he had
made of their smuggling, by which he
impoverished
many of them, would have put him to death but
for the opposition of their leaders.
The yeomen of the place and a few Scotch
fencibles
,
forming the whole military force stationed
there, took refuge from the people, in Lord
Antrim's
Castle. No bloodshed, as far as I can learn,
took place, and on hearing this morning of the
defeat
at Antrim, the United men thought proper,
spontaneously to disperse. Howley pretending great
fear of assassination, obtained from the commander
of the yeomanry a guard of twelve men, who
escorted
him home; and these men, whom from either
excess or affectation of fear, he has kept as
sentinels
about his house, are those you encountered.
Then M`Cracken is, indeed, among his
enemies
!
said O'Halloran, with a sigh.
Towards the evening he was informed that
M`Cracken had been sent forward to
Carrickfergus
,
to be imprisoned in the county jail. Blair
had gone himself to O'Halloran castle to inform
Mrs. Brown and Ellen of the place of his
concealment
.
In the evening, therefore, his sister visited
him, the distance being little more than two miles.
She told him that Ellen was in a state of dreadful
anxiety for his safety; and that it was with great
persuasion she was prevented from accompanying
her to see him, being prevailed on to stay behind
only from the consideration that her visit might
excite suspicion, and lead to a discovery of his
retreat
.
The Recluse has been our only comforter,
continued Mrs. Brown. He is a worthy, and a
wise man; and has visited us frequently since you
left us. When we proposed the Point Rock as the
place of your concealment, `No,' said he, `Sir
Geoffrey is acquainted with it, and it will
unquestionably
be searched before many days.' He then
mentioned that he had an apartment in his
subterraneous
dwelling, in which he thinks you might
be comfortably and safely concealed until a vessel
can be provided to convey you to Scotland.
That meets my own views exactly, said
O'Halloran. In this country I never can be safe,
and breathe the air in freedom. To Scotland I
shall go, and thence, if the government still
pursues
me, I can find a ready passage to America.
As the vicinity of Howley, who with his twelve
yeomen had become very active in hunting after
the proscribed rebels, was considered peculiarly
dangerous, with Blair's assistance, O'Halloran was
that very night conveyed in safety to the Recluse's
dwelling. His astonishment at the
accommodations
it afforded, and the furniture it contained,
were strongly expressed; but the Recluse soon
explained
the matter.
It is now no time, said he, to be mysterious
or reserved with you. I am not the poor destitute
Sanders you have hitherto supposed me to be. I
am your son-in-law, Francis Hamilton. I make
the explanation now that you may know how much
I am interested in your safety, and to satisfy you
that, should your affairs take the worst possible
turn, she, for whom you have hitherto displayed
the tenderness and solicitude of a father, will not
want a protector. It is true, I cannot as yet
publicly
acknowledge her as my daughter. The
vengeance
of the disappointed Sir Geoffrey, armed
with the power of those laws I was so unfortunate
as to offend, would be let loose without mercy upon
me. But I can reside near her. I can watch over her,
and render her all the effectual advice and
assistance
,
that I could, if I enjoyed the privileges of an
unoffending subject.
At this moment Ellen entered. Oh! my
grandfather
!
she exclaimed, as she rushed into his arms.
God be praised, you are safe!
Yes, my child, I am yet safe, he replied, but
how long I shall be so, God only knows. I have
no doubt that I have much persecution to suffer; for
my enemies are inveterate, and will not be at rest
until they effect my destruction. But, my
daughter
,
whatever may now be my lot, I can bear it
with resignation, since I shall not leave you
destitute
of parental protection. Your father has
revealed
himself to me; and I feel now that death
has lost its sharpest sting. The hand of fate
cannot
now be so grievous, fall upon me in what
manner
it may. Very different are now my feelings
and views respecting death from what they were
when I left Donegore hill. Then, I could have
braved that king of terrors as a soldier; now I can
submit to his summons as a christian, who
considers
it as an invitation to a better country. He
then strained her to his bosom, and kissing her
with parental affection, May the God of Heaven
bless thee, he added, and never leave thee
destitute
of a friend as sincerely solicitous for thy
welfare as thy grandfather!
CHAP. VIII.
With speed the furious troopers come,
In hopes to catch our chief at home;
But his more kindly stars prevail;
Hence they in dreadful wrath assail;
Doors, windows, closets, ceilings, walls;
And many a stately chimney falls.
But as for plunder there is not
An article that's worth a groat:
For which their raging leader frets,
And wreaks his vengeance on the cats.
Major Trip
.
Ellen
left her grandfather with her mind much
relieved of its anxiety, but still labouring under
the oppression of foreboding fears. The Recluse
accompanied her to the castle. As it was a fine
moonlight night, and as O'Halloran had retired to
rest, he indulged himself, on his return to the glen,
in a walk along the beach, to contemplate the
great scenery of nature, and lose in the sublime
feeling of its immensity and magnificence, the sense
of all his earthly cares and sorrows.
There was a perfect stillness in the air; not a
leaf moved in the groves, nor a wave swelled on the
sleeping waters. He looked to heaven, and beheld
the vast extent of that space through which the
moon seemed scarcely to move; he looked on that
boundless expanse of ocean which commenced at
his feet, and the greatness of Creation's Architect
rushed forcibly upon his mind; and he could not
help exclaiming in the words of inspiration, Ah!
what is man, that thou shouldst think of him? or
the son of man, that thou shouldst regard him?
and applying the thought to his own situation and
feelings, he continued:
What am I, or my friends? what are their
sufferings
or mine, that we should repine at them?
An insect is trodden to death; it is of no
consequence
.
Man also dies; of what importance is it?
Short, indeed, are the insect's joys and sorrows;
and of what duration are those of men, in the eyes
of immortal beings to whom a thousand years are
but a day? But man is also immortal; and the
time will come when he shall wonder that he
considered
the pains or pleasures of this transitory
existence worth a sigh of sorrow or a throb of
exultation
.
He was here interrupted by the appearance of
a tall figure, coming along the beach, towards him.
He looked at it for a moment with some surprise;
and then proceeded to meet it, although, with all
his philosophy, he was somewhat disconcerted;
for it was a late hour, and he could not conceive
why any single human being should be traversing
there, at such a time. He stopped; but the figure
continued to approach, although slowly. He now
placed his back against a rock, the better to
defend
himself against the attack of some nocturnal
marauder, or, if the object were really
preternatural
,
to support himself during the interview which
it evidently sought with him. At last it approached
near enough to speak; and he at once recognised
the voice and person of Peg Dornan.
I hae been watching for you said she, in
the glen for mair than half an hoor. I'm just come
wi' a' the speed my legs could carry me frae
Larne to tell you, gin you ken if Mr. O'Halloran
be here, or near han' this place, ye maun gar him
get aff before the mornin', for Claverill's dragoons,
wi' Sir Geoffrey at their head, will be here, an'
they will herry up every pit and cave, an' hole
an' neuk, to come at him; an' mair than that,
Ellen
maun also be ta'en oot o' the way, for Sir
Geoffrey swears that he'll hae her noo, in spite o'
a' the crappies in the country.
How did you obtain this intelligence?
inquired
the Recluse.
Why, sir, I went yesterday to the toon for
news o' the folk that had come hame frae
Donegore
.
Ye ken my sin Jock was there. I was
smoking
a blast, an' talking wi' him, quite blithe to see
him, an' a' the lave hame again safe an' pardoned.
Weel, thinks I, they're no' sic ill bodies, thae
government
folk, after a', gin yin tak's the richt way
o' them. When, `what's that? mither,' quoth Jock;
an' we baith ran to the door, an' saw the dragoons
galloping doon the street wi' their drawn swords
in their hands, till the very fire flew oot o' the
pavement. They went to the schoolmaster's hoose;
but he had cannily gi'en then the slip.
Howsomever
they set to wark, hacking an' hewin', an in
a crack wrecked his hoose, an' ruined a' his guid
plenishin', an' books, an' 'mathical instruments.
Then, in less time than you could say Jack
Robinson
,
they galloped to baith the ministers, an' took
them an' thirteen or fourteen ithers prisoners.
They had na' gane to the hill; so you see the hill
folk, wha had the maist spirit, hae come the best aff.
Nae doobt the prisoners will be a' hanged, or shot,
whilk is amaist as bad.
But tell me, Peg, said the Recluse, what
you heard concerning O'Halloran?
Why, that's what I'm comin' to, she replied.
The dragoons cam' to the barracks wi' their
prisoners
;
an' I followed doon to see them, an' I sune
observed Claverill, an' Howley, an' Sir Geoffrey,
talking together in a corner o' the yard. Thinks
I, they're hatching some mischief; but deel be in
my lugs, gin a dinna find it oot, an' gie warnin' o't.
I cannily slipt ahint a door near whare they were
standin', an' heard every word they said, for I was
na' three feet frae them. They were plotting to
catch Mr. O'Halloran in his castle the morn; or
gin he should na be found there, to rummage the
hale neighbourhood till they gat him. Sir
Geoffrey
tauld them that gin he were within five miles
of the place he could ferret him oot, for there's no'
a creek or cranny about the castle, where a cat
could hide, but he said he was acquainted wi'nor
is there a den or cave in the neighbourhood but
either Berwick or he could lead to it. `There's
yin,' said he, `where the scoundrel kept me a
prisoner twa or three weeks, which we maun search
thoroughly; and if he is no' found there, we maun
ransack, to its foundation, the cell o' an auld
hypocritical
beggar, wha lives like a hermit. But the
girl, captain, we maun hae her secured; and you
know whenever you want a magistrate to help you
oot o' a scrape, I am at your command.
May Heaven disappoint their wickedness,
said the Recluse. But, Peg, we have no time to
lose. I must go immediately to acquaint
O'Halloran
with his danger. In the meantime, tell Jemmy
Hunter to be at my cell in half an hour; but you
need not mention for what purpose, for there are
more ears in the world than we think of when we
are telling secrets.
Peg proceeded to obey his directions, which she
did very discreetly.
What want you? Peg, demanded Jemmy, after
she had bawled several times through the window to
him to arise. Auld Sanders wants you fast, she
replied; he's in a pinch, an' ye maun help him.
Jemmy required no more solicitation, and in a
short time, he was at the cavern. The Recluse
soon informed him of O'Halloran's danger, and
required
that he should assist in getting him off without
delay. With his usual alacrity, Jemmy consented;
observing,
You maunna tak' him farther frae the coast, for
there are parties o' yeomen parading aboot and
searching the hale country.
Hasten then to the gully, said the Recluse,
where the pleasure boat lies, and have it ready.
O'Halloran and I shall follow you in a few
minutes
.
While Peg had been gone for Hunter,
O'Halloran
and the Recluse aware of the danger of
removing
farther into the interior, on account of the
numerous scouting parties of military with which
it was overrun, concerted the plan of retiring to
Island Magee, the inhabitants of which were well
disposed to the insurgent cause. To reach this
island, or more properly, peninsula, they had only
about three miles to sail across the bay which
forms the entrance of Larne harbour, a task which
would require them no long time to accomplish.
O'Halloran was landed without accident at
Brown's Bay on the peninsula, and was kindly
received
by a warm friend of the name of Barry,
who immediately assigned a private apartment for
his use. In less than two hours from their setting
out, the Recluse and Hunter returned, and having,
with Peg's assistance, removed out of the cavern
whatever could excite suspicion of its inhabitant
being any thing else than he seemed, to the
beach, the whole was there safely buried in the
sand.
How to dispose of Ellen was the next
consideration
.
As the leader of the dragoons could have
no legal, or in any respect, justifiable plea for
seizing her, all that was thought necessary for her
protection, was to convey her and her aunt to the
house of a Mr. Wilson, a neighbouring gentleman
Vol. ii. g
of an honourable and humane character, attached
to the government; but who had not interfered
with the political transactions of the times. This
gentleman received them with great kindness, and
when informed of the threatened depredation on
the castle, he was shocked at its wantonness and
barbarity, and ordered his servants to assist those
of O'Halloran in removing to his house all the
furniture
and other articles of value they should have
time to bring away.
De'il a hait they'll get noo, said Jemmy
Hunter
,
who, in company with a number of his
neighbours
,
had also assisted in the transportation of
O'Halloran's goods to a place of safety, as he
finished loading the last cart. De'il a hait they'll
get noo, but the stane wa's, gin they should rage
their sauls oot; an' they may owreset them if they
please, though it would be a pity too to see the
douce auld biggin battered to the yearth.
The Recluse had also taken care to have the
horses, cattle, and almost every valuable kind of
stock removed from the demesne, rightly judging
that between the affected zeal of Howley, the
inveterate
revenge of Sir Geoffrey, and the wanton
brutality of Claverill, nothing belonging to
O'Halloran
,
on which it would be worth while to
exhibit
resentment, would escape destruction or pillage.
At length, about nine o'clock in the morning, the
glittering armour of the cavalry was seen by many
an anxious spectator, glancing in the sun, as the
troops gained the summit of a rising ground about
a mile and a half distant. The cavalry then with
a quickened pace rode down the descending road,
until they again disappeared. In a few minutes
they ascended the last hill which obstructed their
view of the castle; then continuing on at full speed,
they halted not until they arrived at its gate.
Let two men guard every out-let, said
Claverill
.
This being done, the whole troop, to the
number of forty, occupied the yard. Not a sound
but such as was made by themselves had they yet
heard.
Why, all is as quiet here as in a desart, said
Claverill. I believe, in my soul, that the people
within, care no more about our visit, than if we
were a drove of sheep. Sergeant Duff! advance
with twelve men, force your entrance, and seize
the rebel if he is to be found in the inside of these
walls.
A thick massive door was thrown open by Duff's
men without resistance; and they proceeded with
drawn sabres through a large square hall, from
whence they ascended a long flight of stone stairs,
which winded to the top of the castle, interrupted
only by a landing place at each floor. At the
first landing place, they divided, part entering a
long passage communicating on each side with a
range of apartments, while the remainder
continued
their ascent. But every where all was silence,
emptiness, and desolation. At the suggestion of Sir
Geoffrey, another party of six men was sent
beneath
to explore the cellars, while, with Berwick,
and several others of his own servants, the knight
followed the ascending party for the purpose of
seizing and carrying off Ellen.
In vain did he penetrate into every chamber and
closet. No animated thing belonging to the castle
was perceived by any of them, until the first
ascending party had reached the garret, when two
cats leaped from under an old bench, that had not
been thought worth removing. One of them
running
across the steps of a dragoon, he stumbled,
and fell with a great shock, and a greater oath;
while the cat whose leg he had broken, gave at
the same time a tremendous squall, which
alarmed
Howley, who was advancing behind, and who
conceiving the noise to be occasioned by some
persons
making resistance, shouted:
Damn the rebels! kill every soul of them!
Immediately a dragoon with one stroke cut off
the cat's head, roaring out at the same time: By
Gd! sir, the other has escaped!
Claverill at this moment coming to the top of
the stairs, and labouring under the same mistake
as Howley, who had kept back from fear, cried
out,
You damn'd villain, you must find him then.
By the Lord, exclaimed one of the dragoons,
he has jumped out of the window, and is now, I
suppose, fast sticking on the top of the roof.
Run down, Andrews, cried the Captain, who
was convinced that none but O'Halloran himself
could have taken such a desperate step, run to
the out side, and order him down, or blow his
brains out. I'll give a guinea for his head.
Yes, your honour, said Andrews, I'll fix
him.
Down he ran, and seeing the poor cat perched
on one corner of the roof, took so good an aim that
he sent a bullet through its body. It instantly
rolled down to the no small diversion of his
barbarous
companions.
That shot is worth a guinea, said Andrews,
and with his sabre severing the head from the body,
he hastened in to claim his reward.
By this time Claverill was apprized of his
mistake
;
and he felt horribly chagrined, when, as the
cat's head was presented to him, and the promised
guinea demanded, the whole party burst into an
incontrollable fit of laughter.
Damned villains! cried he, whom do you
laugh at? But it was your confounded stupidity,
Howley, in mistaking cats for rebels.
My guinea, your honour! said Andrews,
putting
his hand to his cap.
Begone, scoundrel! cried Claverill, no more
impertinence here with your damned cats.
The story may be here interrupted for a
moment
,
to state that while Claverill remained in that
part of the country, he was known by no other
name than that of the Cat's Head; and to this
day, it continues proverbial in the neighbourhood,
to say of a man who makes a ridiculous mistake,
or a blundering bargain, that he has given a
guinea for a cat's head.
Irritated by this incident, and full of impatience
at not having met with his prey, Claverill ordered
the floors to be torn up, and the ceilings, petitions
and wainscottings to be demolished, lest
peradventure
they might conceal a rebel. This work of
destruction was vigorously commenced, and forty
men boiling with resentment, because they were
disappointed in their high flown expectations of
rich plunder, soon completed it. Having satisfied
themselves that there was no human being
secreted
in the castle, they proceeded to the out houses.
If there be any persons in these, said
Claverill
,
we shall make speedy work of them; the
flames shall drive them out.
In a few minutes the whole range of the stables,
cow-houses, barns, coach-houses, &c. were in one
broad sheet of conflagration, to the great horror
and consternation of hundreds of spectators, who
from a distance beheld the scene.
Not a man, woman, or child said Howley, to
sergeant Duff, is to be found on these premises.
No, by Heavens! replied Duff, and what is
worse, there is not so much as an old trencher to
be plundered.
Having left this stately building, and all its
offices
,
a complete wreck, the magnanimous party
Vol. II. G 2
proceeded, under the guidance of Sir Geoffrey, to
the Point cave, the scene of his late imprisonment.
As, however, he was not acquainted with the
secret of its entrance, a circumstance to which he
had not before adverted, he went repeatedly round
and over the rock, examining it in all directions,
but to no purpose.
What, exclaimed Claverill, losing all patience,
am I to be fooled here also? What a wise set of
companions I have got? One mistakes cats for
rebels; and another solid rocks for prisons. Damn
such stupidity!
Sir Geoffrey insisted that the rock before them
was hollow, and contained two or three
apartments
,
appealing to Berwick as corroborative
testimony
.
Confound his testimony, cried Claverill.
Have you not told me already that he will swear
whatever you bid him.
Berwick, whose confinement in the rock had not
been so rigid as his master's, had, once or twice,
during its continuance, been permitted to walk, for
exercise, along the beach, in company with a
sentinel
,
and therefore had some faint knowledge of
the machinery by which the entrance was opened
and shut. He knew that the end of some rope or
chain must be pulled on the outside, but where to
find it he could not at once discover. At last he
recollected that the sentinel always ascended to a
particular prominence in the rock, previous to
opening
it, when they were to enter. He accordingly
soon discovered the ring, and the party obtained
admittance.
Here they found some books, a large file of
newspapers, and a great many of the official papers
of the United Irishmen, which they eagerly seized
as a prize to be forwarded to the government.
We have at last discovered the rebels' den,
said Claverill, but the beasts are flown.
We may yet find some of them, not far
distant
,
replied Sir Geoffrey. They were afraid,
I suppose, that as I knew of this place, I should
lead you to it, and have therefore avoided it. But
Berwick is acquainted with another cavity in the
neighbourhood, which they may imagine to be a
less suspicious refuge.
Lead on then, said Claverill, for there is
nothing more to be got here.
The squadron now proceeded to the Recluse's
cell, a knowledge of which Berwick had
acquired
,
when skulking in the neighbourhood, for an
opportunity to carry off Ellen. There was no
obstruction
to their entrance, for the Recluse
himself
conducted them in, in order, that whatever
suspicion they might have of his being accessary
to the concealment of O'Halloran, might be
removed
.
My old buck! said Claverill, have you any
rebels within?
No, Sir; I never approved of rebellion.
So far you were right, old hypocrite! but we
cannot take your word for it.
Enter then, and be satisfied, although, I
believe
,
that to utter a falsehood would be as
grievous
to me in these rags as if I wore epaulets.
You are a saucy dog, said the captain; but
lead us in, and be thankful that we do not blanket
your old bones.
The old man led them through his cell, and
without reserve showed them every thing it
contained
.
All these are but little worth, said he, but
an old man like me requires little.
None of your preaching! cried Claverill, we
shall search and begone.
They then raised the flooring, and drove their
sabres into the roof and sides of the cave to
ascertain
whether there was a vacuity in which any
person might be secreted. At length, finding that
it was all vain labour, they withdrew; Claverill
exclaimingCome along, boys, out of this
damned
hole. The five hundred pounds set on the old
rebel's head will not, I perceive, be found here.
The party started away at full speed, their
commander
grumbling that he was both hungry and
thirsty, not having obtained so much as a glass of
whiskey on this unprofitable expedition.
CHAP. IX.
The hunted chief at length is found,
And in a loathsome prison bound;
Where his fierce foes with hearts elate,
Exult in his approaching fate.
But many a thousand hearts deplore,
As he already were no more.
From friendship's breast burst frequent sighs;
And tears flow fast from beauty's eyes.
Irish Soothsayer
.
But
while these riotous troops were cursing
their ill luck, in not meeting with the proscribed
chief, that unfortunate man was already in the
hands of his enemies. We have mentioned his
removal
to the house of one Barry, in Island Magee,
where his friends supposed that he was perfectly
secure. But fate had ordered it otherwise, although
neither the instrumentality nor the wishes of his
entertainer, were to blame in the affair.
As the inhabitants of the Island Magee had been
deeply implicated in the rebellion, and as it was
expected that many of the proscribed insurgents
would seek concealment among them, for the
convenience
of getting off to another country, the
commander
of the garrison at Carrickfergus had sent
a company of infantry to be quartered on them,
for the purpose of detecting any such fugitives.
As this company had only arrived the day
previous
to O'Halloran's taking refuge on the Island,
its presence there was unknown both to him and
his friends. From an expression of Claverill on
leaving the Recluse's cell, the reader will have
gathered, that government had offered a reward of
five hundred pounds for his apprehension. This
sum was to be paid to his captors; and to the
person
who should give such information as would
lead to his capture, whether dead or alive, an
equal reward was promised. This was enough to
excite the cupidity of a certain
tide-waiter
, named
Conly, a young fellow, who was on a nocturnal
visit of courtship to one of Barry's maid servants,
and was concealed in her chamber, at the very
time O'Halloran arrived. The apartment allotted
to him adjoined this chamber. Through a chink
in the partition the gallant discovered who this
unseasonable
visiter was. From that moment avarice
predominated over love in his bosom, and he
resolved
to lose no time in earning the five
hundred
pounds. He accordingly the next morning,
gave his information to the commander of the
troops on the Island, in consequence of which
Barry's house was soon surrounded by about fifty
soldiers.
O'Halloran was demanded. He was denied to
be present. But the doors were soon burst open,
and the soldiers, conducted by the informer,
entered
,
without stopping, the very room in which the
object of their search was secreted. With great
delicacy captain Dougal, their officer, exonerated
Barry from the infamy of having betrayed him;
and declared explicitly from whom he had
received
the information. O'Halloran was conveyed on
horseback to the county jail, in company with the
informer, for that wretch knew that unless he were
so protected, his life would be sacrificed to the
vengeance of the defeated party.
When intelligence of O'Halloran's capture
reached
Larne, the disappointed Claverill was about
setting off with the prisoners he had there seized,
being seventeen in number, for Carrickfergus. On
reaching the village of Ballycarry, Sir Geoffrey,
who accompanied him, perceiving a lad of fourteen
years of age, named Nelson, who has already been
introduced into this work, and immediately
remembering
the injury he had done the lad's family,
and their consequent antipathy to him, and also
recalling to mind the attempt to assassinate him, in
which he considered Nelson to have been
concerned
,
although it was the lad's premature exclamation
which gave him the alarm by which he avoided
his fate, he determined on revenge.
Seize you young fellow, said he to Claverill;
he lately attempted to murder me, and I have
besides sufficient proof against him for being an
active promoter of the rebellion.
Orders were accordingly given, and Nelson was
seized and bound, and conveyed with the other
captives to prison.
It was towards the evening, when the Recluse
heard of O'Halloran's misfortune. He felt the
stroke severely; but he was not one of those whom
grief deprives of energy. Now was the time for
serviceable action; and he would not waste it in
useless lamentation. He immediately sat down and
wrote as follows to Edward Barrymore:
The crisis is at last arrived. The long
anticipated
calamity, to secure your co-operation in
preventing
which, from falling too heavily on us, I was
first induced to solicit your confidence and
friendship
.
O'Halloran has this day been imprisoned for
treasonable offences, alas! too notorious to be
difficult
of proof. His sentence is already certain. A
court martial at Carrickfergus will, perhaps, in a
few days, pronounce it. No time is to be lost in
exerting your influence to save him, and should
you be successful in your application for mercy,
equal expedition is requisite in making the result
known, for much time, we may be assured, will
not intervene between the pronouncing of the
sentence
and its execution.
I send this, both for the sake of speed and
certainty
,
with an extraordinary but faithful courier,
whose zeal will outrun the post, and whose
profession
will obviate the interference of suspicion to
occasion obstruction or delay.
I am too much agitated to give you particulars,
or to make comments, even if time permitted. I
know not whether Ellen has yet received
information
of the disaster. I dread the effect it will have
on her, and must hasten to her support.
The courier being despatched with the
necessary
instructions, the Recluse hastened to Mr.
Wilson's
.
The family had heard a report of
O'Halloran's
capture, but not being certain of its truth, they
had not communicated it to Ellen or Mrs. Brown.
The Recluse, whose real character was unknown
to Mr. Wilson, entered in his hermit's habit. Ellen
had seen him coming round the house, and ran to
meet him. She led him into a chamber. Have you
yet heard from my grandfather? she inquired, at
the same time ejaculating, What a providential
escape he has had!
My child (he replied,) I have heard from
him, and I fear he is not yet secure from his
enemies
;
but I have hopes that even if he were in their
power he might be saved. He has many
influential
friends.
If he were in their power said she, I should
have no hope. He has been too conspicuously
active
against them. They thirst for his blood, and
will not be satisfied without it.
Child he returned, it is your duty not to
distrust Providence. Even if the worst should
take place, it is the will of him who disposes of all
events, and we should submit without
complaining
.
I trust I should submit even to his death
without
complaining, she replied; but I should not
do it without feeling.
Well then, my child, be resolute and
resigned
,
for I fear that he is in danger. The place
of his concealment has been discovered.
Tell me, tell me all, she exclaimed, the truth
flashing on her mind, more from his manner than
his wordsIs he in their hands?
Not in the hands of his worst enemies, thank
God. No Sir Geoffrey nor Claverill has captured
him. Their malignant rancour and cruelty might
have made short work of it.
But he is taken, tell me plainlyhe is taken?
cried Ellen, interrupting her father and catching
him by the hand.
He paused to make a reply. Ah! it is over,
then, she exclaimed; and bursting into tears, she
gave vent to the fulness of her grief without
uttering
a word for some minutes. She then lifted her
swimming eyes towards Heaven, and spoke; Alas!
they will drag him to a violent death! Oh! God!
support him in that last trial!
Compose yourself my child, said her father,
if you would not inflict infinitely more agony on
my heart, than it at present bears!
I will try to be composed, she answered. It
is God's will, and I must submit. But where have
they taken him? I shall go to him; I will soothe,
I will comfort him. Ah! greatly now will he need
a comforter; nor will I leave him, when doomed to
die, until his soul be no longer an inhabitant of
earth. Ah! his poor sister! what will become of
her? He was her stay, and her pride. I will now
see her and let her know her misfortune.
It is right, said the Recluse, that she should
know it. But remain here; I will bring her to
you. You will support each other.
Vol. II. H
It now occurred to the Recluse that Mrs. Brown
was as yet ignorant of his relationship to Ellen,
and that she would now require a friend to look up
to for support in her affliction, over whom there
should be no mystery, and in whom she could
without
reserve repose confidence. He therefore
authorized
his daughter to embrace the first
opportunity
that should offer of revealing his secret to
her aunt, well knowing that it would be safe in
her keeping. He then communicated to the old
lady her niece's wish to see her. She followed
him into her presence. On seeing Ellen in tears,
Alas! I perceive there is bad news, said she.
Your resolution, my dear aunt! replied Ellen,
is stronger than mine; and I hope you will bear
with more christian calmness, the misfortunes of
a brother, than I can of such a parent.
What then, is my brother no more? she
exclaimed
.
He is still alive, said Ellen, and, perhaps,
his cause may not be so hopeless as we imagine.
But he is a prisoner in the power of his enemies;
and, alas! there is much to dread.
This is, indeed, a heavy stroke, said Mrs.
Brown, bursting into tears, but I have been long
preparing for it; and am not taken by surprise.
Oh, my child! here she clasped Ellen round the
neck.This indeed requires fortitude to bear.
But dry up your tears. God will not desert us
under this stroke. He will not leave us destitute!
Oh my brother! he was indeed a kind brother; but
I knew we must separate sometime. The Almighty
alone regulates the time, and the manner of
separation
.
It is our part to submit; we may grieve, but
we must not repine.
Mrs. Wilson, who had received a confirmation
of the report, now came to condole with her guests,
and the Recluse took his leave. During the
evening
,
Ellen had an opportunity of communicating
his secret to her aunt.
I rejoice, said the latter, that your father
lives; but it adds to my anxiety to know that he
lives in a land of danger.
But, returned Ellen, startled at the idea, he
is safe, I hope, in his concealment.
I hope so, child, said her aunt, but we must
speak on this subject with caution, as there are too
many who would be tempted by the reward offered
for his apprehension, to betray him.
Ellen's fears now took the alarm. She put her
finger to her lips in token of silence; and felt as if
she feared that her very thoughts would expose
her father to danger.
CHAP. X.
Rude scoundrel, dare you so insult that maiden!
Your coward frame, I'll trample to the boards
On which you stand; and prisoner as I am,
By Heaven! I will avenge her, villain!
Feel that, and let your ruffian spirit tremble.
M`Carrocher
.
Accompanied
by Mr. Wilson, Jemmy Hunter and
two servants, Ellen and her aunt proceeded the
next morning to visit O'Halloran. When they
reached Carrickfergus, they were shocked at the
multitude of prisoners with which it was crowded,
the number of whom was every hour augmenting.
The county jail was filled almost to suffocation,
and it had become necessary for the military
commanders
,
whose will now superseded all law, to
appropriate not only the jail belonging to the town
of Carrickfergus, which is a county in itself, but
also to convert the fortress into a prison.
O'Halloran
was confined in the county of Antrim jail, in
an apartment about twelve feet square, in which he
had for companions in captivity, five of the
prisoners
from Larne, two of whom were presbyterian
clergymen, and young Nelson.
On the application of Mr. Wilson to the
commander
of the garrison, O'Halloran's friends
procured
an order for admission into his apartment
during certain hours in the day, although such an
indulgence was generally denied to the friends of
the prisoners, on account of their being so very
numerous. Ellen, who had never before been
within the walls of a jail, was much shocked at the
mixture of corruption, wretchedness, and
wickedness
which she now witnessed. She was
accompanied
only by her aunt and Mr. Wilson, Hunter
and the servant not being included in their order
for admission.
On passing the outer gate, they found the yard
into which it led, filled with soldiers, whose
profane
oaths and coarse jests, uttered with indelicate
broadness, together with their familiar and
impertinent
looks, so intimidated Ellen, that had she not
been supported by Mr. Wilson, she would have
sunk under the impression, before she could have
reached the flight of stone stairs which led to the
principal door of the prison. Here they were
shown into a long narrow gallery, at the further
end of which, on the left side, was the room which
contained O'Halloran and his fellow prisoners.
The room contained no other furniture than one
bed, one small table, and a few chairs, all of the
most indifferent quality. O'Halloran and the two
clergymen sat on the bed, and the other prisoners
on chairs. They were all pinioned.
As soon as Ellen perceived her grandfather, she
rushed forward, and falling on his neck, without
speaking a word, burst into tears. His sister at the
same time caught one of his hands, and ejaculating,
Oh my brother! wept also.
He entreated them to be resigned, as he assured
them he was, to whatever fate was in reserve for
him. For my sake, said he, endeavour to be
courageous on this occasion; for I know of
nothing
that will tend so much to shake my fortitude
as witnessing your distress.
With the help of God, replied his sister, we
will be resigned. But, oh, Henry! this a terrible
blowtoo terrible for the infirmity of our nature to
bear, without grief, heart-rending grief.
Vol. II. H 2
At this moment, Claverill and Sir Geoffrey
entered
the room. When Ellen and her friends
crossed the jail yard, Sir Geoffrey, who was
conversing
with Claverill and some other officers at a
small distance from the gate, had observed them,
and although he knew that the publicity of the
place and the company that attended her,
rendered
it impossible for him to attempt any outrage on
her person, he could not resist the desire he felt to
follow her. An opportunity to be again in her
presence, although it should be as an avowed
enemy
,
was to him too great a luxury to be neglected.
He, therefore, took Claverill aside; and desired
him to accompany him into jail, and he would
there shew him the only woman he ever
considered
a perfect beauty. And you know, said he,
that I ought to be a judge of this matter, for I
have been a pretty general admirer of the sex.
This is the lady, I suppose, replied Claverill,
whom you expected to capture at the old castle
yesterday; but, by Jupiter, she had better fortune;
and I am glad of it, although her granddad is a
rebel. But come along; I must see this beauty
of the North. Yet, hark ye! you may blackguard
and threaten the other sex as you please; but to
ladies, especially handsome ones, he is unworthy of
wearing breeches, who would give an insult, and
of wearing a sword, damn me! who would tamely
see one given. Here he strutted big, and
attempted
to look very fierce. It must not be supposed,
that this ruffian officer spoke these sentiments from
any generous feeling towards the sex, or that he
felt the least spark of that manly courage, the
appearance
of which he assumed; for in real danger,
his conduct disgraced the king's livery; he was a
mere paltroon. But like most other cowards, he
was a perpetual and arrogant boaster wherever he
had nothing to fear. He had, besides, more
penetration
than Sir Geoffrey; and knew that the surest
mode of preserving that ascendancy which he had
acquired over the redoubted knight, was to keep
him in awe, by making him believe that he
had to deal with a man of a very irritable and
daring temper. He, therefore, frequently affected
to be in a violent passion with his companion,
when he only wished to terrify him into his
purposes
,
or to perplex him for his diversion. He
knew that Sir Geoffrey would not dare to resent this
conduct; for, besides his effeminacy and natural
cowardice, he held him in complete check by
being
the confident of many of his villanies, and by
threatening, if ever he offended him, to expose
them to the world. Sir Geoffrey was particularly
afraid that in some angry humour, he would
disclose
the offer he had made him, when soliciting
his assistance to seize Ellen, to prostitute his
authority
as a magistrate to his views, and to procure
the testimony of Berwick and Rogers in support of
any charge he might wish to substantiate against
any of his enemies.
On the other hand, Sir Geoffrey felt great
mortification
,
and sometimes even displayed
considerable
impatience, under the domineering controul of
his military confederate; but he was destitute of
sufficient energy to break the shackles which bound
him to submission. He, therefore, viewed
Claverill
as a hateful tormentor, with whose caprices and
humours necessity at present obliged him to
comply
.
Thus, as is uniformly the case with vicious
friends, Claverill utterly despised his friend Sir
Geoffrey, while Sir Geoffrey was in perpetual
terror
of his friend Claverill. On entering the room in
which O'Halloran was confined, they found Ellen
still weeping on his shoulder; and Mrs. Brown
holding
his right hand, in all the agony of affectionate
distress.
'Fore Gad, Sir, cried Claverill, addressing the
prisoner, I see you have got an addition to your
company, and a damned agreeable one too. But
I think, my old Donegore general, you would be
better employed in psalm-singing, or in
prayer-making
,
than in fondling this pretty girl, now when
you are on the brink of hell; for you have a
damnable
account of rebellious sins to answer for when
you get there.
I am bound, said O'Halloran, looking
contemptuously
on him, otherwise, captive as I am,
you dared not insult me or my grand child, in so
wanton a manner.
Hey day! You would still be a hero, I
perceive
,
returned ClaverillI like to see so much
metal in your gizzard, although, my old cock, we'll
try to get it out of you in a few days by breaking
your neck. Nugent, after he has hanged your
eropped-eared
comrades in Belfast, will be here, the
day after to-morrow, and then we'll make short
work of you. As to you, turning to the
Clergymen
my
pious parsons, you should exhort this
old rebel to restrain his temper, for his soul's
sake.
One of the clergymen, who was a man of spirit,
replied, Sir, over misfortune you may play the
coward's part of triumphing, when you can do it
with impunity. But do you suppose your general,
of whom you have just spoken so insolently, will
tolerate your unmanly conduct? Will he not, when
we inform him of it, make you repent your
having
By Heavens! exclaimed Claverill,
interrupting
him. I'd have you repent this audacity
among your other crimes, as soon as possible. So
to your psalm-singing, while you have breath, or
the halter will soon choke your music. Come, Sir
Geoffrey, let us leave the rascals. But first let us
salute the ladies, by way of amends for the
leetures
we have received. Kiss you the old dame,
and I'll kiss the young one. By Heaven! said
he, gazing licentiously at Ellen, I must taste those
rosy lips. It will be so sweet after such
unpalatable
lectures!
So saying he seized her round the waist, when
O'Halloran, by a violent effort, broke the cord
which tied his arms, and unexpectedly struck him
a blow which laid him senseless on the floor.
By Jove! it was well done, said M`Claverty,
who had just entered the moment before, and
unseen
by Claverill, had witnessed the rudeness he
had offered to Ellen. Had you not been before
hand with me, Mr. O'Halloran, I should myself
have knocked down the scoundrel.
Sir Geoffrey without waiting to ascertain which
side M`Claverty took, had hastened to alarm the
guard. M`Claverty suspecting his intention, after
assisting Mr. Wilson to disarm Claverill, and to
drag him out of the apartment, followed the knight,
and perceiving him leading a file of soldiers across
the yard, he desired the jailor to refuse them
admittance
.
He then returned to the apartment, and
receiving an accurate statement of the whole
transaction
from Wilson, he hastened to communicate
it to the commander of the garrison.
That officer said he was aware of the outrageous
disposition of Claverill, and would prevent him
from visiting the jail until these prisoners should
be disposed of.
But he may repeat his outrages on the ladies
in other places besides the jail, observed M`
Claverty
.
I shall let him know said the officer, that
they are under my protection, while they remain
in Carrickfergus; and that, if he insults them, it
shall be at his peril.
M`Claverty having obtained an order for the
guard not to interfere with what had taken place,
returned to the prison with intelligence of what he
had done. He then offered to accompany the
ladies to the inn, in order to show the military that
he would defend them from any unwarrantable
liberties. At the inn, he candidly told them that
he had little expectation of any favour being
extended
to the prisoners, none of them being entitled
to the conditions of the surrender at Donegore.
He added that the system of intimidation was still
persisted in by the Irish cabinet; and that it was
now more strictly enforced in consequence of the
excesses committed by the rebels in the South.
Letters were received yesterday, said he, from
the secretary's office, ordering speedy examples to
be made of the rebel leaders. In consequence of
which, M`Cracken, Porter, and one Story were to
be executed in Belfast. The court martial for the
trial of the prisoners here will commence its
sittings
the day after to-morrow. Who will be the
first to suffer, I cannot tell; but, ladies, he
continued
,
I trust you will keep up your spirits, and
not dishearten your unfortunate friends on this
trying
occasion. Perhaps it would be better for them
and you both that you should be absent from a
scene, the solemnity and horror of which, you may
not be able to support.
I wish indeed that Ellen would return home,
said Mrs. Brown. She is here exposed to
dangers
from which I am exempted. Besides her
inexperience
of affliction, will render her less
capable
of bearing its presence. For me, I must stay
to support and comfort my brother; and, I trust,
God will give me strength to do so until the last
scene shall be closed.
Ah! my aunt, replied Ellen, do you think I
have no experience in affliction? Did I not lose my
mother just when I began to know her value. Did
I suffer nothing from a man whose violence and
hatred we now all experience. And have I not for
a long time past been preparing my mind for the
approaching catastrophe? No; I cannot leave you
in this hour of tribulation. Desire me not to go;
and whatever I may feel, I shall endeavour to
confine
to my own breast. As to personal danger, the
friendship of these gentlemen, and the order of the
governor will, I should think, be ample protection
from any.
Well, said M`Claverty, if you will stay, I
shall take care, as much as lies in my power, to
provide for your safety. Mr. Wilson, I suppose,
will remain with you.
No consideration replied Mr. Wilson, will
induce me to part with them, while they desire to
remain; neither will I, in a matter which so nearly
concerns them, urge them to relinquish that desire.
You are perhaps right, said M`Claverty. In
the meantime, my friends, I must take my leave,
and may heaven support you through your
misfortunes
,
and grant us soon to see better times.
CHAP. XI.
The court convenes, the awful tribunal,
Which knows no statutes but its caprices.
Alas! for those whose breath of life dep ends,
On its decisions!
a few short throbs 'tis o'er!
The Court Martial
.
The
day for proceeding with the trials now
arrived
.
The martial tribunal was organized, and
assumed its functions, in the county court-house.
O'Halloran, and the prisoners who occupied the
same apartment with him, were the first ordered
to the bar, and the trial of young Nelson was the
first proceeded on, not so much to gratify his
accuser
,
Sir Geoffrey, as to prove to the other
prisoners
,
that, if one of his tender age could not be
spared, they had no room to expect mercy.
He was charged with joining others in an
attempt
to assassinate Sir Geoffrey Carebrow some
weeks previous to the insurrection; and also with
having, in the morning of the insurrection, in
company
with some other rebels, forced into the
dwelling
house of the said Sir Geoffrey, and seizing
certain of his male servants, compelled them, under
peril of their lives, to proceed in the rebel ranks,
to the encampment at Donegore.
The first charge was positively sworn to by Sir
Geoffrey himself, and the second by Tim Rogers,
his bailiff. No defence being made, he was
pronounced
guilty.
The president then addressed him, descanting
on the enormous character of his crimes.
Wickedness
,
said he, unfortunate boy, must be
engrained
in your very nature; since at such an
early age, it has broken out with so much ferocity.
In mercy to your country, you should be cut off;
for if your evil disposition were to increase with
your years, horrible indeed would be their effects
on society. Still we shall spare your life, on
condition
of your entering the army, where you will
be taught to behave better, if you inform us who
were your accomplices in the attempt to murder
Sir Geoffrey Carebrow, and who instigated you to
threaten and force his servants into the rebellion.
I never attempted to murder Sir Geoffrey,
said the boy, though I know who did. But I
will not tell you, for you would then take two lives
instead of one; for there were two of them; and I
should then be guilty of murder to save myself.
But I will not talk to you more, only to say that if
you should
cut me to inches
, I will not inform against
any one.
Every one present was struck with astonishment;
and not a few with admiration, at this resolute
answer
from one so young; and when the sentence
that he should the next day be taken to the house
of his mother, and should be hanged by the neck
until dead, in front thereof, was pronounced, a half
stifled murmur of indignation burst from the
spectators
,
and was perfectly audible over the whole
court. He was then remanded to prison, and
O'Halloran was put on his trial. His indictment
contained a variety of charges, the principal of
which wereThat in conjunction with a number
of other traitors, he had negotiated with the
enemies
of the country for the purpose of procuring
their assistance in overthrowing the established
government, and substituting another in its stead;
and that he had not only been active in seducing
numbers of the people from their allegiance, and
Vol. II. I
in administering to them treasonable oaths, but
had actually at the head of a numerous party of
his deluded followers, levied war against the king,
whereby the peace and tranquillity of the country
was, and still is, very much disturbed, to the great
destruction not only of the properties, but of the
lives of his majesty's loyal subjects, &c. &c.
Further
,
that he had in an illegal and felonious
manner
,
by the aid of his fellow conspirators, seized
and imprisoned certain of the peaceable and
unoffending
inhabitants of the country, for no other
cause than their having resisted his attempts to
seduce them into his traitorous association. And,
that he had, with his own hand, cruelly murdered
one of the officers of his majesty's army, for
attempting
,
in the discharge of his duty, to suppress
that rebellion which his wicked machinations had
so effectually contributed to excite in the country.
To prove these charges, Sir Geoffrey Carebrow,
Philip Berwick, and Anthony Burdolph, a private
soldier belonging to the regiment lately commanded
by the deceased colonel Lumly, were brought
forward
.
The first deposed, that he and the prisoner
were at one time on an intimate footing, during which
period the prisoner had made frequent attempts to
prevail on him to join the society of the United
Irishmen
;
that in consequence of his constant refusal to
do so, he had caused him, and one of his servants, to
be seized by some of that society, and imprisoned
in a cave near his (the prisoner's) habitation,
where they were confined until the breaking out
of the rebellion; when they were carried to the
rebel camp at Donegore, and regained their
liberty
only in consequence of the submission of the
rebels assembled there. That while in their
custody
,
he knew of various meetings between the
prisoner and some French emissaries taking place
in the cave in which he was confined, when they
freely conversed on the aid the conspirators were
to receive from France. That while he and the
prisoner were on a friendly footing, he had lent
the latter a large sum of money, without knowing
to what use it was intended to be applied; that, while
imprisoned in the cave, he discovered that it had
gone to purchase arms and ammunition for the
conspirators
;
and was informed that since he had
shown himself an enemy to the conspirators, he
should not receive payment. It was even told him,
that he might think himself fortunate, if he did not
lose his life as well as his money, for his enmity to
their cause.
Berwick's testimony was merely corroborative
of his master'sthat of Burdolph, the soldier, went
to prove that, on the seventh instant, near Antrim,
the prisoner, with a large broad-sword, struck the
deponent's commander, colonel Lumly, a blow
which knocked him off his horse; and in
consequence
of which he was found dead that same
evening
,
near the spot where he fell, with a terrible
fracture in his skull. This witness also swore that
he saw the prisoner very active that day, leading
on and encouraging the rebels to attack and
destroy
the king's troops, and that he fought more
with the fury of a lion than the consideration of a
man.
The evidence being closed, O'Halloran was
called
on for his defence.
Gentlemen, said he, as I know that my death
is already determined on, to address you for the
purpose of defending my life would be a mere
waste of words; but part of the testimony you have
heard, has gone further than merely to affect my
life, it has gone to affect my character as an honest
man. On this account, I should think it wrong to
let it pass without animadversion. I am also
anxious
that my country should be acquainted with
my real motives for taking so active and
conspicuous
a part in behalf of that cause for which I
am to suffer; for erroneous impressions on this
subject, impressions injurious to my reputation,
may go abroad, which I now conceive it my duty
to make some effort to prevent. Indeed, I
acknowledge
,
that at this moment, however little I may
be shaken by the terrors of death, I feel sensible
on the point of character; for, if in the full
enjoyment
of health, competence, and security, I have
often felt the pride of an unstained reputation; if I
then congratulated myself on the possession of a
character unslandered either in honour or morals,
and until this hour, I believe, that I have been in
this respect as fortunate as the majority of men,
now, when I am on the verge of eternity, I must,
and do feel that pride of character more intensely
than ever, and am really anxious to leave behind
me the good name that I have hitherto enjoyed. I
must, and shall, therefore, endeavour to rescue it
from the malicious misrepresentations of a false
witness.
I may here remark that I bear that witness no
ill-will for coming here to-day, to testify against my
political conduct, for, I am aware that had he not
done so, there are many others who could, and no
doubt would, have furnished you with enough of
information to justify you, according to your ideas
on the subject, in dooming me to destruction. But
it would, I believe, have been difficult to find any
other who would have voluntarily and
unnecessarily
impeached the integrity of my private
character
.
When that witness first succeeded in gaining
my confidence, I was a zealous United Irishmen.
I was so, because I considered it my duty to my
country, to join that portion of her people who had
resolved to vindicate her rights and break those
shackles of oppression with which strangers had
long kept her in bondage. It is unnecessary to
enter into a long detail of those grievances for the
redress of which, after we had in vain repeatedly
petitioned an unjust and unfeeling government, we
resolved to take arms. It is sufficient to say that
we felt them severely, and the circumstance of our
risking so much for their removal is ample proof that
we did so. To induce others to engage in a cause,
in which I had thought it my own duty to embark.
I could not conceive to be a crime; nay, I
considered
that the same obligation which bound me to
to enter into the union of my countrymen, bound
me to make all the exertions I could, to strengthen
that union by increasing its adherents. Among
others, I prevailed on Sir Geoffrey Carebrow to
join us. But, as under our circumstances, there
was no good in having numbers, without having
them armed, and as Sir Geoffrey, who then
professed
great zeal for our cause, was known to
be a money lender, I hesitated not to borrow a
large sum from him on the security of my estate,
for the purpose, then explicitly avowed to him, of
purchasing arms and ammunition, a purpose which
he seemed very zealous to promote. It is not true,
therefore, that he was deceived concerning the
intended
appropriation of his money.
His assertion that I attempted to make his
desertion
of our cause, a plea for refusing him
payment
,
is also unfounded. He must have uttered it
here to day, only with the base and malicious
intention
of wounding me in a point, on which, he
knows me to be sensible, that of my character for
honour and personal integrity. I here, in the
presence
of this court, and on the word of a man who
is shortly to meet his God, deny that I ever
intended
,
much less expressed an intention, on any plea,
whatever, to refuse refunding his money; and
having
Vol. II. I 2
made this solemn denial, I shall dismiss this
part of his evidence, by leaving to his conscience
the task of reconciling it to truth.
The deposition that I caused his imprisonment,
is equally untrue. I knew nothing of it until he was
brought to the place of his confinement. He
himself
knows too well the cause of it. It had no
connexion
with politics, nor were they United
Irishmen
who did it. Let him put his hand to his
heart, and say if it was not done to prevent female
innocence from being exposed to his villany? But it
is a subject I shall leave unexplained, on account of
her whom he would have destroyed.
With respect to the testimony of his servant,
he has only repeated that given by the master. I
strongly suspect he has obeyed his instructions in
so doing, and the same remarks will apply to both.
I shall only make this additional one, that as the
servant was the accomplice of his master in the
frustrated outrage against innocence to which I
have alluded, it is not surprising that he should be
capable of assisting him in the perjury of this day.
Against the evidence of the soldier I have
nothing
to say; but of the charge in the indictment,
founded on a part of this evidence, I must complain.
I was at the battle of Antrim; I did meet Colonel
Lumly arm to arm, and I met a brave man. We
fought, for we were arrayed on different sides; and
I was victorious. My success may have been his
death, as his success might have been mine; but
this is the first time, I ever heard the destruction
of an enemy, in the heat of an open battle, in which
thousands are engaged on both sides, stigmatized by
the harsh epithet of murder. What! is there a
gentleman
in that box, who after he had fought
zealously
,
and contributed by the work of his own hands to
the discomfiture of his enemy, would tamely assent
to the propriety of being called a murderer!
Surely
to soldiers, it is unnecessary to enlarge on the
wide distinction between a murderer and a victor.
The common sense of mankind has long decided
on the subject; and the cruel application of the
former epithet to me, must only have proceeded
from a disingenuous and overstrained affectation
of zeal against the cause for which I fought.
The merits of that cause have long, and will
long be a disputed subject. I shall not, therefore,
enter on it. It is sufficient justification of my
conduct
,
to my own conscience, that I believe the cause
to be righteous; and that it was my duty to lend
it my support. With respect to the views of such of
my unfortunate coadjutors, as were active in this
disasterous attempt to emancipate our country, so
far as I am acquainted with them, they were
directed
only to her benefit. If they had any
sinister
views of ambition or personal aggrandizement,
or the introduction of any favourite national
establishment
,
whether civil or religious, inimical to true
liberty, I know nothing of them. What would have
been their conduct had we been successful, I
cannot
say; but I can state what I believe would have
been my own. I never should have consented to
the establishment of a French influence in the
government
of this country. We solicited the aid
of France in the struggle for our independence, but
not at the price of permitting her government to
infringe that independence. I believe that my
colleagues were of the same mind with myself on
this subject. In our conversations, we have often
agreed in the sentiment, that if we must yield to a
foreign connexion in matters of state, it should be
a connexion with Britain, in preference to any
other country.The form of government I should
have preferred, would have been a republic of the
democratical kind; but so constituted, as while it
allowed the people their just ascendancy in the
national affairs, it would have afforded strength
and energy sufficient to the executive for every
useful purpose, whether external or internal. Should
the attainment of this desirable species of
government
have been impracticable, the state of things
that I would have next preferred, would have been
British connexion without British authority. I
should have no objection for the king of Great
Britain to be our king, constitutionally limited,
and without the power of appointing any foreigner
our viceroy, if it were found that such a state of
things would be necessary to the preservation of
peace between the two countries.
The United Irishmen have been charged with
the intention of establishing the Catholic as the
national religion. Whatever dispositions of the
kind they may have lately evinced in the South,
it is absurd to suppose that in the North, where
nine-tenths of their number were Presbyterians,
they should have ever meditated such a design.
We never talked of a national religious
establishment
.
The general understanding was, that on this
subject, all men should be as free as the
Creator
made them. Should uncontrollable events,
however, have occasioned the reverse to take place;
should the absurd and inhuman doctrine of
extirpating
heresy, have again became the fashion of
the day, I would have withdrawn from my ill-fated
country, and lamented her delusion, conscious, at
the same time, that I had done my duty towards
her, in assisting her to throw off that yoke of
foreign
oppression, whose weight had bowed her to
the dust.
But it is now over. She is destined longer to
wear the chains; and I fear that they will be more
firmly than ever rivetted around her. Every
prospect
of deliverance from her evil destiny, is now far
distant. Long, long will it be ere she shall lift her
head among the nations, proud and independent
as she ought to be. But although I expect not her
independence, yet, if I could hope that her stronger
and victorious neighbour would treat her with that
kindness and justice which true policy would
dictate
,
I should die satisfied, for she might then be
prosperous and happy as a British island, although
she should never be great and glorious as an Irish
nation.
Now, gentlemen! you have heard my
sentiments
,
and know the motives that actuated me
during the late unfortunate transactions. It only
remains for you to do your duty according as your
consciences may prescribe. I shall submit to your
decision without murmuring; and, I hope, without
weakness. About nine months ago, the illustrious
Orr stood to receive his doom on the very spot on
which I now stand to receive mine. Here he
displayed
a firmness which I shall try to imitate; and
at this moment his beatified spirit is not
unobservant
of the scene that passes here. Glorious martyr
of oppression! when thou sawest thy country
enslaved
,
thou couldst not look on and be idle; and for
thy love to her, to this place thou wert dragged, and
doomed to that fate, which I am now, like thee,
ready to receive. Oh! that he whose mighty aid
sustained thee in the day of thy suffering, may also
sustain me!
After a short address from the president, the
court in a few minutes, produced its verdict of
Guilty of all the charges except that of murder.
The president now rose to pronounce the sentence
of death.
Mistaken, and ill-fated man, said he to the
prisoner, it is now my fate to deliver the opinion
of this court, and pronounce according to its award,
the awful words that shall cut short your earthly
existence. Before performing this duty, it may not
be improper to say a few words on the fallacy of
those doctrines which hurried you into the
commission
of the treasons for which you are to suffer.
Your infatuated imagination has been carried away
by the theories of a new race of visionary
philosophers
,
whose notions of government are as
inapplicable
to the proper regulation of a human
community
,
as the means they have resorted to in
making the experiment, have been destructive of
human happiness. Men who know less of human
nature than you, men less capable of reasoning on
the nature of their passions and interests, and less
aware of the necessity of governing and restraining
them, for the safety and benefit of society, might
have been excusable in becoming deluded by the
fascinating, but absurd doctrine, of absolute liberty
and equality. But you, from your education and
opportunities of knowing, can have no apology.
What subordination to the laws of a country can
be expected from the uninformed minds, and
ill-regulated
passions of the peasantry, when such
men as you, to whom they naturally look for an
example, teach them that there is virtue in
resisting
,
even unto blood, every regulation of which
they do not happen to approve. Such men as you
cannot but perceive, that in a great community,
consisting of many millions of individuals, and
containing
many different interests in direct opposition
to each other, difference of sentiments on even the
most evidently useful measures of government will
often arise, for every mind as well as every
interest
,
has its own mode of viewing such things.
Would not then the establishment of your
disorganizing
doctrines be a source of endless calamity
to our age; would it not make the state of
civilization
,
laws, and government, a more wretched state
than that of savage life itself. The best institutions
that human wisdom ever framed, or ever will frame,
for human happiness, will have opponents. Is it,
therefore, proper that, whenever a portion of the
community chooses to be dissatisfied with the
existing
state of things, they should take up arms and
wade through bloodshed and destruction to enforce
a change? Should not those who not only entertain,
but propagate and act on such dangerous
principles
,
be punished as enemies to social happiness.
The peace and welfare of their fellowmen demand
it.
That you, Henry O'Halloran, to the great
detriment
of your country, have been guilty of such
offences, has been amply proved against you. This
court has, therefore, awarded you a punishment,
by which you are to atone for this guilt; and which
it is my duty now to pronounce. You are to be
taken to-morrow, to the place of your late
residence
,
in sight of which you are to be hanged by
the neck until you are dead, and the Lord have
mercy upon your soul!
O'Halloran was then conveyed back to the
prison
,
and the court adjourned.
CHAP. XII.
this is the bloodiest shame,
The wildest savag'ry, the vilest stroke,
That ever wall-eyed wrath, or staring rage,
Presented to the ears of soft remorse.
Shakespear
.
When
Ellen and her aunt visited their
unfortunate
relative after his condemnation, they found
him in an apartment separate from the other
prisoners
.
He had requested that they would not be
present at his trial, lest the horror with which they
should hear his doom pronounced, should
overpower
them, and their distress tend to weaken his
own fortitude. As they expected the result, they
were not surprised, when informed of it. But
when they visited him, the sad reality being now
before them, they gave way to all the softness and
affection of the female nature, and long and loudly
wept beside him.
While they were thus venting their grief, the
Recluse, and the poet, M`Nelvin, entered the
prison
.
They obtained this permission, by means of
M`Claverty, who, on this occasion, exerted himself
to procure for O'Halloran and his friends, every
possible indulgence, and it was by his management
that they now enjoyed the convenience of a
separate
apartment.
After the first salutation, M`Nelvin became
downcast
and silent. The Recluse spoke some words
of consolation; but his own agitation made him a
bad comforter, and he soon also became silent.
For some time the same gloom and silence
pervaded
the apartment, as if O'Halloran's soul had
already taken its flight. He was himself by far
the least agitated; and perceiving the faculties of his
visiters to be absorbed in sorrow; My friends,
said he, looking round with a cheerful countenance,
the muteness of your grief shows its intensity.
But for my sake, I beg you will not give way to
such weakness, otherwise I may not be able to
support my own strength of mind. Indeed I
cannot
bear to see my friends in such affliction. But
for what are you afflicted? Because one of your
friends, who has been upwards of half a century
in this world, is about to leave it for a better!
Rather
rejoice with me, that I shall so soon be released
from all my sorrows and vexations. Is it the
manner
of this release that effects you? God has willed
that it should take place in this manner; and will
you offend him by repining? And what, after all,
is there peculiarly distressing in this mode of
changing existence? As to its suddenness, an
apoplexy
would be more so. As to the pain it
inflicts
no man should regard that. It is soon over;
the torments of many diseases are far more
excruciating
,
and infinitely more tedious. As to
ignominy
,
there is none attending it, for this path to
eternity
,
has been trodden by many virtuous and great
men, whose memories are hallowed in the
affections
of all the wise and good of their species. It
can be no disgrace for me, to tread the path that
was formerly trod by Sidney and Russell, and
latterly
by Orr, and only yesterday by Porter and
M`Cracken. Our enemies may indeed cut short the
thread of our existence here, but they cannot deprive
us of the esteem of our friends and countrymen when
we are gone. These are comfortable
considerations
.
But they are not the only considerations
that support me under this dispensation. Here
Vol. II. K
is my grand support, said he, lifting a small
bible which lay on a table near him, and opening
it; here is the support with which God himself
graciously furnished me, when a wanderer from
Donegore, and driven to the very verge of despair.
In the midst of my anguish, this consolatory
passage
was opened to me, in an hospitable cottage,
and from that moment, my soul has never known
despondency, or distrusted its Creator.
The Recluse now drew near him. Forgive my
weakness, said he; my mind is agitated from
more causes than grief. Suspense tears it to
pieces; but I must not disturb your serenity by
communicating the cause of my anxiety.
What! said O'Halloran, with some alarm;
I trust you forebode no more misfortune to my
grandchild! Oh! Ellen, my child, your exposed
state alone causes me to feel uneasy. But to the
care of that God, in whom I trust, I commend you;
and you have near, dear, and vigilant friends, even
in this world. But oh! never forget to repose
your chief confidence in the protector you have
in heaven.
The Recluse assured him that he knew of no
evil threatening Ellen; that his suspense was
occasioned
by his entertaining hopes for him which he
feared were likely to be disappointed.
If that be all, replied O'Halloran, you may
cast aside your suspense. My hopes are sure, and
will not deceive me, for they are fixed on
Heaven
.
A messenger now entered from the commander
of the garrison, requesting to know if O'Halloran
desired the society of a clergyman; and if so,
to signify his commands on the subject, and they
should be attended to. The attendance of one of
his clerical fellow prisoners was requested, and
obtained
;
the other being appointed to attend young
Nelson. The ladies, and O'Halloran's other friends;
now left him to the conversation of the clergyman,
and withdrew to the inn. The next morning, they
again visited him. He had enjoyed a good night's
sleep; was very much refreshed, and somewhat
more cheerful than on the preceding evening.
Now my sister, said he to Mrs. Brown, I
do not wish you to accompany me to day. Let
me bid you and Ellen a last adieu. After the
pang of this separation, for I feel indeed a pang,
and the tears started into his eyes, all my
earthly
cares will be over, and I shall have nothing to
do but to die.
We will accompany you part of the way,
said they. I would rather not, he replied;
your presence would remind me of earthly
enjoyments
;
and I wish nothing at that period to
attract
my thoughts from Heaven.
Well, then, Henry! said Mrs. Brown,
farewell
!
In Heaven I hope, soon to meet you.
Farewell! my sister. We shall meet there;
and he embraced her. Now, thou daughter of
my only child! continued he, turning to Ellen,
the only offspring I leave in this world; thou hast
long been the darling of my heart and the object
of my care, farewell! I resign thee to the care of
the Almighty. May his blessing forever rest on
thee! He then gave her a parting embrace, and
her aunt and she, were led out of the room by Mr.
Wilson and the Recluse.
It was about eight o'clock; and they had
scarcely
reached the inn, when the sound of military
music drew their attention. They looked from the
windows and beheld a regiment of infantry
marching
from the castle towards the jail. Their hearts
sank within them; for this was the commencement
of the procession to the fatal spot.
The regiment halted; and was drawn up before
the jail. In a few minutes, they saw Nelson
brought out, on a common farming car,
surrounded
by soldiers. His coffin was behind him, and a
man who, as they were informed, was the
executioner
,
sat on the other side of the vehicle. It
stopped a few minutes in the middle of the street;
when one of the clergymen before mentioned,
placed himself along side of Nelson, with a bible in
his hand. In a short time, another vehicle of the
same sort, appeared. It contained O'Halloran, his
coffin, and his clerical attendant. The ladies saw
but one glimpse of it; for they could look no more.
Their hearts became faint, their vision indistinct,
and their heads swam dizzily, as they were
removed
from the appalling view.
The heavy monotonous sound of the muffled
drums, now beating time to the music of a dead
march, informed them that the procession was
departing
on its fatal errand; and when the ladies
had recovered sufficiently to look into the street,
all was there as still and quiet as if nothing of
importance
had taken place. The procession having
taken the road to Ballycarry, Mr. Wilson, and the
ladies, attended by their servants and Jemmy
Hunter, set off on another road, to avoid passing it,
towards Larne.
The military with their prisoners, halted about
half a mile to the south of Ballycarry, (at the
northern end of which village, stood the cabin in
which Nelson's mother resided,) to give the soldiers
time to form their ranks for marching through the
village. The slow pace, the dead music, and the
solemn beat, was again heard, and continued until
the car on which Nelson was seated, came opposite
his mother's door. The whole then stopped, and
Nelson's mother suddenly fainted in the arms of
her son.
The executioner selected an ash tree, which
grew near the end of the house, for the gallows.
The car was soon drawn forward under the
spreading
branches of that tree, on which Nelson had
often ascended in pastime, with all the sprightly
playfulness and innocence of childhood. After the
affecting ceremony of bidding farewell to several
of his friends and playmates, who were permitted
to approach him, the clergyman commenced divine
worship by singing the forty-third psalm, in which
Nelson and several of the by-standers joined. The
clergyman then addressed the throne of heaven in
a style so fervent and pathetic as to draw tears
from the eyes of all present, not excepting the
rough soldiers themselves. When he had finished,
he asked the youthful victim, if he had any thing
to communicate to the people, concerning his death.
He replied that he had nothing more to say, than that
he died innocent; for he had never murdered, nor
intended to murder any onethat on the day of
the
rising
, he had gone with a message to some of
Sir Geoffrey's men, who were United Irishmen, to
call them out; but that he had no arms with him,
nor had he threatened any of them. That he was
willing and ready to die; since he was sure that
as he died innocent, he would go to heaven.
The executioner now adjusted the rope, and
asked him if he was ready. He replied that he
only wished to see his mother once more, and then
he would be ready. His mother was supported
forward to him, for her distress rendered her
unable
to support herself.
Oh! my William! my lovely child!
exclaimclaimed
sheThey murder thee, she would
have continued; but grief choaked her further
utterance.
Mother! said he, stooping to catch her in his
arms, wont you kiss me, and bless me before I
die? She raised her eyes, swimming in tears, and
with an almost convulsive effort, clasped him to
Vol. II. K 2
her bosom. May the God of heaven bless thee,
my dear son! she cried; thou wilt soon be with
thy father, and I will soon follow thee.
Amen, replied the victim, and giving a sign to
the executioner, his mother was removed, and the
work of death proceeded on. It was soon finished
amidst the agonizing horror, but profound silence
of the assembled multitude. His body was then
cut down, deposited in the coffin, and delivered, a
melancholy, heart-rending present, to his
disconsolate
mother.
Long, long will the maidens of the surrounding
country, pause to drop a tear, as they pass the spot
where the remains of this youthful martyr are
deposited
;
and with swelling bosoms, adopt the
language
of Ireland's sweetest melodist, when they
pathetically express their sorrows for his cruel
fate.
Oh! breathe not his name, let it sleep in the shade,
Where cold and unhonoured, his relics are laid;
Sad, silent, and dark, be the tears that we shed,
As the night dew that falls on the grass o'er his head:
But the night dew that falls, though in silence it weeps,
Shall brighten with verdure, the grave where he sleeps,
And the tear that we shed, though in secret it rolls,
Shall long keep his memory green in our souls.
CHAP. XIII.
Down yonder hill with headlong flight,
Swift as a swallow to the sight,
With rapid course, he cuts the wind;
Trees, fields, and hedges, roll behind;
The thickening clouds of dust that rise,
He leaves afar to seek the skies;
For love, and friendship, urge his speed,
A friend in need 's a friend indeed.
Irish Soothsayer
.
After
completing the foregoing tragedy, the
military procession resumed its march toward the
place appointed for accomplishing another. We
have already mentioned, that Mr. Wilson and the
ladies, for the purpose of avoiding this procession,
had taken another road on their return homewards.
It so happened, however, that they overtook it at
the entrance of Larne where the two roads joined.
Oh! I shall see him again, cried Ellen,
before
he dies.
Mr. Wilson wished his party to avoid an
interview
,
which, he said, would only cause additional
distress to both parties. But Mrs. Brown cried
out; Since Providence has once more brought me
so near my brother while he lives, I must see and
speak with him.
The procession had stopped to form into ranks
for marching through the town. During this
interval
,
Mr. Wilson's carriage, containing himself and
the ladies, drew forward to the car on which
O'Halloran sat. Ellen, and her aunt, were soon
in his arms, and the commanding officer had the
politeness to postpone the march, until the first
burst of their feelings subsiding, should allow them
to separate.
My dear sister! my beloved daughter! do not
go with us further. O'Halloran was thus replying
to their earnest entreaty to be permitted to remain
with him to the last, when their attention was
drawn to a man on horseback, who was galloping
down the hill, behind them, at the most furious
rate, with the dust, all rising in clouds around him,
as he flew along. The commander was about to
desire the ladies to resume their seats in the
carriage
,
and to order the procession to proceed, when
he perceived the advancing horseman. It is,
perhaps, some express, said he to Mr. Wilson,
with whom he had been conversing, I shall delay
a few minutes.
As soon as the horseman approached, Oh!
father, it is Edward Barrymore, exclaimed Ellen.
He is come to see you die.
Are you the commander of this party?
inquired
the rider, who was indeed Edward, as he
advanced hastily to Colonel Parker. I am, was
the reply.
Then, your duty is over on this occasion, said
Edward, at the same time handing the colonel a
letter signed by the Lord Lieutenant, accompanied
with one from the governor of the fortress of
Carrickfergus
.
This, I am glad to see, is a conditional pardon
for our prisoner, said Colonel Parker.
You will also observe that I am to be his jailer,
until the condition is complied with, replied
Edward
.
What, sir, are you the Mr. Barrymore here
mentioned?
That is my name, sir.
Why, you were zealous, indeed, to be the
courier
in this case.
It was a desperate case; I could entrust no
one else, said Edward.
You were right, returned Parker. I respect
your feelings, and shall for ever thank you for
taking this disagreeable business off my hands.
Guards, untie the prisoner! He is pardoned.
Shouts of joy arose, and continued to rend the
air for many minutes, from an innumerable
multitude
of people of all descriptions. Edward, in the
meantime, flew to his beloved, who on the first
mention of pardon, almost fainted with excess of
joy. He caught her gently by the arm; Miss
O'Halloran, I hope you know me? said he. She
turned round at the sound of the well known voice.
Yes, O yes! it is you who have saved my
grandfather's
life. Oh let me thus return you thanks,
and without considering what she was about to do,
she attempted to throw herself on her knees before
him. But he caught her in his arms; No, my
love! he whispered, God alone must be thanked
in that posture.
Oh! yes, cried she, recovering her recollection,
I knew not what I was doing. But I shall thank
God all the days of my life, for this kind
providence
.
Mrs. Brown now approached Edward.
Ah! Mr. Barrymore! what do we not owe
you?
I am already full repaid, replied the youth,
as he gently pressed Ellen's hand. Immediately
a burning blush tinged her countenance; and sweet
confusion sparkled in her eyes. Edward now
handed the ladies into the carriage; and at Mr.
Wilson's request took his seat along with them,
that gentleman intending to go on foot with
O'Halloran
to the inn.
The press of people, however, became so great
round O'Halloran, every one anxious to
congratulate
him, that he was obliged to accept of Jemmy
Hunter's kindness, who rode in among them, and
offered him his horse. The crowd soon
spontaneously
formed into two parties; one of which
followed
O'Halloran with loud acclamations to the
inn, while the other assembled round his deliverer.
A vague and exaggerated story had got among
them, that in his haste to bring the pardon from
Dublin, he had killed four horses, and by means
of such velocity alone had he been able to arrive
in time to save O'Halloran. An immense concourse
gathered around the carriage, in which he and the
ladies were seated, and unharnessing the horses,
drew them in triumph to the inn, while the women
from the doors and windows of the houses,
showered
blessings on his head.
The party remained at the inn only until
another
carriage was prepared, in which O'Halloran
and Mr. Wilson proceeded to the residence of the
latter, followed by Edward and the ladies, amidst
the blessings and acclamations of thousands of
joyful spectators.
When the party, after arriving at Mr. Wilson's,
had partaken of some refreshments, and their
minds were somewhat composed after the high
excitement
of the day, O'Halloran requested a
private
interview with Edward.
It is a beautiful evening, said he, suppose
we walk out to the shrubbery. Methinks the free
enjoyment of woodland air, after my late
confinement
,
will be refreshing and tranquillizing to my
spirits.
The shrubbery led to a small cascade or
linn
,
as it is called in that part of the country, to which
an imperceptible continuation of their walk soon led
them. This cascade, although small, was romantic.
It was formed by a rivulet which ran through the
shrubbery, and emitting itself at this place, rushed
over the edge of a rocky precipice, about thirty feet
high, into a wide dell, or low level lawn which spread
towards the east, being bounded by the sea shore.
This lawn was clothed with the deepest verdure,
intermingled with myriads of wild flowers, with
the stream formed by the waters of the cascade,
rolling placidly through the midst of them. To
the westward, the side by which our gentlemen
approached this dell, it was bounded by a
semicircular
extension of a grass-covered bank, varying
from twenty to thirty feet high, continued from
each side of the cascade about half way round the
small valley. On the brow of this bank, at a place
where it declined with a gentle slope into the
valley
,
the gentlemen sat down to contemplate the
scene. The saffron hue of the sky indicated the
setting sun behind them. Before them were to be
dimly seen, the blue hills of Scotland rising like
mist from the ocean at the extremity of the horizon.
Beneath them a flock of sheep, and several cows,
were enjoying the luxuriant herbage; while a
thrush seemingly delighted with the tranquillity and
beauty of the scene, expressed her joy in the full
swelling rapturous melody, peculiar to that
charming
bird.
What a contrast said O'Halloran, is this
holy scene, to that which I have so lately left! This
pure wholesome air to the suffocating loathsome
vapour inhaled by the unfortunate inmates of the
prison from which I have just come! How
different
are my feelings now, from what they were at
this time yesterday evening! From the windows
of my prison, I then beheld the reflecting rays of
the setting sun, as I supposed for the last time. I
can now turn to that glorious luminary, and behold
him setting once more, with the pleasurable
sensation
of hope, that I may yet many times view the
same scene. It is only a few hours since I thought
I should never again see the most splendid of all
created objects, taking his diurnal farewell of my
native hills. Oh! what do I not owe to your
active
friendship, to which, under Divine Providence,
I must ascribe this unexpected happiness?
In serving you, replied Edward, on this
occasion
,
I have only discharged a debt which I
owed you for my life; and we have now, to speak
in mercantile language, only balanced accounts.
Ah! sir, exclaimed O'Halloran, my
subsequent
harsh conduct, did more than cancel any
claim I may have had on your gratitude for that
service. You were my guest; I broke the laws of
hospitality, and treacherously made you my
prisoner
.
Yes, hurried away from the dictates of my
better feelings, by an over anxious solicitude for the
success of an unfortunate enterprise, I forgot the
duty I owed to the sacred claim of a stranger
under
the protection of my roof. It was a crime, it
was a foul crime, which, even in my then perverted
state of mind, I could not altogether justify to my
conscience, and which has since given me more
uneasy
feelings than any other event of my life.
Your magnanimity now in preserving your
persecutor
,
demands all the atonement in my power to
make. To give this explanation of the state of
my feelings towards you, I have asked your
privacy
.
I need not entreat your forgiveness, for you
have proven already that you have forgiven me;
but I wish to convince you of my compunction for
the injuries I have done you.
I beg, said Edward, that you will not think
of that affair. Even when it took place, I was
conscious
of your motives, and felt more for the pain
which the struggle between your inclinations and
your sense of duty occasioned you, than for the
temporary confinement to which I was
subjected
.And,
O! sir, let me disclose my whole mind
to you. I do not regret that captivity, for it
resulted
in one of the most pleasing events of my life.
It brought an angel to unbar my prison doors; and
proved to me that I was not indifferent to the
loveliest
of all created beings. I have said that you
owe me nothing. But if I have nothing to demand
from obligation, I have a precious gift to ask from
kindness. I love Miss O'Halloran; the hopes of
my life depend on her; consent that she shall be
mine, and you will make me happy; refuse me, and
you will render me indeed miserable.
Refuse you! cried O'Halloran; No! not if
I had an empire to give you with her; and
seizing
Edward by both his hands, he continued, O
God, under whose canopy I now live, and breathe,
make me grateful for thy goodness, in thus
providing
for the child of my heart a protector, and a
lover so worthy of her. Young man, I shed tears,
but they are tears of joy. I have shed none such,
since the day that the wife of my affection,
presented
me with my only infant, and said `Behold
our child!' I felt I was then a father, I blest the
babe, and wept. I am still a father; that infant's
child is still left to me; and can I but weep at this
prospect of her happiness?But, said he,
suddenly
changing his tone, as if some new suggestion
had occurred to him, Mr. Barrymore, are you
not too precipitate in this matter? In the first
impulse
of delight at your proposal, I did not
recollect
that you have relations rich and powerful.
Have they been consulted on the subject?
I confess, replied Edward, somewhat
embarrassed
with the question, that I have not as yet
spoken to them concerning it. Having no hopes
of obtaining your consent, to the accomplishment
of my wishes, since I had incurred your
displeasure
,
Vol. ii. l
and knowing that without your's, her's could not
be obtained, I did not wish to acquaint my friends
that I cherished views of happiness which had so
little prospect of being realized.
Then, said O'Halloran, there are obstacles
I did not before perceive; and for the sake of my
child's peace, I request that this affair shall not,
for the present, be pushed farther.
`What obstacles!' cried Edward. I cannot think
that my father will oppose me in a point which so
nearly concerns my welfare. He has no son but
me. He is an affectionate father, and will not
command
me to be wretched. Besides, what objections
can he have? Her beauty, her sweetness of
disposition
,
her virtue, her connexions
Ah! stop, cried O'Halloran, there lies the
obstacle.
Her connexions
. Will the powerful, the
rich, the constitutional, the loyal family of the
Barrymores
degrade itself by an alliance with a
traitor
,
a rebel, a ringleader of rebels, a man scarcely
escaped from the gallows! No, sir; by strongly
wishing for it, you may force yourself to expect it;
but cool reason tells me that it cannot be.
If I have any knowledge of my father's
character
,
replied Edward, he has too liberal a
mind to permit the errors of one individual to
influence
his estimation of another, however nearly
they may be connected. Your being concerned
in the late conspiracy, will not, in his eyes, diminish
the worth of your granddaughter; nor, since you
have done nothing unworthy of a man of honour
and a gentleman, can any errors of a mere political
nature, communicate any thing degrading to one,
who is in herself all purity and excellence, and
worthy of the best and noblest in the empire.
You may think so, my young friend, said
O'Halloran; but your relations will not look on
her with your eyes. In the meantime, much as I
should rejoice at your union with her, you must
permit me to retract my assent, until it receives
your father's; for unfortunate, poor and persecuted
as I am, I am too proud to permit my child to be
taken into a family, the head of which may look
on her as unworthy of such a situation.
Wherever Ellen is known, said Edward, she
cannot be thought unworthy of any situation.
But, returned O'Halloran, her grandfather's
unworthiness may be reflected on her.
Oh, sir, said Edward, in a tone of entreaty,
I shall procure the approbation of my family.
You will surely then be satisfied.
Not only satisfied but rejoiced, replied
O'Halloran
.
That they will yield to your wishes is
my earnest prayer; but whether they yield or not,
I shall ever be equally solicitous for your
happiness
as for her's to whom I should wish you united.
For the present, however, we must drop the
subject
.
They arose; and ascending a small eminence
on their way to the house, they perceived the
country for several miles round, studded with
bonfires; while the frequent shouts of mirth, that
broke upon the air, proclaimed the joy of the
people
for O'Halloran's safety.
This is a brilliant and romantic, and must be
to you a very gratifying scene, observed Edward,
for it proves how much you are esteemed by
these people.
They are a kind people, replied O'Halloran.
I only wish they were happier. He heaved a
sigh, and silence ensued, until they arrived at the
house.
CHAP. XIV.
'Tis not for mercy's sake, he grants the pardon,
His heart ne'er warmed with such a god-like virtue;
'Tis for the credit; that it may be said
He did, at least, one meritorious action,
Ere he lost power, to yield some sweet'ning flavour
To his loathed ministry: Or 'tis ambition,
To use authority while yet he has it.
Major Trip
.
Edward
anxious for an interview with the
Recluse
,
that very evening, after parting with
O'Halloran
,
visited the cell before M'Nelvin had left it.
Ah! sir, cried the Recluse, as soon as he
perceived
him, never did the arrival of a mortal
messenger yield more heartfelt delight than yours
did to-day.
My friends, said Edward, addressing them
both, you have had sad times here since I left
you. The storm is now, however, abated, and I
trust in God that our country will never witness
such another. Perhaps some lives may yet fall;
but I have reason to think that the councils of the
nation will soon be regulated on wiser and milder
principles, for lord Camden is recalled, and the
benign Cornwallis has by this time assumed the
reigns of government.
Cornwallis! did you say? exclaimed the
Recluse
,
hastily.
Yes, father, lord Cornwallis is now Lord
Lieutenant
.
Thank heaven! ejaculated the Recluse, both
for my country and for myself. The benevolent
Cornwallis will restore my country to peace; and
I shall be restored to my country. In a short time
I shall no more tread my native soil as a disguised
outlaw.
You are then acquainted with lord Cornwallis,
asked Edward.
Yes, said the Recluse. I was his bosom
friend, during his campaigns in America; and, on
a certain occasion, had the felicity to save his life,
for which he has never since ceased to remember
me with gratitude.
Through his means might you not long since
have procured a reversal of your sentence? asked
Edward.
No, sir. On my return from America, he did
apply for my pardon; but the influence of Sir
Geoffrey
Carebrow and others of his connexions,
counteracted
his exertions. I have never since
permitted
any application to be made. For some years
I travelled on the continent; and having, at length,
settled here and adopted this disguise, I became
satisfied with my lot. As, however, late events
have induced me to discover myself to a few
friends, whose society I should be glad to enjoy
without restraint, and one of my best friends has
it now in his own power to remove the legal terrors
that hang over me, I shall avail myself of the
opportunity
which is thus providentially afforded me,
to become again an acknowledged member of
society.
He then inquired of Edward at what time the
courier he had despatched with the account of
O'Halloran's capture arrived in Dublin.
On Wednesday evening, replied Edward.
She was diligent and expeditious; but how did
you think of such an extraordinary messenger?
I could not, with safety, said the Recluse,
have waited till the succeeding mail left Larne.
Vol. II. L 2
Besides, I understand that the transportation of
letters by mail has, since the troubles commenced,
been very irregular, and I was well aware that a
single day's delay might be fatal. I had some
thoughts of sending James Hunter; but his unlucky
adventure at Antrim, taught me that he was not
one of the fittest people in the world for such an
errand in such times. Peg Dornan appeared a
much more suitable messenger. Her strength was
equal to the task of travelling night and day for
that distance; her zeal and perseverance I knew
would be indefatigable; and her sex, manners, and
attire, were the best passports she could carry to
secure her an unsuspected and uninterrupted
journey
.
The perseverance and zeal of Peg have fully
equalled your expectations, remarked Edward;
but I believe that her strength has not held out
so well. I left her absolutely crippled with
fatigue
.
Poor creature! ejaculated M`Nelvin.
But she will be well attended to, continued
Edward; and I make no doubt that such a
constitution
as her's will soon repair the damage it has
sustained. It was about four o'clock in the
afternoon
when she arrived. I was sitting with my
friend, Charles Martin, in the drawing-room, when
we heard a loud rapping at the street door. The
butler happening to be in the hall, and thinking,
perhaps, from the nature of the noise, that some
distinguished personage wanted admittance, flew to
open the door, but was so disappointed at seeing
the uncouth figure which presented itself, that he
would have instantly closed it again, had not Peg
by main strength, half thrust herself into the hall.
I want to see Mr. Barrymore. I'm tauld he
bides here, cried she.
You're tall enough, and impudent enough too;
you hussey! exclaimed the butler.
I maun see him, she resumed; for the life o'
a man, an' a guid man, depends on it; ye unceevil,
ill-mannered tyke.
The altercation now induced me to look from
the window, when I immediately recognised Peg.
She was holding fast by the door frame, from
which the man was endeavouring all in his power
to disengage her, and thrust her into the street. I
ordered him to desist, and ran down stairs to secure
Peg a welcome reception. She gave me no time to
speak, but taking your letter from her bosom, the
moment she saw me
Read that, sir, quoth she, and ride to Carrick,
as fast as the best horse in this muckle toon can
carry you, gin you wad save him. Heigh, sirs;
but I'm tired!but dinna wait, dinna waitI
have been owre lang a coming.
I was not too much absorbed in the contents
of the letter to hear more. Having read it, I ran
up stairs.
Martin! said I, see that woman below taken
care of. These are horrible times! I must be off
immediately to the Castle, and thence to the North.
A friend's life is in danger. I have no time for
explanation.
I then ordered Tom Mullins to follow me
hastily
with two horses to the Castle. I knew every
minute was precious, and hastened onward at a
pace which made the people stare as I passed
them. When I reached the Castle, I found that his
excellency had just set off for the Phnix Park. I
rushed out to follow him on foot, when I
fortunately
perceived Mullins advancing with the horses.
I mounted one, and ordered him to wait for me,
with the others, at the commencement of the
northern
road. Lord Camden had just reached the Ph
nix Lodge when I overtook him. Surprised to see
me riding with such speed, he stopped till I
approached
.
What is the matter, Barrymore, said
he; I hope no fresh insurrection has broken out?
No, my lord, I replied, as I dismounted, I
came to solicit your excellency in favour of a very
dear friend, who is confined for treason, and even
while we are speaking, may have sentence of death
pronounced and executed on him, by the military
in the north.
Is that all! said he, then let us walk in. I
have of late received so many expresses about
insurrections
,
and battles, and massacres, that I
imagine
every person who approaches me, to be
the bearer of some such intelligence. But let us
have a glass of wine, and then you can explain
your wishes.
This comported little with my impatience; but
I was obliged to submit. After we were seated;
who is this friend of yours, he asked, that has
got himself into captivity?
O'Halloran is his name, my lord.
What! the chief instrument of the rebellion in
Ulster. I am glad of it. I expect that now we shall
soon be able to reduce that province to order.
I came said I, to crave your excellency's
pardon
for this unfortunate man, whose excellent
private
character, would, if your excellency were
acquainted
with it, be sufficient to procure your
forgiveness
for his public errors.
How! Edward Barrymore, said he, are you
become an advocate for a man who has been so
fatally active in stirring up this horrible rebellion?
a man whose destruction will be of more
advantage
to the country than that of any thousand
rebels
in it.
My lord! said I, this man once saved my life;
and oh! if ever my friends or my family, have
rendered
your, or his majesty's government, any
service
,
gratify me with an opportunity of repaying him
the debt. The destruction of one individual, even
of the most important description, will not add
much to the success of the royal cause. Your
leniency will attach him and all his friends to the
existing authorities; and I, for my part, shall be
bound to you by everlasting gratitude.
It cannot be, Edward; he replied. To
extend
absolute pardon to such an offender would
afford
an injudicious example of leniency, now when
energy and wholesome severity are so much
required
.
Any thing, my lord, I replied, any thing short
of death will be acceptable;but if he be
permitted
to remain in the country, I shall be
security
for his good behaviour in any amount you
choose to name.
You are very pressing, Edward, said he.
Stay for dinner. I shall reflect on what is best
to be done. You cannot, at any rate, despatch an
express before the morning.
I shall be the express myself, my lord, I
replied
.
The moment I obtain your excellency's
order in his favour, I shall set off. In such
emergency
I cannot trust another.
You are indeed very zealous in this matter,
said he. But I must reflect a little. I wish to
oblige you; yet I must do my duty to the state.
Dine with me, and if during the evening, I receive
no more news of bloodshed, burnings, and murders,
committed by those wretches, I may be in a better
humour to spare one of their ringleaders.
I was obliged to comply. At about eight
o'clock, an express arrived from the castle with a
letter to his lordship. I trembled lest it might
contain
intelligence of a nature to irritate him against
the insurgents, and frustrate my application. In
a few minutes he laid the letter on the table. So
you are to have a new viceroy, said he. Mr.
Pitt don't think me enough of a soldier for these
hot times. Cornwallis will arrive to-morrow to
assume
the government. He is a brave man; but
too tender-hearted, I believe, when severity is
requisite
.
I am glad, however, that he comes. The
responsibility of conducting the country through
these perplexing times, shall be taken off my hands.
But, as to your affair, I must oblige you while I
have the power; and in despite of all that has been
said of the cruelty and harshness of my
administration
,
I shall end it with an act of clemency.
He then retired to an adjoining chamber, and
wrote the following letter, which he presented to
me, saying, Read that, sir; I expect it will answer
your purpose.
To the Governor of the town and castle of
Carrickfergus
.
Phnix Park
,
June
14, 1798.
Sir, being informed that you have the rebel
chief, O'Halloran, in custody, I am induced, in
consequence of some representations made to me
in his favour, by a person well acquainted with
him, to pardon his offence, on condition that he
shall pay a fine to be assessed by you to any
amount, not exceeding ten thousand pounds, which
sum shall be appropriated to the relief of those
royalists who have suffered from the rebellion in
the county of Antrim.
The prisoner may be given over to the custody
of the Hon. Edward Barrymore, who is chargeable
with his safety until the fine be paid, and who will
with any other person you may approve, enter
into recognisance for his subsequent good
behaviour
.
CAMDEN.
Having received this anxiously-desired
document
,
I hastily expressed my acknowledgments,
and withdrew.
I found Mullins waiting at the place appointed,
and we proceeded onwards at a very rapid pace. At
the instance, or rather the remonstrance of Mullins,
we stopped at Swords to refresh the horses; during
which interval, I endeavoured to relieve my
impatience
by writing to Charles Martin. I informed
him of the cause of my hasty departure; and
requested
him to recommend Peg Dornan to the care
of my friends, under the assurance that she had
rendered me an important piece of service, while I
was in the North last summer.
Martin had proposed to accompany me to my
favourite shore as soon as the troubles should be
over. I now requested him to follow me whenever
circumstances would permit. I informed him that I
should be found either at the Antrim Arms in
Larne, or at O'Halloran castle, the residence of
the Northern beauty I had so often described to
him. Alas! said I, in concluding my letter, she is
at this moment in great affliction. I figure to
myself
her luxuriant black hair all dishevelled, and
flowing round her, as she buries her lovely face in
the bosom of her unfortunate grandfather, who is
the cause of her sorrows, in order to conceal the
crystal tears that shine with heart-piercing lustre
through her dark eye-lashes. The rosy hue of her
cheeks, and the coral of her lips, are, perhaps,
now pale. I cannot bear to dwell on the image
that her distress at this moment presents to my
mind. Loveliness in distressand such loveliness
as her's! Oh, Charles, I must quicken my pace,
that I may have the supreme luxury of drying
those tears, of removing those sorrows. I can write
no more, my heart is too full.
We soon again proceeded on our journey, and
reached Newry the following night. The horses
being unable to go further at such a rapid rate, I,
the next morning very early, procured a fresh one,
and desiring Mullins to follow more leisurely with
the others, set off alone, and reached Carrickfergus
about eleven o'clock. You may imagine my
consternation
,
when I was informed that O'Halloran
had been taken away some hours before, to be
executed at his own castle. The governor of the
place, however, on reading the Lord Lieutenant's
letter, observed that as the party would be
detained
sometime at Ballycarry, in putting Nelson
to death, by taking the shorter road over the
mountain, I might, by swift travelling, overtake
it in time to prevent the catastrophe. Observing
my horse to be greatly fatigued, he ordered out his
own, and giving me a note to the commander of
the party I was to pursue, `Dont spare the horse,'
said he; `and may heaven prosper your
journey
!'
The horse seconded my impatience with great
spirit, and you know the fortunate result.
The hand of Providence has been remarkably
manifest on this occasion, said the Recluse.
How much reason have we to be thankful to the
Great Ruler of the universe, for this signal
deliverance
!
Two hours more would have rendered this
pardon useless.
Edward now took leave of his friends, and
returned
to Mr. Wilson's.
CHAP. XV.
Methinks I see again
Those gentle days renewed, that blessed our isle,
Ere by this wasteful fury of division
It desolated sunk.
Thompson
.
The next day, while O'Halloran was employed
in attending to congratulatory messages and visits
from his friends, his servants assisted by a number
of mechanics, commenced repairing the castle, that
he might with as little delay as possible, return to
his ancient residence. The Governor of
Carrickfergus
,
having the discretionary power over the
fine to be inflicted on him, fixed it at three thousand
pounds, for which Edward, who transacted this
business
unknown to O'Halloran, immediately gave a
draught on his Dublin banker. He then, with
Mr. Wilson, became security to the amount of ten
thousand pounds for their friend's future
submission
to the established government. When these
two gentlemen went to Carrickfergus for the purpose
of transacting these matters, which they did the day
but one succeeding that on which Edward arrived
with the pardon, they found the courts-martial still
busied with the state trials. But these terminated
before they left the place, by the arrival of a
proclamation
of a general amnesty issued by Lord
Cornwallis in favour of all, except a few
individuals
therein named, who should within the term of
six weeks from the date thereof, make their
submission
to the government. Of this merciful measure
all the prisoners in Carrickfergus instantly availed
themselves, and were set at liberty.
Vol. II. M
Edward and Mr. Wilson returned in company
with a number of the prisoners, who had been
taken
from the neighbourhood of Larne. On
hearing
their expressions of sorrow of the rash step
they had taken, and their protestations of
gratitude
to the new viceroy for his clemency, he was
forcibly struck with this proof of the advantage of
conciliation over coercion in securing the
tranquillity
of a country. Here he saw men whom
Camden's
oppressive policy had rendered bitter
enemies
to the government, now, in consequence of
Cornwallis's clemency, manifesting by every
expression
of sincerity, their resolution to live and
die its friends and supporters.
Ah! thought he, how happy it would be for
society, if governments would hearken to the lesson
taught by such an example! But pride and
passion
too often blind them to their own and their
people's interests. All history proves the falsity
of the barbarous doctrines of making
public
examples
.
The tyranny of the duke of Alva caused
Spain to lose the Netherlands; the cruelty of the
catholic Mary strengthened the protestant cause,
and powerfully contributed to its permanent
establishment
in these countries; while the inhumanity
of Jefferies, of Dalzel, and of Claverhouse, hurled
from the throne, the family they attempted to
support
!Full
of these reflections, and cheered with
prospects of peace and prosperity which, under the
auspices of the new viceroy, he perceived again to
be dawning on his afflicted country, he
approached
the house of his companion, as yet the
temporary
residence of his Ellen, with light and joyous
spirits. Here he had the pleasure to find the
agreeable Miss Agnew, for whom he had
contracted
a sincere friendship. This young lady ran
forward
to him with an air of great liveliness;
exclaiming
,
welcome, Mr. Middleton!O I forgot, Mr.
Barrymore. But, indeed, I am so glad to see you
that I cannot help blundering.
My fair friend! replied Edward, unthinkingly,
either of the names will be agreeable to me that
shall be most acceptable to you.
Upon my word, she cried, very gallant; a
fair proposal, all at once, before one has time to
bless one's self. But what, my tender Damon, if
I accept neither of these names?
I must then bear the misfortune, with as much
fortitude as I may, returned Edward, perceiving
the turn she had gaily given to his expression.
Well! then, prepare to exert it, said she, for
the old Scotch name of Agnew sounds so well to
my ears, that I am determined to change it for no
other; but if I had to bear the awkward
Granuwale
one of Halloran, I would soon adopt one of
your's in its stead.
I love my own country too well, observed
Ellen, to whom the last remark had been slyly
directed
,
to prefer either a Scotch or an English
name to one of true Irish growth; and while my
native
appellation distinguishes me as an Irishwoman,
I shall neither envy you your Scotch title, nor the
gentleman both his English ones. But, Mr.
Barrymore
,
she continued, turning to Edward, what
news have you brought from Carrickfergus?
I have brought good news, he replied. The
state prisoners are all discharged in consequence
of a general amnesty proclaimed by the new Lord
Lieutenant. Mr. Wilson and I returned in
company
with some of those belonging to this
neighbourhood
.
Heaven be praised! we shall yet see happy
times, exclaimed Ellen.
This is indeed pleasing intelligence, said Mrs.
Brown, who had entered the room, as Edward was
relating it. Mr. Barrymore, you are always the
bearer of good news.
Are you a mere man, or a magician? asked
Miss Agnew, looking him archly in the face.
Why, mad-cap! such an absurd question?
demanded Mrs. Brown.
Let the gentleman answer first, said Miss
Agnew.
I can scarcely tell, he answered; but I
believe
,
I am
enchanted
here.
That is but just, cried the arch lady, for I
am sure you carry enchantment to every place
else you visit. You must certainly have some
power of necromancy about you. The sea
cannot
drown you; the strength of rocks cannot
confine
you; at the power of your words the
chapletprize
goes over the heads of all your competitors,
and alights on your's. When your friends are
assaulted
,
you drop as if from the clouds, to their
assistance
;
the shades of night, or the intervention
of hills, cannot conceal your enemies from your
penetrating eye; nor protect them, though assisted
by doors, and bolts, and guards, and pistols, from
your vengeance. Neither is it in the power of
steel to pierce you; for when the assassin lifts his
arm, either an angel, or, what answers the same
purpose, a saint, protects you from the blow. If
your friend is in danger, from the distance of a
hundred miles, you wing your flight, and in a few
hours armies are dispersed before you, and your
friend is rescued; or if you only visit the prisons
where hundreds of captives are confined, whom
you compassionate, the prison doors fly open,
the prisoners' chains fall off, and they are set at
liberty. O! sir, the African's ring had not more
power over time and space, nor was his wonderful
lamp more capable of surmounting all the
obstacles
of nature, and overcoming all the opposition
of men, than your talismanic influence.
What, a lecture on necromancy, I protest,
cried Mrs. Wilson, who had just entered. Why,
I believe, girl, you are really mad.
She is only labouring under the delirium of a
joyous fever! said Ellen.
I am indeed in a delirium of joy returned
Miss Agnew, to see all my friends so happy. But
I have also spoken truth in my delirium. No
one can deny that many miracles have been
wrought in our favour by that conjuror from the
South.
If our fair enigmatical lecturer, observed
Edward, labours under any malady, it is that of
a warm heart, accompanied with a lively
imagination
,
and an irresistible command over
metaphorical
ideas and expressions.
They were now summoned to dinner. Several
gentlemen of the neighbourhood were of the party,
and among others, their friend, M`Claverty. As
soon as this gentleman perceived Edward, he
appeared
somewhat startled.
Sir, said he, approaching him, I think I have
seen you before.
Yes, replied Edward, You were then on an
important duty.
I remember having examined you rather
roughly, returned M`Claverty.
That is nothing, said Edward. Your duty
required you to examine me. I was a stranger;
and you were in pursuit of the perpetrators of a
erime, of which, for aught you knew, I might have
been guilty. I was a little peevish under your
interrogatories
at the time; but I afterwards blamed
myself for being so foolish. I have since that time,
heard enough of your character, to convince me,
that your conduct did not proceed from either the
pride or petulance of authority.
Vol. II. M 2
Well I hope, returned the magistrate, that
we shall be good friends on further acquaintance.
After an hospitable dinner, which, like every
other dinner given by people of fortune, displayed
all the luxuries of the season, the cloth was
withdrawn
;
and the ladies soon following it, the
gentlemen
addressed themselves, like true Irishmen, to
the conviviality of the social cup; and the time
passed
away in the enjoyment of much good humour
and hilarity.
CHAP. XVI.
We may roam through this world like a child at a feast,
Who but sips of a sweet, and then flies to the rest;
And when pleasure begins to grow dull in the east,
We may order our wings and be off to the west:
But if hearts that feel, and eyes that smile,
Are the dearest gifts that heaven supplies,
We never need leave our own green isle,
For sensitive hearts and sun-bright eyes.
Moore
.
The
principal gentlemen in the neighbourhood,
now gave a routine of dinners and balls in
testimony
of their satisfaction at O'Halloran's escape from
the dangers into which he had been involved, and
of their respect for the high character he had
supported
through the trying scene. Edward and
Ellen were, of course, always invited to these
parties, and the easy urbanity, the respectful
kindness
,
and cheerful politeness of the Northern Irish,
made an indelible impression on Edward's mind in
their favour. He the more zealously cherished
this impression, because he had been taught to
believe
,
that they were a race of stiff, plodding,
narrow-minded
,
avaricious people, the descendants of
Scotch adventurers, so dry, so inhospitable, and
so selfish in their manners, that they scarcely
deserved
to be considered Irish.
How much have I been deceived, said he, in
a letter, written about this period, to a friend in
Dublin, in the character of these people? Are
these the cunning Scotchmen, the bigotted, ignorant
Presbyterians, whose study is to cheat, and whose
business is to grow rich, that have been said to
inhabit
Ulster. They deserve a character the very
reverse. Their peasantry have all the good nature,
simplicity and kindness of Arcadians; their
merchants
and manufacturers possess all the honour
and punctuality once said to be naturalized on the
Exchange of London; and their nobility and gentry,
all the high-spiritedness, gallantry, and generosity
of the days of romance. These people are indeed
Scottish in their industry and intelligence; but
they are altogether Irish in their manners and
feelings
.
I am in reality proud to call them my
countrymen
.
The industry and zeal of the workmen employed
at O'Halloran castle, soon repaired the damages it
had sustained; and, in a few weeks, the family
were reinstated in the Hall of their ancestors. It
is the custom in that part of the country, when a
family
removes from one dwelling to another, to
assemble
a large party of its friends and neighbours
to an entertainment, called heating the house.
By a man of O'Halloran's disposition, a custom of
this kind could not be neglected; and as so many
respectable people had of late shown him so much
kindness, the party he invited was more than
ordinarily
numerous.
After the usual entertainments of dinner, desert,
tea, &c. the party in the height of glee, mirth, and
enjoyment, resorted to a large room, where flaming
chandeliers gave an artificial day, and harps,
violins, and flutes, poured an animating stream of
lively sounds, to give motion to their flowing spirits
in the buoyancy of the bounding dance. It was
about an hour before this sprightly and
exhilarating
amusement commenced, that a messenger
arrived
with the following note to Edward:
Dear BarrymoreI have at length followed
you. Excited by my ardent desire to see the
peerless
beauty, who could so completely subdue a
heart which was impregnable to all the attacks of
the Dublin fair, I eagerly embraced the first
moment
,
in which I could, with propriety, undertake
the journey. The day before I left the city, I
waited on the Lord Lieutenant, with the letter you
enclosed from the Recluse, who, I understand, is to
be no longer a mendicant, but is to appear in
society
in his own proper character of Francis
Hamilton
,
Esq. of Hamilton-hall, in the county of Tyrone.
His excellency was much pleased to hear from
him; and, without delay, not only granted to him
his request, but wrote to him a long letter, which
on finding I was about to take a Northern trip, he
entrusted to my care.
Your favourite, Peg Dornan, had a pretty smart
fever, and was unable to walk for nearly a couple
of weeks: but she was in a convalescent state
when I left Dublin, and as she was getting very
home-sick, I suppose she will, in imitation of your
humble servant, speedily honour the Northern
folks with her presence. Your father informed me
that he would send her in the stage. Both he and
your mother have been as attentive to her as you
could desire.
By means of lord Camden, your father has
become
acquainted with your intercession for the
Insurgent
Chief. He is pleased enough with your
conduct in that affair, only he thought you might
have made him your confidant. But I told him you
had not
time;
which settled the point.I will give
you no more city news till I see you. Indeed I should
not have given you so much in this way, but
having
to send you a letter, I could not properly do so
without putting something in it, and news answered
the purpose as well as any thing else. I shall only
add that I am impatient to see the old chief, with
the fame of whose exploits, the whole city rang
for some days before I left it.
Yours, &c.
CHARLES MARTIN.
Edward instantly acquainted O'Halloran with
his friend's arrival. A messenger with an
invitation
to the Castle, was despatched for him; and
he arrived just as the party had finished the first
set of country dances.
Charles Martin was a lively young man of the
middle height, rather slender, with dark hair, and
a glowing complexion. Though inferior to
Edward
in manly proportions, he was, on the whole,
an interesting youth, gifted with the easy, affable,
and polished manners of a gentleman.
Edward was conversing with a group of ladies,
consisting of Ellen, Miss Agnew, two Misses
Simpsons
,
and a Miss Moore, who had just sat down
from the dance, when Charles was announced.
Edward hastened to meet him; and taking him
to his own chamber, Charles was speedily
transformed
,
from a hardy traveller, into a gallant gay,
ready to wait on the fair, and join in the mirthful
revelry of the evening. Before they entered the
brilliant scene of hilarity, joy, and beauty, he
stopped Edward near the door, where unseen they
had a full view of the whole party.
Stay, Edward, said he, I, for a moment, wish
to view at a distance, a constellation of charms, the
splendor of whose beams, if too suddenly
approached
,
might dazzle and confound me.
Right, said Edward. Let me see if, among
all the fair, you can single out she whom I hold
fairest?
The young man's glance speedily traversed the
whole room. At last, resting upon a group of ladies
to the right, who were sitting in a kind of
semicircle
,
If your goddess be within those walls, said
he, yonder she is, surrounded by her attendant
nymphs;the lady with the damask rose on her
breast. I know her by the glowing descriptions
you have so often given me. The sparkling
brilliancy
of her black eyes; her high and circular
forehead, as smooth as ivory; her well formed
Grecian nose; her rosy cheeks; and coral lips.
Ah! she smiles! No wonder you were enchanted.
What an expression of heavenly things is there in
that smile! See! her gauze handkerchief moves to
one side.Oh! what a sight is revealed! What
snowy whiteness of skinwhat delicate fullness
what gentle swellings mark that half concealed
seat of tenderness and love's emotion!
Hush! cried Edward. Profane notyou
will turn me distracted!
I knew it, replied the other, and do not
wonder
that you have been overcome. Indeed, did I
not know how that lovely object has already
disposed
of her heart, I could not answer for the
safety
of my own. But mark! who is the lady to the
right of this high beauty? She who has just
turned
her face towards us? The lady with the green
sash round her waist? Let me see; I can hardly
describe her. She is a brunettemy favourite
colour;and the most becoming one, I protest, I
ever saw. What simplicity and archness in the
expression of her oval countenance! What ease
and liveliness in her looks! What a well formed
neck;What a well formed waist!In the name
of all the Graces, Edward, who is she?
She is the Miss Agnew I have so often
mentioned
,
replied Edward. She is the greatest
coquette
in the company; and when she is in the
humour, a considerable quiz; but one always
overflowing
with kindness and good nature.
By Heaven! Edward, exclaimed Charles,
you charm me. She is just such a one as I have
vowed to love, if I could ever find. Serious
beauty
is too sublime for me. Give me life in my lady;
a sprinkling of Attic salt to season her charms. No
offence, Edward; I acknowledge your enchantress to
be the more perfect beauty, according to the usual
notions of such matters. But she is, perhaps, too
exquisite for me. You are more highly gifted than
you friend; and the eagle alone you know cap
look at the sun without injury. Methinks I could
feel more at home basking in the less resplendent
beams of that little luminary whose countenance
seems to say,
Here wit, and love's bewitching wiles,
Unite with gay good humour's smiles.
You see she makes me poetical. Hasten
forward
,
and introduce me to the Circean group. I
long for a nearer view.
Check your rapture first, said Edward; and
do not play the fool when we approach. Why, I
believe your heart is already lost; your making
poetry is an infallible symptom of such a
misfortune
.
It is lost replied Martin, past redemption,
unless you show me some fault in that lady; for I
confess that I shall never see any myself. But,
lead on. Give me the pleasure of an introduction.
I hope to conduct myself so as not altogther to
forfeit
my claim to the possession of common sense.
They now advanced directly to the ladies. Miss
O'Halloran! this is my friend, Mr. Martin, said
Edward. Ellen rose, and with a smile extended
her hand to him, saying, you are welcome, sir, to
this part of the country. I hope so long as you
remain here you will find it agreeable to your
taste. She resumed her seat; and Edward
introduced
him to Miss Agnew, who, without rising,
made an assenting motion with her head, and said
in a somewhat fluttered voice, that she joined in
the welcome her friend had given him. A nod
from each of the other ladies, as they were
severally
named, returned by a bow from Martin,
concluded
the ceremony of the introduction. Martin
was next made acquainted with the gentlemen,
who, each of them, gave him a hearty Irishman's
shake of the hand, in token of a cordial welcome
to their society.
A second country dance was now proposed. It
was led off by M`Claverty and Ellen; while
Edward
followed with Miss Agnew for his partner,
and Martin succeeded with the elder Miss Simpson.
The whole set consisted of eighteen couple, who
threaded the mazy rounds on the light fantastic toe,
to the animating music of various instruments, with
as much enjoyment as ever the inhabitants of this
world experienced on such an occasion.
Why you have completely done me out, said
M`Claverty, wiping the perspiration from his
brows with a handkerchief, after the set had
broken
up, to his fair partner, who appeared as free
from fatigue as at the commencement. An old
half worn-out fellow like me, should never engage
with so youthful and vigorous a partner.
Why you have done better than I expected,
replied Ellen; for she did not indeed expect much
agility from her partner, who was now nearly fifty
years of age, and had not latterly been much
accustomed
to mingle in such active pastime.
I suppose so, said he; but twenty years ago,
had you seen me, you would have both expected and
found that I could have tired out the best of our
youngsters here. But there is a time for all things;
and I am now hanging between the sober
methodical
feelings of your grandfather, and the
warm-impassioned
throb of the young Barrymore, who,
Vol. II. N
I think is the best winded youth in the company.
And now, my dear madam, since I have acted my
part with the juniors, I must go and recover a
calmer and graver mood, in more venerable, but
certainly not more delightful society.
So saying, he joined a party of the elder
gentlemen
,
who, in a recess at one end of the room, were
enjoying themselves in the less fatiguing, less
animating
,
but, to them, not less interesting
amusement
of the Spoiled Fifteen.
The company (to employ a usual phrase,)
enjoyed
themselves to a late hour, and separated highly
pleased with their entertainment, and
congratulating
themselves on having added one more happy
evening to their lives.
CHAP. XVII.
What mighty power adheres to certain names!
When written on a little slip of paper;
They can convert it to a talisman.
There is a magic in the very letters,
To raise the humble, to debase the proud,
To shield the weak, to overwhelm the mighty,
To chain the conqueror to a desart rock,
And from a hermit to produce a courtier.
Oh that such names were still the friends of virtue!
M'Carrocher
.
The
next morning Edward and Charles Martin
called on the Recluse, with the Lord Lieutenant's
letter. They found M'Nelvin with him; and both,
especially the Recluse, seemed to be much
dejected
.
My friend, said Edward, as he approached the
latter, I have taken the liberty of introducing into
your habitation, a friend whom I believe you have
never seen, but of whom you have often heard.
This is the only son of your correspondent Sir
Philip Martin.
I am happy to see your father's son, said the
Recluse to Charles. You bear a near resemblance
to what he was before my misfortunes began. Ah!
you recall those days to my recollection, when your
father and I were college class-mates. The same
was our age, the same were our studies, the same
were our pursuits, and nearly the same were our
opinions and principles. But different, far
different
has been the tenor of our lives. His has been
smooth, calm and unruffled; for he was never the
victim of those fierce passions which have brought
on my head the storms of misfortune.
Your misfortunes, sir, replied Martin, are I
believe now at an end; and, I hope, that my father
and you, have, in the evening of your lives, a long
period of tranquillity and happiness before you.
My friends, observed the Recluse, I will
never distrust the kindness of Providence. But
you will pardon my present seriousness, when I
inform
you that I have received news of a
melancholy
nature. You know, Mr. Martin, that I never had
a sister, and but only one brother; now I have
neither.
What! interrupted Martin, is Sir John
Hamilton
dead?
Yes; and the manner of his death, is what, at
present, so much afflicts me, answered the Recluse.
M'Nelvin has just brought me a letter, which he
received last night from the post office, written by
your father, in which he mentions that my brother
who had, as you know, never been married, and
had for a number of years past become a perfect
sot, and associated with none but jockies, huntsmen
and profligates of every description, was found
dead a few mornings since in a ditch at the road
side, about two miles from his own house. There
were no marks of violence on his person. His
watch, his money, and every other article about
him, remained undisturbed. But it was known
that he left a neighbouring public house at a late
hour the preceding night, in a high state of
intoxication
.
These, and some other circumstances,
induced
the coroner's jury to return a verdict on the
case, of Death by drunkenness; a death which I
consider to be in no respect less horrible than
suicide
.
Oh! I feel it awful to reflect that my only
brother, who, however exceptionable his character
might be in other respects, was always kind to me,
should come to the termination of his existence in
such a manner.
Sir Francis Hamilton! cried Martin,
extending
his hand to the Recluse, permit me to address
you by your proper title. You are now a free man.
I hold the document in my hand which absolves
you from the effects of your unfortunate duel, and
restores you to society. May you long enjoy your
freedom, friends and property!
M`Nelvin's eyes sparkled at this intelligence.
God Almighty be praised for this addition to his
other signal mercies! he ejaculated, while Sir
Francis hastily glanced at the signature of the
letter
.
I expected this, said he, from his excellency's
friendship. I see that it is his own hand writing.
I sincerely congratulate you, said Edward.
This is a turn of Providence from which, I trust, will
proceed many years of happiness to us all.
But my poor brother! said Sir Francis, his
mind still full of his catastrophe. O! that he had
died a less sudden death!
Sir, said M`Nelvin, in the midst of so many
blessings, we ought not to repine, if the great Ruler
of all, does not send them unmixed. His ways are
inscrutable; his dispensations are frequently
mysterious
;
but they never fail, in some shape, to redound
to the advantage of his creatures. That your
brother's
death has answered some kind purpose of
Providence
both to himself and to others, it would be
impious to doubt.
My friend, cried Sir Francis, catching M`
Nelvin's
hand, your words to me have ever been
wisdom
.
I shall endeavour to grieve no more. God
has removed him in the way he thought best. His
will be done.
It was proposed that Sir Francis should without
delay, relinquish his disguise and resume his
proper
Vol. II. N 2
appearance and station in society. To this he
agreed, adding that he had the means at hand, and
should, in a few hours, meet them at the Castle,
free, fearless and undisguised.
Edward and Charles now left the cell, and with
joyous hearts turned down the glen towards the
shore; while M`Nelvin set off for Jemmy Hunter,
in order to send him express to the sheriff of the
county with information of the pardon his friend
had received. Jemmy was soon on his journey;
and that very evening returned with the following
note from the sheriff, addressed to Sir Francis
Hamilton:
Dear SirIt is with great satisfaction that I
acknowledge the receipt of your's of this morning,
covering the commands of his excellency, the Lord
Lieutenant, respecting you, which, of course, it is
my duty, as well as my pleasure, to obey. I shall
make the agreeable communication known without
delay to all the justices of the peace, jailers, and
other officers, whom it concerns, so that you will
be in no danger of personal molestation; and may
appear in public whenever you think proper.
I have the honour to be, &c.
Edward and his friend having reached the beach,
Do you behold yon rock said the former, at
the foot of the precipice to the right hand. It was
from its summit, I first beheld the mistress of my
heart.
And it was there too, observed Martin, I
understand
,
that you were kept in durance for about
four months, without once seeing the light of the
sun.
But, returned Edward, it was there, I was
more than compensated for that privation, by the
light of her lovely countenance visiting me, and
showing me the way to liberty.
You are a happy man, I acknowledge, said
Martin. O! that my sweet brunette were to
render
me such a service.
It is remarkable, observed Edward, that we
have been both doomed to loose our hearts in this
bewitching country. After the warning I gave
you of its Circean influence, I think you displayed
but little prudence in venturing to visit it.
Ah! my friend, replied Martin, I confess I
am indeed caught. But I rejoice at it. If I am a
captive, I have, at least, the grace to be content
with my chains. Methinks I would not fly from
my charmer, even if my flight were to deliver me
from a rocky prison.
Your's is the superlative of love, I admit, said
Edward. I could wish we had the proof of its
sincerity. But shall we explore the interior of the
rock?
Yes, replied his friend; I am full of curiosity
to view that nest, in which so many ill-formed
projects
of rebellion have been hatched.
But, not so fastinterrupted Edward. I see
our two enchantresses yonder. It will, methinks,
be pleasanter to join them. On some other
occasion
,
we may visit the curiosities of this rock. As
they walked towards the ladies, Martin observed,
Since you have the key to my feelings, Edward,
you cannot but know that I am unhappy; for, I
perceived that my little sly tempter looked rather
askance on me last night. Whenever my eye
caught her's she suddenly looked in another
direction
,
and, as I imagined, attempted to appear
sulky
;
and if her countenance was not too pretty to
be ill-natured, I fear it would wear a perpetual
gloom in my presence.
Have courage, said Edward; you must have
your day of trial as well as others. I underwent
a long heart-burning season of suspense. I
indured
insults, threats, ran the risk of assassination,
and suffered under a long deprivation of the light of
day, before I became certain that my fair one
loved me. My sufferings at length softened her,
and she confessed
They had now advanced within hearing of the
ladies. After the first salutation, If it will not
be intrusion said Edward, we should wish to
share the pleasure of your ramble.
We do not intend going far, replied Ellen.
We were just about returning when we saw
you approaching.
Could we prevail on you to extend your
walk, said Martin, looking timidly at Miss
Agnew
,
we should be much gratified.
A pause ensued, each lady expecting the other
to reply. At length, Ellen said, if our company
could indeed be of any service to you, gentlemen,
we should cheerfully afford it.
I assure you, ladies! replied Edward, there
can be no species of recreation which we would
prefer to your company.
Nor, added Martin, fervently, would we
exchange
that company for any other under the
sun.
You, Dublin gentlemen, said Miss Agnew,
have a bold knack at complimenting. Is such
language frequent in your city?
I protest, Miss Agnew, said Martin, with
simplicity
,
I only speak what I feel to be true.
Ah! young man, she returned, you are now
fallen from the sublime. I should like you to take
another flight towards the sunbut no, the clouds
will be high enough; for I should not wish you to
be overcome with fatigue, if you are to be our
companion
when you descend.
I am, indeed, too much overpowered by my
present feelings to venture on any flight, replied
Martin.
Our presence is, perhaps, oppressive to you,
said she. We had better, therefore, separate.
So saying, she affected to turn away from him, but
with a smile of such sweet good nature as threw
him totally off his guard.
Oh! no, Miss Agnew, he exclaimed, do not
leave me until I lay my heart open before you.
Lay your heart open before me!what a sight
it would be! she exclaimed. Why this must be
another of your Dublin customs.
During this conversation, Edward and Ellen had
proceeded some distance in advance of their
friends, so that Martin perceived that he had an
opportunity of expressing himself more freely and
explicitly on the subject of his new born love.
I shall now speak plainly to you, my lovely
banterer, said he. The language of feeling and
of love is every where the same. It does not
consist
so much in the words, as in the manner and
looks of the speaker. Ah! have you not perceived,
from the confusion of my eyes, the agitation of my
manner, that you have become too interesting to
me, too essential to my happiness.
Sir, said she, interrupting him, this is
strange discourse;but we must follow our
companions
.
Ah! let us imitate them too? said he, by
loving
each other.
They know each other better than we do,
she replied, and are consequently more
excuseable
in yielding to the impulse of mutual affection
with which their virtues have inspired them. While
speaking this, she hastened so rapidly forward,
that they had nearly overtaken their
companions
,
before he had time to ask, When I am
better known, may I hope?
Perhaps so, was the only reply he received;
but it was accompanied with a look that gave
pleasure
to his heart.
Ellen, conscious that the state of her feelings
were too well known to permit an over-strained
reserve
to appear natural, had without hesitation
accepted
her lover's arm as they walked forward.
Her gentle pressure communicated a thrill of
delight
to his whole frame, and he could not help
exclaiming
Ah!
life of my heart! when shall I have
a legal and exclusive claim to call thee my own, and
to support thee thus in our walks, careless of
observation
,
in the face of the world?
In that respect, I am not at my own disposal,
she replied. My father must act for me, or rather
his wisdom must show me how to act; but my
father
dares not now act openly; and I should very
much question the propriety of giving away my
hand, while he lives, unless he appeared publicly
on the occasion, to sanction the deed.
And publicly he will appear, replied her lover.
His danger is over, and his disguise will be
thrown off this very day. The new viceroy is his
friend; and has reversed his outlawry. Oh,
Edward
,
do you indeed speak the truth? she
exclaimed
.
But why do I doubt? This consummates the
blessings which Heaven has so graciously, so
abundantly
showered on us of late. Lead me to my
father, that, in his presence, I may thank my God.
Miss Agnew, who had heard her last expression,
was astonished at her fervency, but on learning
the cause, she partook warmly of her joy, and
earnestly
joined in her thanksgiving.
Edward now informed Ellen, that he expected
her father had, by this time, thrown aside forever,
his disguise; and that in his own proper person, he
would very soon appear at the Castle to confirm
the intelligence with his own lips. Even at this
moment, he may be there, said he, anxiously
waiting to gladden the heart of his daughter with
the certainty of his safety.
As the party approached the Castle, they were
overtaken by M`Nelvin, in company with a
stranger
of a genteel appearance, who seemed
somewhat
beyond the middle age of life. He advanced
towards them with a firm step and an air of
courtesy
,
with a smile playing on his countenance,
while M`Nelvin introduced him to them by the
name of Sir Francis Hamilton.
Ellen startled, supposing that it might be her
uncle, of whose death she had not been informed.
Sir John Hamilton, I rather suppose, said she.
No; I have made no mistake. Sir Francis is
his name, returned the poet.
Yes, my daughter, exclaimed Sir Francis,
and I am thy father, the old Recluse, who have
for six years been content to live as a hermit,
because
you were near him. He saw you all he
wished you to be, and he was happy, although
covered with the garb of poverty.
You are indeed my father! cried she. That
you are now safe, thank Heaven;but how have
you become Sir Francis Hamilton. Has the Lord
Lieutenant also given you a title?
No, my daughter. I have my title by
inheritance
.
My brother, your uncle, is dead.
Dead! she exclaimed.
Yes, replied her father. He was a kind
relative; and I cannot but feel much for his fate,
it was so unexpected.
But, I trust, he has gone to a better world,
said Ellen, heaving a sigh; the same journey is
destined for us all.
They soon arrived at the Castle, where
O'Haloran
and his sister being informed of the
revolution
in the affairs of the Recluse, partook of
the general thankfulness; and the whole party
enjoyed
several days of more felicity than usually
falls to the lot of mortals.
CHAP. XVIII.
How joyed the bark her sides to lave!
She leaned to the lee, and she girdled the wave;
Loud murmured the ocean, with gulf and with growl,
The seal swam aloof, and the dark sea-fowl;
The pye-duck sought the depth of the main,
And rose in the wheel of her wake again.
Hogg
.
A FEW evenings after the foregoing incidents,
Edward expressed a desire to view the celebrated
cliffs called the Gabbon Heughs, being the only
part of the Antrim coast which he had not formerly
visited. The young ladies, Martin and O'Halloran,
agreed to accompany him; and it was settled that
they should set out after breakfast the next
morning
.
An invitation in the meantime was sent to the
eldest son of Mr. Wilson, a youth who was well
accustomed to navigate the coast, to attend with
his sister, a young girl scarcely fourteen, which was
accepted. Two of O'Halloran's servants were
also taken along for the purpose of managing the
oars in case of a calm.
The weather was as favourable as they could
wish; and at the time they left the shore the sun had
dispelled every cloud, and was ascending towards
his meridian altitude in unveiled majesty. The
water was smooth and glossy; for there had been
no high winds for several days. A moderate and
favourable
breeze sprung up from the north-west, and
filling their sails, soon blew them from the land.
In about twenty minutes, they were opposite the
mouth of Larne harbour, and perceived the ruins
Vol. II. o
of Old Fleet Castle, at about two miles distant,
standing on the narrow stripe of land called the
Curran, which projects from the bottom of the
valley
in which Larne is situated, into the harbour,
which expands southward into a large lake,
extending
upwards of five miles, between the main land
and the peninsula of Magee. Our party
perceived
the bosom of this lake to be studded with
merchant vessels of various sizes, while numerous
yachts, barges and fishing boats, plied in the strait
between the Curran and the peninsula. They
soon, however, doubled one of the points of the
latter, and lost sight of this animating scene.
They now passed rapidly along Brown's bay,
at the eastern extremity of which O'Halloran
informed
them that there was to be seen one of those
ancient monuments of superstition, called Rocking
Stones, by the instrumentality of which, the
druidical
priests are said to have imposed on their
followers
,
the belief that they possessed preternatural
powers
.
The party stopped to examine this curiosity, and
found it to consist of a prodigious rock, upwards of
fifty tons weight, seated on two points so firmly as
not to be displaced by the united strength of
twenty
horses, but so delicately poised as to be easily
moved by the little finger of the gentlest lady of
the party.
What think you of this? said Edward to Sir
Francis. Do you suppose that this rock was
placed here by human means?
Tradition says so, replied Sir Francis; but
tradition ever loves to ascribe wonders to our
ancestors
.
It particularly delights to magnify their
personal prowess; and, indeed, if we could believe
that the raising and fixing of this extraordinary
balance was the work of our forefathers, we must
acknowledge that they were a wonderful race,
every way equal to those giants in strength and
stature, to whom popular opinion has ascribed the
construction of the celebrated Causeway at the
lower end of this county. But I have formed a
theory concerning these moving rocks, which,
indeed
,
ascribes their construction to human hands,
but does not require that they should be larger or
more powerful than our own. Respecting this one
in particular, I can see nothing absurd or
improbable
in the supposition that some dexterous
mechanical
genius finding it favourably situated for
his purpose, attempted, and succeeded in the
attempt
,
to afford it the small capacity for motion,
which it possesses, by removing obstructions in
some places, and placing impediments in others.
But that it was raised and fixed in its present
situation
by human means, is not to be credited, for
even if our remote progenitors had possessed
machinery
sufficient to lift and adjust such an
enormous
weight, it would have been nearly impossible
to have hit upon the proper adaptation of its axles
and their corresponding grooves, at the first trial, and
they must have had to lift and relift it an
innumerable
variety of times, before they could get it to
fit.
What learned disquisition is this? said Miss
Agnew, coming round to the side of the rock where
Edward and Sir Francis stood.
It is concerning the creation of this moveable
rock, replied Edward. Sir Francis thinks that
nature, in one of her wanton freaks, left it here by
chance, either just as we see it, or more than half
prepared to be made what we see it, by the chissel
and mallet of some ingenious mechanic.
So he thinks that giants had no hand in the
affair, said Martin, who had followed Miss Agnew's
footsteps.
None in the least, replied Edward. Nay, he
scarcely believes that in the days of the Druids,
our fathers were much larger or stronger than
ourselves
.
That is consolatory to our modern dignity,
observed Martin; for what a degenerate race
we must be, if our fathers could have set a rock of
fifty tons weight, on a place, and in a position, where
we could scarcely fix one of five hundred pounds!
It is time, said Sir Francis, that we should
prosecute our voyage, if we mean to visit the
Gabbons
,
and return home by day light.
The party accordingly once more betook
themselves
to their bark, and scudded gently forward,
before a pleasant breeze. They withdrew some
distance from the land, in order to double a small
island called Muck, the strait between which
and the peninsula being too narrow to admit of an
easy passage. When they had cleared this islet,
the whole party being in high spirits, felt disposed
to enjoy the luxury of music on the water.
Edward
and Martin had provided for such an
enjoyment
,
by bringing flutes with them. After
playing
a few tunes in concert, they requested of the
ladies a song. Ellen, after stipulating that Miss
Agnew should yield them a similar gratification on
their return homewards, complied, and sang the
following
verses, the production of M`Nelvin, to the
tune of Coolin, her favourite air, which the
gentlemen
had been just playing.
Oh the best spot on earth for delight to be found,
Is at home, where with joy our affection is crowned;
Where the wife of our bosom still meets us with smiles,
And the mirth of our children each sorrow beguiles.
In the walks of ambition, with power and with fame,
We may shine in full pomp, and establish a name;
But the flower of content, in the soul will not bloom,
Unless it first springs from our comforts at home.
When disease overtakes us, and wealth flies away,
When foes triumph o'er us, and flatterers betray;
Ah! where shall we find the true cordial of life,
But at home, in th' endearments of children and wife!
Whenever my sum of contentment is low,
When a bankrupt in bliss, and embarrassed with wo,
At home I still find, in the charms that are there,
A fund that o'erpays, and discharges my care.
The domestic contentment and tranquillity
expressed
in verses so finely sung, contrasted with
the political exasperation and disasters of the times,
made a deep impression on all present, which had
not altogether subsided when they approached the
tremendous Gabbons, the very name of which, to
this day, makes the Roman Catholics of the North
of Ireland shudder. O'Halloran related the story
of the dreadful retaliation which, during the
rebellion
of 1641, the Presbyterians of the
neighbourhood
inflicted on the Catholics for a barbarous
massacre which the latter had committed on the
Protestants inhabiting the borders of the Black
water, in the county of Armagh.
The English garrisons had been drawn from
that quarter, said he, to assist the
parliamentary
army in making head against the famous
Roger Moore, who had raised the standard of
rebellion
in aid of Tyrconnel, and a great many of
the zealous Protestant inhabitants accompanied the
troops as volunteers. This afforded an opportunity
to the discontented Catholics, of avenging what
they considered the cause of their country and
their religion, on a proud progeny of foreigners
and heretics. On an appointed night, they
accordingly
arose in arms, and seizing the Protestants of
all sexes, ages, and ranks, murdered them, and
threw their corpses into the Blackwater.
Intelligence
of this transaction soon reached the
garrisons
of Belfast and Carrickfergus, among whom
Vol. II. o 2
were many of the Blackwater volunteers, whose
families had suffered. Inflamed with grief and
rage, and giving way to feelings of barbarity
unworthy
of the milder spirit and more philosophical
doctrines of their religion, they resolved to inflict a
terrible example of retribution on their enemies.
Assisted by a large party of the Protestant
inhabitants
,
the garrisons sallied out, and seizing about
fifteen hundred Catholics of both sexes, bound
them together in pairs, and drove them to the edge
of that very precipice, (said he, pointing to a long
continued perpendicular range of limestone cliffs
soaring upwards of two thousand feet above the
surface of the sea, and sinking beneath it perhaps
as many,) and from the top of that awful cliff, the
very sight of which turns one dizzy, those
unfortunate
beings were whirled into the air, whence
they plunged into the watery gulph below, (for
there is here no beach) where they sunk to eternity.
The place is called, to this day, the Catholic
Leap; and it is currently believed by thousands
of that persuasion, that the blood of those who
were bayoneted previous to their being thrown
over, which streamed down the white front of the
precipice, still does, and shall to the end of the
world, remain there as a testimony against the
heretics. In this last part of their statement,
however
,
he continued, they are mistaken, for no
traces of blood are to be seen along the whole
course of this tremendous coast. There are,
indeed
,
at the top of the cliffs some veins of a reddish
ochry substance, which, in wet weather, is apt to
be washed down the precipice, and, at a distance,
may be mistaken for blood, and has, no doubt,
given origin to this absurd story. The Catholics,
indeed, seldom give themselves an opportunity of
being undeceived on this subject, for they abhor
the place too much to visit it; and, it is said, that
none of their body have ever ventured since the
occurrence of this unjustifiable transaction, to
reside
on the peninsula, for, although it is really very
fertile, and its present inhabitants prosperous and
wealthy, they look on it as an accursed place.
Having contemplated this sublime shore, with
an intensity of interest, and solemnity of feeling,
which at length became painful, at the request of
the ladies, they turned their prow homewards.
Every one was so much absorbed in the reflections
naturally produced by the foregoing recital, and
the awfulness of the scene before them, that, for
sometime, they all kept silent. No sounds, but
those occasioned by the flapping of the sails, or
the rushing of the boat through the water, were
heard to interrupt the perpetual clamour of the
multitude of gulls, curlews, herons, and
innumerable
other species of sea fowl, that flew to and from
the cliffs where they had erected their airy nests,
until the party had cleared the Gabbons, and came
opposite to the place where the green land shelves
towards the shore. Miss Agnew was then the first
to break silence. Addressing Ellen softly, she said,
Ah! there is the green earth again! I begin to
breathe easier. Oh! how pleasant, returned
Ellen are the haunts of man, full of care, and
sorrow, and pain, and strife, as they generally
are, to those who have just emerged from such a
scene of wildness, terror and awful sublimity, as
that we have just left behind!
CHAP. XIX.
He prospered in his crimesbut what of that
'Twas but awhilefor soon a dreadful end
Arrived, and consciencescorpion conscience, stung
Him to the very marrow, and the frown
Of overwhelming and eternal justice,
Darkened his dying moments with despair.
Irish Soothsayer
.
On reaching Isle Muck, it was determined to
land there, to take some refreshment, and give the
ladies an opportunity of recovering their spirits.
The surface of this islet consists of a green sward
of about three acres in extent. It is uninhabited
by man; but commonly contains a flock of sheep,
and constantly a multitude of rabbits. It has a fine
spring of fresh water near its centre, in
consequence
of which it is a favourite place of resort
for boating parties of pleasure, from the
neighbouring
country. Our party, after partaking of a cold
dinner, materials for which they had taken care to
bring with them, spent sometime in rambling over the
islet, and viewing from different points, the
magnificent
and picturesque scenery of land, and water, and
rocks, and ships, and castles, and cottages, that at
various distances surrounded them. They at length
seated themselves on a hillock, to enjoy the sweets
of song and music before they departed. Miss
Agnew was now called on for the performance of
her stipulation with Ellen. She complied, and
Edward
accompanied her voice with the melody of
his flute, while she sung, with much sweetness, the
following words, to the tune of Burns's Bonnie
Doon.
Ye natal hills! that softly throw
Around my soul, a mystic charm,
Oft have ye seen the former joys,
That did my youthful bosom warm;
When blest with Ellen's lovely smiles,
I stray'd your verdant scenes among,
As blithe a youth as ever raised,
On Irish plains, the rural song.
Ye elms that crown yon river's brink,
Ye little warblers of their boughs,
Why look so fair, why sing so gay,
Ye witnessed Ellen's broken vows!
Ye saw her lovely blushes spread,
As round her breast I would entwine;
But now a happier swain enjoys
Those dear delights that once were mine.
Ye blossomed boughs, and flow'rets sweet,
Ye breathe so fresh, and bloom so fair,
Ye mind me of my Ellen's charms,
When first she did my heart ensnare;
Ye mind me of the fickle maid,
Whose loss I ever must deplore;
For, ah! those dear departed joys,
I'll never, never prove them more!
The singing was finished, and the company
preparing
to depart, when two men on horseback
were perceived galloping with great speed along
the beach of the peninsula, opposite the islet. In
a few seconds, a body of ten or twelve
countrymen
,
in pursuit of them, also appeared, who on
seeing our party drew back; but not until they
had fired some shots at the fugitives, one of which
brought the foremost horseman to the ground. Our
party had brought some fowling pieces with them.
O'Halloran, Sir Francis, Edward and Martin, each
seized one, and ran immediately to the boat. In a
few minutes they were on the opposite shore, and
had rescued the wounded man and his companion
from their assailants. But what was their
astonishment
to find the fallen fugitive, no other than the
notorious
Sir Geoffrey Carebrow? Compassion
predominated
over resentment in their bosoms; and
without hesitation, they resolved to yield all the
relief
in their power to the man they had so much
reason
to detest. They instantly placed him in their
boat, and, at the earnest entreaty of his attendant,
the infamous Berwick, who represented that he had
no other mode of escaping from his pursuers, they
received him also on board. They had scarcely
regained
the Isle Muck shore, when they perceived
a man, waving a white handkerchief, running down
the declivity which led to the beach, towards
them. He soon reached the bottom, from whence
he suddenly ascended a high rock connected with
a headland which overlooked the islet, from which
it jutted, forming a kind of terrace, hanging over
the narrow strait that separated the two shores.
Approaching the edge of this, he stood still and
beckoned to our party, who advanced towards him.
He appeared to be a very large active man.
His head was wrapped in a red handkerchief,
wound round the forehead, extending down the
cheeks, and covering the chin, so as effectually to
conceal his features. He wore a short roundabout
of brown cloth, with buckskin breeches, and had a
leathern belt round his waist, from which was
suspended something like a sword or huge dagger.
When near enough to be distinctly heard, he
called
out, with a loud voice
Be joyous!be joyous! Do not interrupt
your pleasure. The blood, the tortures, the groans
of your countrymen pass for nothing. Be joyous
Follow your revels. Let the pleasant melody of
your flutes delight you; and let your pretty ladies
sing to you to wantonness. Why should you be
sad! The desolation, the ravaging, the
destructions
,
the burnings, the bayonetings, the shootings,
the hangings, the gibbetings, cannot reach you.
They are destined for us, an unpitied, execrated,
persecuted, proclaimed, outlawed, miserable race;
whose homes are ruined, whose families are
scattered
,
and whose heads are sold for a price. But
I am not come to reproach you. Among you, we
have friends, in whose safety we rejoice. But
why prevent us from taking a sweet revenge on
our enemies? They are also your enemies, and
have sworn lies to bring some of you to destruction;
and even now, when you return them good for
evil, gall is boiling in their hearts against you, and
they would rejoice if that isle would turn a
volcano
,
and swallow you in its flames, if they
themselves
could escape. They have hunted us here
in our hiding places, from hatred and from avarice;
for they would earn the price set upon us, while
their hearts would riot as in luxury, at the
spectacle
of our destruction. But although they were
strong, and we were weak; although they had a
band of soldiers in their train, we had prevailed
over them, and had you not interfered, their
carcases
would have soon bleached on the cliffs of the
Gabbons, a feast for the eagle and the seafowl. When
we first saw you there to-day, we took you for
enemies
looking for our concealments, and were about
sinking you, by sending a volley of balls through
your boat. But God prevented a deed for which we
would have sorely lamented. We described your
ladies
,
and concluded that your errand was pleasure,
and not treachery. We now know you, and ask
you to give up our enemies and yours. If you
will not, however, be joyous, we will not molest
you. But how can you feel joy in shielding the
murderer of Nelson from justice?
He paused as if he had asked a triumphant
question
,
and waited for an answer. O'Halloran waved
his hand, and endeavoured to address him in his
own wild style.
Hear me, cried he, and hear the voice of a
friend. Our enemy is now helpless, and in our
hands. We know his wickedness; we have felt
his villany, but his punishment does not belong to
us. We form no tribunal in the country. We
cannot
,
therefore, chastise the guilty. This man is
wounded; I fear, for your sakes I fear, mortally
wounded. We will try to save him that we may
do the duty which man owes to man; and also
that you may be free from his blood. If he dies,
I trust God will forgive you. To God alone,
vengeance
for such crimes as his, belongs.
Depart then, cried the man on the rock,
since you will have it so. This dagger, which I
hoped to have plunged into the heart of the
destroyer
of Nelson, since it cannot perform that
office
,
shall never perform another; and I shall never
have peace on earth, since I cannot have
vengeance
.
So saying, he ran to an angle of the rock, which
overhung the sea, and with a mighty force cast
the dagger from him. With the rapidity of a
thunderbolt
,
it whizzed through the air, and sunk to
the bottom. So sink to fathomless perdition the
betrayers of their country! exclaimed the man,
and he darted from his airy stand with the
headlong
speed of a falcon, towards his companions.
On his disappearance, O'Halloran informed the
astonished party, that he believed him to be M`
Cauley
,
one of M`Bride's assassins, and one of the
proclaimed
rebels, who had no mercy to expect. Poor
fellow; said he, with a sigh! his whole soul is
devoted
to an unfortunate cause; but a cause which
he conscientiously believes to be just. But how
did he allure Sir Geoffrey into this ambuscade?
said he, turning to Berwick, for Sir Geoffrey
himself
was unfit for conversation.
Here is a letter, replied Berwick, which
will explain that matter.
O'Halloran at once declared the hand writing
to be M`Cauley's. He read it aloud as follows:
Sir Geoffrey Carebrow is informed by the
writer of this, who wishes to share with him the
reward offered for the heads of M`Cauley,
Darragh
,
Archer, Kelly, and some others of the
proscribed
rebels, that if he will meet him at the
uninhabited
house near Isle Muck, to-morrow
afternoon
,
the writer will go with him, and point out
a cave amidst the cliffs of the Gabbons, where they
are secreted. This cave is accessible only by a
very intricate path, which will be discovered to
Sir Geoffrey. He may bring his servant Berwick
with him; but must bring no military, lest alarm
should be excited. The writer not wishing to be
known, if military be brought, or any other servant
than Berwick, whom he thinks trustworthy, he
will not appear.
Notwithstanding this caution, said Berwick,
my master brought fifty soldiers with him; but left
them about half a mile from the place of meeting, and
ordered me to accompany him there. The place
is just behind that hill. On our way, after leaving
the soldiers, I hinted to my master, that there might
be treachery in the affair. This seemed to alarm
him, but he persisted in going forward, saying that
the rebels were now too much frightened to do
any more mischief. Being well mounted, we soon
arrived in sight of the Old Ruins, where we were
to meet our unknown confederate, when perceiving
the muzzles of two guns projecting out of one of the
broken windows, my master's fear overcame his
resolution, and we turned round to fly; but our
flight towards the military was intercepted by a
number of armed men, who were advancing on us.
We had, therefore, nothing for it, but to take the
road to the beach, which we did in such terror,
that we scarcely knew whither we fled, and should
Vol. II. p
undoubtedly have fallen into their hands had not
your appearance checked their approach.
As Sir Geoffrey seemed to be in great torture,
our party hastened homeward with all the sail
their boat could carry, in order as soon as
possible
to procure for him more comfortable
accommodations
and surgical assistance; for they did not
conceive it safe or humane to reland him on the
peninsula, now the resort of his infuriated and
determined
enemies. It soon became so calm that
their sails were not of much service. They were
therefore, furled; and the servants set to the oars.
Sir Geoffrey becoming very faint, they gave him
some wine, and laid him on the bottom of the boat,
in as comfortable a position as their circumstances
would permit. His groans and ejaculations,
indicating
great torment of both mind and body, made
a strong and melancholy impression on all present,
especially the ladies. Cheerfulness, joy and mirth,
vanished, and anxiety, gloom, and compassion
occupied
their places.
In the mind of Ellen, as she saw her dreaded
persecutor, the arch enemy of her peace, and the
perjured betrayer of her grandfather's life, lying
before her in all the agonies of mental despair and
bodily pain, a suppliant for the compassion of those
who had suffered so much from his wickedness, a
mingled sensation of horror and pity arose,
accompanied
with an awful impression of the power of
Providence, in frustrating the machinations of the
wicked, and inflicting a just retribution for their
crimes. Her feelings on this subject, became so
intense, that she almost fainted, as she leaned on
the breast of her father; but tears, the holy tears
of heart-felt compassion, came to her relief.
Why do you weep, my child? asked her
father
.
Ah! father, she replied, in a low tone, I
have been overcome by reflecting on that signal
example now before us, of the certainty of vice
meeting
with punishment. That man's great wealth and
influence seemed to place his crimes beyond the
reach of human power to punish; but a mightier
power, one that can be neither eluded nor
withstood
,
has taken up the sword of justice. Oh! that
it may be exercised in mercy, and not in
proportion
to his guilt! I cannot but feel for his severe
anguish. He is one of God's creatures; and if his
crimes have been great, his sufferings also are
great.
Be comforted, my daughter, said Sir Francis,
in a soothing manner. This sight must indeed
be appalling to you. But remember that if God
punishes severely here, it is for gracious purposes
hereafter.
Edward who during this conversation, sat beside
her, did not utter a word. He was alarmed for
the effect of such a spectacle on her mind, and
became quite impatient for their reaching home.
He threw off his coat, and flew to one of the oars,
which was wrought by a man who seemed rather
fatigued; and putting to it his whole strength, gave
such an increased impulse to the boat's motion on
his side, that two men had to work the
corresponding
oar on the other, and the boat moved
through the water with almost double velocity.
The promontory of Ballygally soon drew near,
and the bay in which O'Halloran Castle is
situated
,
opened before them, and, in a short time the
boat rested along side of a small pier, where she
was usually kept.
Sir Geoffrey was immediately conveyed to that
Castle, which he had been so lately active in
damaging
,
and the generous hospitality of which, he
was now thankful to accept. Messages, at the same
time, were despatched to request the attendance
of Doctor Ferral, and Mr. M`Claverty. It was
thought desirable that the latter should be made
acquainted
with the circumstances of the case, lest
the government, or Sir Geoffrey's friends, might
imbibe any misapprehension on the subject. The
doctor attended immediately; and on examining
the wound, unequivocally declared that it would be
mortal. When informed of his situation, he became
greatly dismayed, and overcome with the dread of
death. When the first shock of his terror
somewhat
subsided, the propriety of sending for a
notary
and a clergyman was suggested to him. He
at first opposed this, but musing for a few minutes,
during an interval of ease which medicine now
procured for him, he ejaculated, Yes, it must be
so! My days are finished.Send for the Rev.
Mr. Nichols, and for any notary you think proper;
but let them come soon. In the meantime, request
Miss O'Halloran to speak with me. A dying man
cannot harm her; I wish her grandfather also to be
present.
With trembling steps, Ellen approached his
bedside
,
supported by O'Halloran.
This is kind in you, said Sir Geoffrey. I
have asked you here to request forgiveness from
you both, for the injuries I intended you. After
which I shall, with an easier mind, solicit the
forgiveness
of Heaven.
They both assured him, that they forgave him
with all their hearts.
Dost thou, fair lady, said he; thou whom I
loved more intensely than ever I did any of thy
sex; thou whom I so severely, so cruelly treated;
dost thou really say so? or is it only a fond
illusion
of my mind?
I do really say so, replied Ellen. I do
indeed
sincerely forgive you, and may Heaven
forgive
you also!
And you pray for me too, said he. Oh!
then, I may indeed hope; for Heaven will surely
hear the petition of innocence and virtue like thine.
Then turning to O'Halloran, he said much
injured
man, dare I hope that you also will pray for
your enemy?
Yes, replied O'Halloran. Unfortunate man,
fervently do I pray, that the Almighty will grant
you repentance, and pardon for all your crimes;
and he is able to pardon them, be they ever so
aggravated
and numerous.
And art thou he, exclaimed the
conscience-struck
criminal, to effect whose destruction, I did
not, in the height of my vengeful feelings, scruple
to sin against my soul? Ah! that lies heavy on
me!
For that too, said O'Halloran, I hope you
will be forgiven.
God bless you, cried the penitent, and hear
your prayers in my behalf. And oh! may you
never feel the pangs of conscience, which I now
feel.Oh! the stingthe fiery sting of conscience,
that burns within me.Oh! pity mepray for
me!but you have promised it, and you are not
liars; you are not perjured criminals like me!
O! my vile passions, revenge!lust!avarice!
to what have you brought me? You have brought
on mewretched mea load of guilt, greater than
I can bear.Oh! that murdered innocence!that
too was passion. Ellen, thou knowest of it.Didst
thou not once speak of it? But hushnothou
needst not hush; for God knows of it.Ah! I
could not hide it from him; and he is now my judge!
Oh! pray for me, pray for me, that he will have
mercy!but I had not mercy. She pleaded on
her knees for mercy; but I would not hear her.
Oh! there can be no mercy for me! O God of
justice thou art terrible!
Vol. II. p 2
He here convulsively covered his head, as if to
conceal from his view something too dreadful to
behold. Ellen could endure the scene no longer;
for she had never conceived of any thing so
appalling
as the horrible contortions of despair that
disfigured
Sir Geoffrey's countenance, and the wild
flashing terror that gleamed from his eyes. She
was therefore, obliged to withdraw from such a
distressing spectacle of human misery.
CHAP. XX.
Beside the bed where parting life is laid;
And sorrow, guilt and pain by turns dismayed;
The reverend champion stood. At his controul
Despair and anguish fled the struggling soul.
Comfort came down the trembling wretch to raise,
And his last faultering accents whispered praise.
Goldsmith
.
Prompt
to the calls of duty, the Rev. Mr. Nichols
soon arrived; and never had a sinner more need
of the consolations of the most merciful of all
religions
,
than the despairing object to whom they now
administered. No matter how great your crimes
may be, said the holy man, when he found Sir
Geoffrey
had become sufficiently calm to listen to him,
an infinite propitiationan omnipotent atonement
has been made for human guilt. Put your trust in
the great Redeemer, who died to ransom such as
you, from the effects of their transgressions, when
they feel a genuine contrition; and, acknowledging
their offences, throw themselves on his mercy for
pardon. Your penitence may be late; yet, it will
be accepted, if it be sincere. He who could
pardon
the malefactor on the cross, is the same to-day,
in power and in purpose, that he was then. Do
not think that he died and suffered in vain, or that
there can be any crime too great to be propitiated
by such a sacrifice. No, the sufferings and death
of the Son of God were a sufficient ransom for all
the crimes committed by ten thousand worlds,
although
each of them were ten thousand times more
heinous than the most heinous of yours. He who
pardoned the guilt of the royal adulterer and
murderer
,
he who cleansed away the abominations of
Menasseh, and forgave the cruelty of the
persecuting
Saul, can blot out your iniquities; and no one
who sincerely sought for his redemption ever
sought in vain: for he is long-suffering, and full of
kindness towards his creatures, and he has
expressly
said that, in the event of their repentance,
although their sins be as scarlet, he will make them
white as wool.
After this encouraging exhortation, followed by
a fervent and animated address to the throne of
Divine Mercy, the patient's mind became
considerably
composed, and, on the arrival of the notary,
he was in a capacity to go through the task of
arranging
his temporal affairs. This being
accomplished
,
he desired to see O'Halloran; and taking
from his pocket a key, he presented it to him,
together
with a newly written paper.
This key, said he, opens a small set of
ebony drawers, which you will find seated on a
shelf in the south-eastern angle of my library, and
this paper is a deed of gift of these drawers, and
all that they contain, with the exceptions I shall
immediately mention. This deed I now make over
to you in the presence of this notary. In the
drawers, there are testimonies of crimes I have
committed, of which, I hope, through the merits
and sufferings of my Redeemer, to obtain eternal
forgiveness; but the promulgation of which, while
it would do the world no good, would uselessly
bring ruin on the reputation, and embitter the lives
of several individuals, who may have yet long to
live. The exceptions to which I have alluded, are
three certificates of money I possess in the national
funds, which are to be disposed of as mentioned in
my will. Every thing else contained in these
drawers of value, or not of value, is bequeathed to
you.
O'Halloran assured him that he would
cheerfully
take charge of these things; and endeavour
to fulfil his intentions, as far as lay in his power,
concerning them, and concerning all other matters
that might be entrusted to his care. The patient
was then left quiet, and the anguish of both his
mind and body being greatly relieved, he fell into
a slumber, which, although an uneasy one,
continued
till near the morning. When M`Claverty
arrived, he was awake and considerably distressed
from a recurrence of his bodily pain.
In the name of heaven? exclaimed M`Claverty,
on entering and seeing the ghastly countenance of
Sir Geoffrey, how has this happened?
My evil career has been cut short, replied Sir
Geoffrey. I was shot at yesterday by a parcel
of men, I believe some of the outlawed rebels,
whose place of concealment I was endeavouring to
discover. A ball has entered beneath my ribs, and
I feel that my existence here will soon terminate.
Shall I write this down? asked the magistrate,
as your declaration of the means by which you
came by the accident.
You may, and I will sign it, was the reply.
This being done, he again fell into a slumber, which
his pain did not permit to continue long; and he
awoke with the hand of death upon him. He
requested
to see Ellen. When she entered his
bedchamber
,
Bless me, fair saint, said he, and I shall die
contented.
May the God of Heaven bless you, she replied,
while the tears filled her eyes, and take you to
himself.
Amen! he tried to utter, but the word died on
his lips; and he sank back on the pillow, in the
agony of death. Ellen gave a scream of terror, and
was led from the appalling sight, almost senseless
with horror. In a few minutes Sir Geoffrey was no
more.
On investigating the circumstances of the case,
the coroner's inquest gave a verdict of killed by a
gunshot wound, received from some person
unknown
,
but supposed to be one of the rebels now
in a state of proscription.
After the funeral, the notary signified to Messrs.
O'Halloran, M`Claverty, and Wilson, that they
were appointed by the deceased, executors of his
last testament, and requested their attendance the
next day, at Carebrow Hall, in order that the
manner
in which he had disposed of his property might
be made known to all whom it concerned. They
accordingly met, and the will was read in the
presence
of all the testators and relatives who could
conveniently attend, of whom a married sister, and
two female cousins, both married, were the nearest
of kin.
His whole property, both real and personal,
was bequeathed to his sister, with the exceptions
mentioned in the will, of which the principal was
his government stock, amounting to 150,000, for
which he held three different debentures. The first
marked No. 1, for seventy thousand pounds, he
bequeathed to Ellen, as an atonement for the
persecutions
his uncontrollable passion had obliged her
to sustain. The others were to be equally divided
between his two cousins. The ebony drawers
with all they contained, excepting these
debentures
,
being bequeathed to O'Halloran, he
proceeded
according to the express direction of the
will to examine them in private. In the first
drawer
,
he opened, he found the debentures. In the
second, he found the mortgage which he had
given for sixty thousand pounds on his own estate.
He immediately relocked the drawers, and
returning
to the company, desired so much of the
will to be a second time read, as would enable him
clearly to understand the testator's meaning, in
bequeathing
to him the ebony drawers, and their
contents. This being done,
Gentlemen, said he to the other executors, I
am so delicately situated, with respect to this
legacy that my judgment cannot, at once, decide
how to act. I shall, however, be governed by your
opinions. I borrowed, as is now publicly known,
a large sum from the deceased, and gave him, for
security, a mortgage on my landed property, which
mortgage, to my astonishment, I find in one of these
drawers.
Then it is undoubtedly your's, observed
M`Claverty. This explains the mystery of his
anxiety to give you the key of these drawers,
before
he died, and, perhaps too, of his requisition
that you should examine them privately, lest some
interested person might displace that important
paper.
I am not clear on that point, returned
O'Halloran
.
This instrument might have been there
without it recurring to his memory, when he
dictated
the will. For you are aware of the dreadful
state of mind he was in at that time.
But, replied M`Claverty if he could
recollect
where he kept the government securities, he
might, it is to be presumed, easily recollect where
he kept your mortgage.
Gentlemen, interrupted the notary, with your
permission, I can, at once, decide this controversy.
When writing that part of the will, the deceased
declared to me that his intention was to give up to
Mr. O'Halloran the incumbrance that he held on
his property. He added, that he took this method
of doing so, as he felt a repugnance to mention this
mortgage in a will which might become public,
and, at all events, would go down to the posterity
of his relatives; for in several transactions
connected
with it, he had not acted in a manner
satisfactory
to his conscience.
Since that is the case, said O'Halloran, I
believe
I need not scruple to avail myself of this
unexpected
kindness of the deceased, who had an
undoubted
right to dispose of this part of his
property
as he pleased.
Upon my soul, exclaimed M`Claverty, you
seem as much afraid of touching what is decidedly
your own, as if you were committing theft. But
I wish you joy of your good fortune, and on
account
of this business, I shall, notwithstanding all
his faults, respect the testator's memory as long as
I live.
The government debentures being now
produced
,
each of the female cousins received that
appropriated
to her; and at the desire of his
co-executors
,
O'Halloran placed that bequeathed to Ellen
in his pocket-book, and in company with Mr.
Wilson
,
returned home on horseback, ordering his
servants to follow with the ebony bureau in the
carriage.
That evening after tea, Mrs. Brown had left the
room on some domestic business, and Martin had
accompanied Miss Agnew on a ramble into the
fields. Edward and Ellen, were therefore left to
the unobserved and delicious enjoyment of their
own society. They had been for sometime
conversing
on late events, and were now indulging
their imagination, in sketching scenes of future
felicity
,
of which they were to be long in the
enjoyment
;
or, in other words, they were building
delightful
Castles in the air, when O'Halloran
entered. The baseless fabrics immediately
dissolved; and the lovers on again descending
to the earth, found themselves in the midst of a
castle of more durable materials; one whose rocky
foundations and strongly cemented massive walls
of stone and lime, had already withstood the
pressure
of several centuries, and were likely to
withstand
that of several more.
When O'Halloran approached, My love! said
he to Ellen, since God has, I hope, removed to
himself, the man who lately so much disturbed
your peace, I trust that any resentment you may
ever have felt against him, is buried in his grave;
and that you harbour no wish injurious to his
memory.
She looked steadfastly in his face, and repeated,
harbour, a wish injurious to his memory? No,
my grandfather, my worst wish concerning him is
that his soul may now be in Paradise.
For that sentiment, dear, forgiving girl, then,
said he, receive this; and he handed her the
paper by which she became a government creditor,
to the amount of seventy thousand pounds. This
shows, at least, that he wished to make some
atonement
for what he caused you to suffer. He has
bequeathed you this.
She looked at the paper for several seconds,
as if involved in some doubt concerning it. And
am I free to receive this legacy? she asked.
As perfectly free, he replied, as if I had
myself willed it to you, on my death-bed.
Edward here started as if from a reverie. Miss
Hamilton, said he, if your grandfather has no
objection, I wish just now to speak with you a
moment on this subject by ourselves.
With all my heart, said O'Halloran; but
remember that it is not in the power of Sir
Geoffrey's
executors to make any other disposal of this
property. So fastidiousness may only occasion
unnecessary
perplexity.
I shall counsel her to accept it, replied
Edward
;
and O'Halloran immediately withdrew.
Vol. II. Q
As I trust, said the young lover, to the
mistress
of his heart, when they were aloneAs
I trust that your fortune and mine, will soon be the
same, for a letter containing my father's consent
to my happiness, I expect daily, I hope that it will
not be considered officiousness in me to suggest my
wishes respecting your disposal of this legacy; for
I perceive that you must receive it, although you
are not obliged to keep it. My fortune does not
require any addition. My present income,
independent
of my friends, is ample, even for the support
of splendour; and the entailed estates of my father
and my uncle, for the latter it is not likely will
ever marry, will, in the course of time, descend to
us or ours. But your grandfather is involved in
a large debt to the estate of this very Sir Geoffrey,
who has made you so considerable a legatee, and
it would almost appear that he had done so to
enable
you to relieve from this incumbrance, a man
whom he had so seriously injured.
It is right! Edward, she replied. How kind
you are to advise me thus? My grandfather's debts
shall be discharged immediately out of this sum.
Let us hasten to him, for I shall not be easy until
it be done.
O'Halloran had gone to his library. They
followed
him, Ellen still holding the paper in her
hand. What, said he, as he saw them
approaching
,
have you decided already? I see you
are a persuasive adviser, Mr. Barrymore.
Grandfather! said Ellen, running to him, and
catching him by the hand, you must grant me
one request.
Be assured, my dear, he returned, that I
shall grant you any thing in reason.
In reason, or out of reason, she observed,
you must grant me this one.
That is very provoking, Ellen, you did not use
to be so unconscionable. But what would you have?
my child.
I would have you to receive this, said she,
presenting him the government note.
If it be to manage it for you, I shall receive it
with pleasure? he replied.
No, said she, manage it for yourself, my
grandfather. I do not wish Sir Geoffrey's
successors
to have any claim upon you.
They have no claim upon me, he replied.
But, if they had, do you think I would rob you
to satisfy them? No, I would rather sell my last
acre.
Are you not largely indebted to Sir Geoffrey's
heirs? she asked.
I do not owe them a fraction, my child, he
answered. But I cannot, indeed, I cannot bear
this! Here tears of fondness and joy swelled in
his eyes. Your affection makes your old
grandfather
weep like a babe. Come to my arms, and
let me embrace the daughter, the delight of my old
age. So saying he impressed a parental kiss on
her glowing cheek, and sat down for a few seconds,
to recover from his agitation. Then again rising,
Edward!Ellen! said he, catching a hand of
each, and joining them; may your children, and
your children's children, love you with a love like
this, and make your hoary age as happy as you
now make mine!
Thank you, father, for this inestimable gift,
cried Edward; and forgetting himself in the
delirium
of the moment, Permit me too to embrace
such excellence, said he to Ellen, and he also
impressed
a burning kiss on her cheek ere she was
aware. In an instant, she burst from his embrace,
and ran to conceal her confusion in an
anti-chamber
.
Edward immediately perceived that he had acted
rudely, and had given offence, and heartily
condemning
himself, he begged O'Halloran to
intercede
for his pardon.
I am mad! cried he; I have insulted an
angel
.
I know not what I am doing.
Young man! said O'Halloran, I confess you
are rather vehement. But, be at ease, I shall try
to procure your forgiveness.
He then sought Ellen, and leading her back into
Edward's presenceYou must forgive this rash
youth, said he, for I set him the example; and
he only forgot that he had not the weight of nearly
threescore years on his head, to entitle him to such
privileges.
Pardon me, Miss Hamilton! said Edward,
imploringly
.
By Heavens! you know I would
rather
cut off my right hand than offer you an
intentional
insult.
Well, sir, said she, to please my grandfather,
I will overlook this piece of folly. But you must
remember never to treat me again with such
disrespect
!
Never, never, my beloved! he exclaimed, as
he fervently kissed the hand she held out to him
in token of reconciliation.
Well! said O'Halloran, seating himself on a
chair, and laughing heartily at themWhat
fools you are! what a love-scene you have acted
in the presence of an old man! It will be well for
you if I do not discover the whole to Miss Agnew.
She would, undoubtedly, divert young Martin with
it for a month to come.
They both begged that he would not mention
the incident, it was so ridiculous, and was now no
more to be thought of by themselves. He
cautioned
them to keep their own secret, and he should
certainly not betray them.
But! said Ellen, wishing to turn the
conversation
into another channel, You refuse my offer;
may I ask the reason?
Because, my child, said O'Halloran, I do
not need it. I have a clear income of five
thousand
a year, which is more than enough for an old
widower of fifty-nine, who has no longer any
ambition
to become conspicuous in the world.
How is this! grandfather, said she, pardon
my enquiry, for you know your welfare is
necessary
to mine.
I know it, my daughter, and shall satisfy you.
He then produced the mortgage, and informed
them that he also was a legatee of Sir Geoffrey, at
least to the amount mentioned in that instrument,
but to how much more he did not himself know, as
he had not yet examined all the ebony drawers.
Then, sir, said she, I suppose I must keep
my legacy.
I suppose so, he replied; and I shall just
mention one thing to you, my daughter, not for the
purpose of stifling the feelings of generosity in
your bosom, which I hope will ever remain active
there, but to remind you that property honestly
obtained, should not be thrown away;you may
have children, and grandchildren.
Edward and she instinctively exchanged looks
full of meaning and emotion, and in much
confusion
she hastily left their presence.
Vol. II. q 2
CHAP. XXI.
My safety thy fair truth shall be,
As sword and buckler serving;
My life shall be more dear to me,
Because of thy preserving;
Let peril come, let horror threat,
Let thundering cannons rattle;
I fearless seek the conflict's heat,
Assured when on the wings of love,
To Heaven above,
Thy fervent orisons are flown,
The tender prayer
Thou putt'st up there,
Shall call a guardian angel down,
To watch me in the battle.
Popular Song
.
That very evening one of O'Halloran's servants
brought from the post-office, a letter to Edward
from his father, and one to Sir Francis Hamilton
from the Lord Lieutenant. Edward's was as
follows
:
My SonA few days ago, I received from you
a very foolish letter, requesting me to consent to
your marriage with a woman I never saw, nor,
until
that very moment, ever heard of. I took, of
course, some pains to inquire concerning her, and
her connexions. The only person from whom I
could obtain much information, is your old
mendicant
protagee, who praises her in a style that I
cannot well understand; but from which I can
gather that she is a great beauty. I presume,
therefore, that in the ardour of your admiration,
you have endowed her with angelic qualities, for
in the eyes of every love-sick young man who has
a handsome mistress, she cannot be aught else
than an angel.
But, sir, how does it happen that you could
suppose your father as easily blinded as yourself
on such a subject? or how could you imagine that
bright eyes and a fine complexion, could make up
in my estimation for obscurity of birth, and
rebellious
connexions;for I understand that the lady in
question, is daughter to an outlaw, and
granddaughter
to a rebel; and a rebel too of the very worst
stamp; one whose influence in the country has been
wilfully perverted from preserving its tranquillity to
promoting its destruction. How could the loyal,
the virtuous, the patriotic Edward Barrymore, he
of whose promising talents and acquirements, his
friends have been hitherto so proud, degrade
himself
,
and the family whose representative he is, by
such a connexion?
I speak nothing of the lady's want of fortune,
although I am informed that her grandfather, on
whom she totally depends, has mortgaged his
property
for more than it is worth, for the wicked
purpose
too of procuring supplies for the rebel armies.
If ever the fomenter of a country's ruin deserved
death, this jacobinical old man, according to all
accounts
,
did so. But your boyish and imprudent
attachment for a handsome face, interfered and
snatched him from justice. When I first heard of
that affair, I was silly enough to approve of your
conduct, as I ascribed it to a generous impulse of
humanity and gratitude for one who had, as it is
reported, saved your life. But I now see that a
foolish passion for a pretty girl, was at the bottom
of your apparent benevolence. What your uncle
will say on this subject, I cannot tell, for I have not
yet communicated it to him. But as he scarcely
approved of your interference in behalf of the old
rebel, I presume he will utterly disapprove of your
intention to contaminate the purity of your
family
blood, by marrying the granddaughter.But
enough on this subject.
Ah! sir, is it a time for any of the house of
Barrymore to bask indolently in the rays of
beauty
,
or in the enjoyment of female blandishments,
when the fabric of society is tottering to its very
foundations? When your country is assailed at
once by domestic traitors and foreign invaders,
ought you, in the vigour of youth and activity, to
desert her cause, and lie supinely sunk under the
fascinations of love and luxury?
I call on you, I order you, to throw off your
disgraceful chains and fly to the standard of your
king and country. The French have landed, in
what force it is not exactly known, on the
Connaught
coast. But it is certain that they will form
a rallying point for insurrection. It is said that
the peasantry have already swelled their ranks to
a countless multitude. I take the field to-morrow,
as commander of a regiment of cavalry, in which
I have preserved for you the rank of a captain.
Cornwallis has placed himself at the head of the
troops; and I trust that we shall all exhibit a zeal
and soldier-like conduct, worthy of our cause, and
of such a renowned commander.
I shall expect you to join us, wherever we
may be encamped, in a week at farthest from this
date; and, if you do your duty on this occasion,
as becomes you, your late errors will be forgiven,
by your indulgent father,
THOMAS BARRYMORE.
The Lord Lieutenant's letter required Sir
Francis
Hamilton's immediate attendance on the army.
* * * * * * * * * At what an awful crisis,
said he, have I been entrusted with the
government
of this unfortunate country? Treason,
rebellion
,
massacre, and invasion, have shaken her to
pieces, and have prostrated her into the depth of
misery.
I remember you were ever proud of being an
Irishman. Show yourself now worthy of the name,
and fly to the standard which is raised for the
preservation of whatever your country yet
possesses
of law, order, civilization, and rational
freedom
.
I want such men as you about me. Your
counsels whether as a statesman or a soldier, to
me will be valuable; and they will be the more
acceptable, as I know that they will be given with
uprightness, and with the feelings not only of a wise
man, but of an Irishman, anxious for the safety
and welfare of his country.
I hope you have, before this time, availed
yourself
of the exertion of the executive prerogative
which I made in your favour. I need not say how
happy I felt at being thus able to pay the debt of
gratitude under which you laid me on that terrible
night at Yorktown, when the furious American
colonel
,
Scammel, made his desperate attack on our
defences. On that dreadful night, his brandished
weapon hovered over my head, and would have
cut short my existence, had you not heroically
interposed
and clove him to the earth.
I could, with much gratification, dwell longer
on those trans-atlantic subjects; but with me time
is now precious; and I hasten to request you to
lose none in coming to resume your former station
in my military household, as my confidential
aid-de-camp
.
I have with true and undiminished esteem, the
honour to be, &c.
CORNWALLIS.
Edward and Sir Francis made hasty
preparations
to set off, in obedience to these requisitions,
the next morning.
Edward saw that, with respect to Ellen, his
father
had received some gross misrepresentations,
which caused him, in the mean time, to labour
under several grieviously mistaken impressions, but
which he knew that, at their first interview, he
could, by a simple statement of the truth, easily
remove. He did not, therefore, think proper to
disclose to either her or her friends, this part of the
intelligence he had received; for, besides his
reluctance
to wound their feelings, he did not wish
to occasion a renewal of O'Halloran's interdiction,
to address her on the subject of love, which
interdiction
he had just withdrawn, under the conviction
that, from the nature of her present circumstances,
her future prospects, and recently discovered
parentage
,
there was but little danger of the
Barrymores
offering much opposition to the intended
union.
Ellen was much agitated on parting with her
lover. You are going, said she, into danger.
I may never see you again. Oh! I thoughtI
presumptuously
thought, that all my misfortunes were at
an endbut I may yet have the greatest that could
befall me, to endure. And my father tooto be
torn from me. Oh! Heaven grant that I may not
have just found him only to lose him forever!
Dearest Ellen, replied her lover, be
comforted
.
This new disturbance, this daring invasion
will not be long able to withstand the power that
shall be led to its suppression under the direction of
such an able commander. When we shall have
driven our enemies from the country, no
impediment
,
my love, will then exist to the completion of
our happiness. I must now assist my country to
the best of my abilities; but fear not but that I shall
soon return safe and victorious, and shall then
claim her fairest daughter as the dear reward of
my services.
Go, then, my Edward; and, if my unceasing
prayers can prevail on Heaven to protect thee,
thou shalt indeed return safe and uninjured.
Then, my love, said he, heaven, I am
assured
,
will hear thy prayers; and I shall have
nothing
to fear.
They now exchanged vows of lasting fidelity;
and Ellen retired to seek sympathy from the
friendship of Miss Agnew. But Miss Agnew was
in almost as much need of a comforter as herself.
She had just taken a tender farewell of Martin,
who had resolved, in this alarming juncture, to
volunteer his services to the government.
Sir Francis requested Jemmy Hunter to
accompany
him, as his attendant, to which he readily
agreed after a reluctant and weeping consent was
obtained from his Peggy, to whom he gave a
tender
embrace at parting; and with a full and manly
heart said, may God keep you and the wean,
frae a' ill till I see you again!
With her child, (which was now about six weeks
old) in her arms, she followed him to the door.
You were aye kind to me, Jemmy, said she,
half choaked with grief, but you are noo gaun in
a lawfu' cause, and in guid company. May Grace
gae wi' ye!an' may He keep you that can keep
you, an' bring you safe back to your wife an'
wean! She then retired to offer up to heaven, in
simple but fervent language, the artless wishes of
her soul for the husband of her affections, the
father
of her child.
As Jemmy rode to the castle to join the
gentlemen
,
previous to their departure, he thought
intensely
of his Peggy. Gude keep her for a guid
creature, and the wee helpless weanhow it
looked
at me! Here a few tears swelled in his eyes.
But I maunna be such a chicken as this, thought
he, and he wiped them off with a courageous
resolution
,
that they should have no successors.
CHAP. XXII.
Success to the land that gave Patrick his birth,
The land of the oak, and its neighbouring earth,
Where grow sprigs of shillelah and shamrocks so green.
May the sons of the Thames, the Tweed and the Shannon,
Thrash the foes that would plant on their confines a cannon,
United and happy, at liberty's shrine,
May the rose and the thistle long flourish and twine,
Round the sprig of shillelah and shamrock so green,
Popular Song
.
The
French under the command of general
Humbert, an experienced and active officer of
revolutionary
origin, landed about the middle of
August
,
to the number of between eleven and twelve
hundred men, at Killala, in the west of the island.
They brought with them a large quantity of arms
and warlike stores of every description, for the
supply of the multitude of insurgents, whom they
expected immediately to join their standard; and, in
some degree, they were not disappointed; although
the conciliatory measures so prudently adopted by
the new administration, prevented their hopes from
being altogether realized.
Landing in a Catholic district, they were indeed
joined by a considerable number of the more
zealous
of the lower orders of that persuasion; but
they were denied the more efficient aid of the
influential
and wealthy portion of the community,
who had universally embraced the terms of the
late proclamation of indemnity, and remained at
peace.
Vol. II. r
The French, with their Irish auxiliaries, soon
advanced upon Castlebar, the capital of Mayo, the
county in which they landed, and there briskly
attacked and defeated general Lake, who
commanded
a small division of the royal troops. This
success opened their way into the interior of the
country, and, besides increasing the number of
their insurgent allies, spread consternation among
all ranks of the royalists throughout the kingdom.
Cornwallis, however, was soon on his march at
the head of ten thousand men, in order to wrest its
short lived triumph from the invading standard.
He was about three day's march from the
metropolis
,
when Edward Barrymore and his friends
joined him. Sir Francis Hamilton received from
the Lord Lieutenant all that cordial and friendly
welcome, which, from his knowledge of that
nobleman's
warmth of heart, he expected; and was
immediately appointed to the office which he had
been solicited to accept. Edward's father was so
well pleased with his orders having been so
promptly obeyed, that he received his son with
much kindness.
This is right, Edward, said he, taking him
aside, you will now have a more honourable
employment
than sighing at the feet of a woman.
Ah! sir, replied Edward, you do not know
that woman, otherwise you would not speak so
lightly of her.
So you think, foolish boy. I see she has you
still in her chains. But I shall not at present
reproach
you. I indeed admire your obedience and
zeal on this occasion the more, that I perceive
what they have cost you. But when you choose
a wife, if you would please me, you must choose
one well connected.
Oh father, this lady's connexions are not
properly
known to you.
I have heard of them.
But permit me to say that you have heard
misrepresentations.
Was not her grandfather a rebel chief,
condemned
to the gallows?
Yes, sir; but deservedly pardoned. He was
always virtuous, humane, and honourable.
Is her father not an outlaw for murder?
No, sir!
And what is he?
His name is Sir Francis Hamilton.
What! he who came here to-day with you, and
whom his excellency esteems so much?
The same is Ellen Hamilton's father.
Why, I was told that O'Halloran is her name,
and that her grandfather to save her from the
disgrace
of bearing that of a murderer, gave her his
own.
He gave it to her from affection, as he brought
her up from her infancy, her father having had to
fly the country.
It is true then, he was an outlaw?
Yes, but not for murder. His wife's honour
was assailed by a villain. For her he fought, as,
in similar circumstances, you would have done, and
conquered.
Well, my son, we shall speak more of this
hereafter
,
he said, perceiving the Lord Lieutenant
and Sir Francis Hamilton advancing towards them.
Mr. Barrymore, said his excellency, permit
me to become acquainted with your son, of whom
my friend, Sir Francis Hamilton, whom I beg
leave to introduce to you, speaks so highly. The
introduction having taken place, the party
accompanied
Lord Cornwallis to his quarters.
They had scarcely sat down, when an express
arrived with intelligence that the enemy had
penetrated
as far as Tuam, in the county of Gallway,
little more than a day's march distant, where they
had chosen ground for an encampment, which they
had commenced entrenching, as if they intended
there to await an attack. Their number was not
ascertained, but, including the French, it was
supposed
to be nearly twenty thousand.
Orders to move forward, were immediately
issued. The trumpets sounded, the drums beat to
arms, and in a few minutes the army resumed its
march.
The honourable Thomas Barrymore at the head
of a squadron of horse, led the van. His son had
a station assigned to him in the same corps, in
order
that he might be near his father.
That night brought them within ten miles of the
enemy; and, at about nine o'clock the next
morning
,
they perceived the insurrectionary banners in
the vicinity of the tri-coloured flag, floating in the
air on the opposite hill, about a mile distant, which
was covered with a countless multitude, but who
were evidently, with the exception of the French,
quite destitute of every thing like military
discipline
.
Humbert had indeed made every arrangement
in his power, to repel the formidable attack which
he knew he was about to sustain; and something
like a regular division of his forces into four bodies
appeared to have taken place. His own men
were in the centre, where the ground was most
accessible. Behind them, and on each side, large
bodies of the Irish, covering almost the whole
rising ground, were placed. The French artillery
was stationed at intervals along the front of their
line.
Between the two armies there was a low broken
hedge, along which, on the side next the royal
army, ran a small stream, but which, at this time,
owing to a long series of dry weather, contained
very little water. However much assured of
victory
,
the military caution of Cornwallis, would not
permit him to make the attack until he had
ascertained
the most practicable spot for passing the
obstruction with his cavalry.
For this purpose he despatched colonel
Barrymore
,
with a party of about fifty horsemen, up the
streamlet, while another trusty officer, with a
similar
party, went on the same errand in the opposite
direction. Edward attended his father on this
duty, and Jemmy Hunter who had, on his arrival
at the camp, obtained permission to join the
cavalry
,
was also of the party.
The detachment which went down the stream
soon found such a passage as their general wanted;
and immediately returned. As the Barrymore
detachment
,
therefore, gained the brow of a small
hill, about half a mile distant from where they had
set out, they heard the royal trumpets sounding;
and immediately a heavy cannonade was
commenced
by the king's troops, reciprocated almost
instantly by their opponents. Knowing by this,
that the object of their search was elsewhere
discovered
,
they were about returning to their former
station, when they observed a body of about a
hundred and fifty insurgent horsemen descending
the hill, leading from the extremity of the enemy's
right, and approaching towards them at full speed.
They immediately formed into a compact body,
and riding briskly among the insurgents, whose
very speed had deranged their order, if they had
ever possessed any, in a few minutes put them to
flight with considerable loss. They had scarcely
pursued the fugitives to the bottom of the hill,
when two men on horseback were perceived
rushing
furiously down in order to rally them. One of
these men in particular displayed great energy.
With a drawn sabre he endeavoured to arrest the
Vol. II. R 2
progress of those who seemed resolved to fly past
him, exclaiming, Cowards! see what a handful of
men you fly from! Turn, for heaven's sake, and
fight. This day decides the fate of your country.
Follow me; if ye are men, follow me!
Only about thirty of the most resolute reined
their horses and followed him, as foremost and
almost
alone, he rushed on his opponents. The
first and second of Barrymore's horsemen he met
scarcely obstructed his flying speed. He gave
each only a passing blow with his sabre, by which
he clove them from their horses, as if he had
struck twigs from their stems. Opposition seemed
to give way before him; and, almost unobstructed,
he directed his fearful course towards colonel
Barrymore
.
Edward, alarmed for his father's safety, galloped
forward to arrest the death-blow, which he saw
aimed against him; but ere he could prevent it,
that blow was given, and his father had fallen.
With uncontrollable fury, he rushed to meet his
terrible antagonist, who perceived him, while he
was yet some paces distant; and redashing his
spurs into his horse, darted towards him.
The horses met with a dreadful momentum, and
were both overthrown. But in an instant, their
riders had gained their feet. The same instant
they recognised each other, and paused, as if
surprise
had for a moment paralyzed their strength.
Edward first exclaimed, M`Cauley!
Barrymore
!
was the immediate reply.
That moment Edward heard a groan from his
father as some person raised him from the ground.
Villain! die! you have killed my father, he
shouted, flying with the force and agility of a lion
on his antagonist, who, however, coolly parried the
attack without returning it, crying out, at the same
time,
By the life of him you saved from the gallows!
Barrymore, I will not hurt you, if you should
slay me on the spot.
An instinctive feeling of reluctance to destroy a
man thus voluntarily throwing himself in his
power
,
occasioned Edward to desist from the attack.
Another of the insurgents now rode forward, crying
out, Slay him, M`Cauley! Down with the young
traitor. Had you slain him when I advised you,
at the Point Rock, you would not now have to
fight him. But, by God! there's another traitor
that I'll smite to the earth.
He had that moment seen Jemmy Hunter, who
was advancing to Edward's assistance. He hastened
towards him, exclaiming, Accursed villain! I owe
you a deadly debt. Receive this! But before he
could wield his weapon, Jemmy's sabre had fallen
with well-aimed and resistless force, on his neck;
and his head hung half severed from his body, as
if a school-boy's wand had broken down the head
of a thistle, and he immediately reeled from his
horse.
Darragh! you were owre lang a gettin' this,
cried Jemmy. Had I gein ye't a twal month
ago in M`Gorley's stable in Larne, ye would hae
gane to your lang hame wi' fewer sins on your
head.
Is it you, traitor! cried M`Cauley; but you
shall pay for it; and he aimed a fierce and sudden
blow at Hunter. But the stroke was dexterously
avoided, although it did not fall without mischief,
for Hunter's horse received it in his neck, and
tumbled to the ground. M`Cauley would have
repeated the blow with fatal effect, had not
Edward
sprung forward, and struck the falling blade
with such force that it almost forsook its owner's
grasp.
Desperate wretch! cried he, will you
commit
another murder in my sight, and expect I will
look tamely on it? Ah! hear you my father's
groans? O Heaven! he has been slain by an
assassin
a
monster!
Assassin! reiterated M`Cauley, assuming the
countenance of a fiendBy Heaven! that word
has sealed thy doom.Away with it! cried he,
as if he was discharging some troublesome feeling
that seemed tenaciously to harbour in his breast;
away!all regard for the preserver of
O'Halloran
is now fled.
So saying, he withdrew a step backwards, as if
to come forward with a surer aim, and redoubled
force. Edward met him with equal force; and
his father's groans still ringing in his ears, with a
higher degree of rage than he had ever before felt.
Fury flashed from the eyes of both, and when
their weapons met the clash shook the air, the fiery
sparks fell around them, and they both reeled with
the concussion.
Edward was an expert and educated
swordsman
;
and he now applied his science for his
safety
.
A forward thrust by M`Cauley, who
conceived
that he had a fair opportunity for such a
manuvre, was so well observed and so dexterously
turned aside, that the weapon passed without doing
injury, while Edward's was instantly buried in his
antagonist's body, who fell, but uttered not a groan.
Edward immediately ran to his father, whom
he found almost speechless. But on hearing his
son's voice he faintly uttered, Pursue the
enemy
!
A sense of public duty rushed on Edward's
mind, and mounting the horse of a man whom he
ordered to remain with his father to support him
and keep his wound staunched, he galloped after
his men, who had again discomfited the insurgent
party, and were just commencing a new pursuit.
Having followed them to the very verge of their
camp, which was now getting fast into confusion,
he withdrew them back to the scene of his late
action
,
in good order, no attempt being made by the
enemy to follow them.
Indeed by this time the attention of the
insurgents
all over the hill was principally engaged in
providing for their own safety. Cornwallis had
ordered a large party of both horse and foot to
march by the passage over the stream, that had
been discovered as before mentioned, for the
purpose
of out flanking the enemy's left, while his
powerful artillery continued to commit great havoc
among them in front. As soon as this detachment
reached its destination, and opened its fire, the
insurgents
on the whole of the left and rear of the
French, fled in all directions, and were pursued
with a too terrible slaughter by the cavalry.
General Humbert seeing that it was in vain to
resist longer, hoisted the white flag. The firing
immediately ceased on both sides, and after a short
negociation, the French having lost about one third
of their number, surrendered themselves prisoners of
war. The insurgents to the right of the French,
now followed the example of those who had
occupied
the left; and in a short time, there was no
enemy to be seen on the field.
Being persuaded that the rebels were
thoroughly
dispersed, and that there was no danger of them
rallying again to give any more disturbance, from
motives of humanity, the viceroy soon ordered the
pursuit to cease, so that this complete and decisive
victory, which terminated the disasterous
insurrection
of 1798, was achieved with far less bloodshed
than from the numbers arrayed on both sides,
previous
to the engagement, could have been
expected
.
This was undoubtedly owing to the judicious
and humane plan which the viceroy took to
disperse
the insurgents, rather by intimidation than
actual slaughter, in which he completely
succeeded
,
as well as to his ordering the pursuit to be so
soon relinquished. It was fortunate also, that there
were few such resolute and daring men among the
Southern conspirators as M`Cauley, otherwise the
resistance, and consequently the slaughter, would
have been infinitely greater. That unfortunate
man, on hearing of the landing of the French, had
left his concealment at the Gabbons, and, in
company
with Darragh, and eight or nine more of the
proscribed Northerns, joined the invaders on their
march from Castlebar to Tuam. These men all
met with their death in this engagement.
When Edward had obtained accommodations
for his father in the house of a gentleman in the
neighbourhood, and had left him under surgical
care, he returned with Jemmy Hunter to where
M`Cauley and Darragh lay, in order to ascertain
their fate. The latter was dead. He had died
almost instantly, his head, as has been already
observed
,
having been nearly separated from his
body. The former was still alive; but very much
exhausted.
Edward proposed that he should be carried to a
house, and receive the care of a surgeon; but to
this he would not consent.
Here, said he, is the most honourable place
for me to die, and I rejoice that my death has
been occasioned by honourable hands. My life
was rendered miserable, but my spirits were never
depressed; nor was I ever so irresolute as to
abandon my purpose, for fear of dying an
ignominious
death;and Providence has been kinder
to me than I perhaps deserved. I have not always
squared my actions by the rules of conduct, or the
notions of morality generally adopted by men. An
instinctive perceptionsome might call it the
impulse
of feeling, but I have flattered myself that it
was the dictate of conscience that generally directed
me in my path, and pointed out what I should do. To
neglect the inspirations of this instinct, which I had
made my guide, I considered as great a crime as
to infringe the prohibitions of a divine law; and
the most questionable action of my life, the
destruction
of M`Bride, I considered a positive duty,
because it was suggested by this regulator of my
conduct.
Mr. Barrymore, I die because I was an
assassin
,
as you please to term it; for had you not
enraged me by pronouncing a word which I
considered
an insult, I should not have fought you;
and you would not have slain me; neither could
you have done so to-day, had I been naturally of
a more blood-thirsty disposition, for then, fifteen
months ago, I should have taken the advice of the
wretched man who lies there, and sent you unseen,
or unheard of, to the grave. But my inward
monitor forbade me, and I dared not do it. And
now, if I have really been such a pest to the world,
such a monster of mischief to society, as my
enemies
have called me, by my own forbearance you
have lived to avenge the world, and rid society of
me.
Hear now my last words; for I feel that I shall
not be able to speak much longer. Let not my
death misgive you any thing; for to you it was no
crime. Vexation for the fall of a beloved father,
prompted you to utter harsh expressions; these
expressions occasioned my death, by causing me
to draw upon you. But it is a death I rejoice in;
the death of a Hampden, on the field of glory, in
my country's cause, and by the hand of an
honourable
man. What can be a happier consummation!
But, oh! farewell. Tell O'Halloran that I died
blessing my country.
The last words were almost inaudible, and he
expired in a few minutes after uttering them. When
Edward beheld him dead, his heart smote him. It
is the first death that has ever been occasioned by
my hand, he exclaimedAnd, oh! may heaven
grant that neither duty nor accident may prevent
it from being the last!
CHAP. XXIII.
What is the worst of woes that wait on age?
What stamps the wrinkle deeper on the brow
To view each loved one blotted from life's page,
And be alone on earth as I am now.
Before the chast'ner humbly let me bow,
O'er hearts divided, and o'er hopes destroyed;
Roll on vain days, full reckless may ye flow,
Since time has 'reft what'er my soul enjoyed!
Byron
.
When
Edward returned to his father, he was
given to understand that the latter had not many
hours to live.
Oh father! cried he, catching his hand and
bathing it in tears; how soon has it pleased God
to take you from me! You have been to me a good
father. You have ever been to me an example,
a director and a friend. Ah! who can to me supply
your place?
Edward, said his father, grieve not thus. I
must now repeat what I have often inculcated on
you. Bear misfortunes with the spirit of a man,
and the resignation of a christian. Show yourself,
whether in prosperity or in adversity, worthy of the
house of Barrymore. It is useless, it is
unbecoming
,
to lament in this manner. And why should we
lament for the result of this day? It ought to be
esteemed a day of rejoicing, and not of grief. We
have crushed a mighty rebellion; and ere I die, I
have the satisfaction to know that the decisiveness
of this day's victory, has secured to my country,
and my children, the blessings of just laws, and a
well regulated government,a government equally
removed from despotism and anarchy.
Vol. II. s
These, my son, are blessings worth fighting for,
worth dying for. Edward if you inherit any of
your father's principles and feelings, you will not,
if fate requires it, regret to die for them. When
you have children I know you will not, for the
power of transmitting such a legacy as our
incomparably
happy form of government, cannot be
purchased
too dear. Ah! what would be my pangs
on this death-bed, if I perceived the enemies of that
truly free and rational government, triumphant,
and all its wise and venerable institutions in
danger
of being subverted by the demons of anarchy,
bigotry and massacre. But thank God! in the
midst of my country's madness, in the midst of her
delirious attempts at self-destruction, the weapon
has been wrested from her hand; and although, in
the blind fury of her paroxysm, she has inflicted
dreadful wounds on her welfare and prosperity,
yet, I trust, that the regenerating soundness of her
constitution will soon repair her injuries, and
restore
her once more to vigour and happiness.
Your mother, and your sister, will now look
to you as their protector. I know that you will
treat them with all the care and tenderness, with
which I have treated them. Be to them in my
stead;be to your country in my stead.
My father, cried Edward, I shall, with all
my soul, endeavour to be so. But who shall be to
me in your stead?
His father paused a few moments, and then
replied
.
My son, you have a heavenly father;
never, never forget that. But there is also one
man on earth to whom, if he will accept them, I
will resign my rights over you. I hope he will be
to you a parent, such as I have been. I wish to
see Sir Francis Hamilton.
That gentleman in company with the Lord
Lieutenant, was just approaching to enquire after
his situation. When they entered his apartment,
My lord, said he, I congratulate you and the
country, on this day's victory. I hope it will
terminate
this unnatural rebellion.
I hope so, replied the viceroy; but we have
purchased it dearly, with your loss.
My lord, I am happy to die in such a
manner
,
and in such a cause. My country will
experience
but little injury, for I shall leave her this
young man, my only son, to fill my place; and to
him, Sir Francis Hamilton, said he, looking at that
gentleman, I wish you to fill mine. I am no
stranger to his ardent attachment to your
daughter
;
and although I have never seen her, the
circumstances
of her being your child, and his choice,
are to me sufficient for wishing her to become his
wife; and if you have no objection to receive him
as your son-in-law, when I am no more, the
reflection
that he has such a prospect of happiness before
him, will contribute much to sooth my dying
moments
.
Sir Francis grasping the hand of the patient,
which was extended to him, replied,
I am sorry that my Edward, for I will now
call him mine, so soon, so suddenly loses such a
father. With all my heart and soul, I shall
endeavour
,
however imperfectly, to supply the loss;
for if I were to search the whole civilized world, I
should not find a man, whom my heart would
prefer
to him, as a husband for my daughter.
Then, Edward, said the Colonel, give me
your hand. May you soon be happy with the
woman of your choice; and may Heaven bless you
and her with every virtue that may entitle you to
happiness!
Not many hours after this, Colonel Barrymore
closed his eyes upon all earthly scenes. His body
was carried to Dublin, and thence to Barrymount,
the family seat, and there buried with his fathers,
in the presence of a large concourse of real
mourners
.
His brother the Earl, being now much advanced
in life, for he was upwards of fifteen years older
than the Colonel, laid his death so much to heart,
they having ever lived on the most affectionate
footing
,
that from being only infirm, he became
diseased
,
and soon felt such a change for the worse
in his constitution, that he prognosticated that he
was speedily approaching to his last illness.
And I am content that it should be so, said he
to Edward's mother and sister, (who now resided
at Barrymount for the purpose of giving him their
society) for since my beloved brother has left this
world, it is become to me a world of desolation.
O! I wish, fervently wish to follow him to that
world of happiness, which he now inhabits, and
where when we once meet, we shall never part.
In the meantime Edward's heart panted to visit
the North. But he could not with propriety leave
his uncle in his present precarious situation. He,
however, in almost daily letters, poured forth the
ardour of his soul to his beloved, and received
from her regular replies, which formed his only
consolation during his present afflictions.
One day his uncle called him to his bed-side.
Edward, said he, on you will soon devolve the
duty of supporting, in the world, the name, rank,
and respectability of our family, which I am
proud to say has never yet been tarnished by a
mean or an unprincipled act. There is nothing in
the world I value so highly, as this family
reputation
.
I received it pure from my ancestors, and
neither your father nor I, have, thank God! done
any thing to sully it. To you it shall soon be
committed
as a sacred trust. You will guard,
therefore
,
with solicitude, and transmit it to your
posterity
as pure as you found it; and may heaven
grant you a virtuous offspring to know its value,
and perpetuate its purity!
There is one thing in which, if you can
indulge
me, you will afford me great gratification. I
understand that your father, on his death-bed, gave
his assent to your marriage with a lady in the
county of Antrim, to whom you are attached. I
should be glad before I die to see that lady, whose
conduct is to have such influence on the future
reputation
of the name of Barrymore; for, on the
mother of a family, the transmission of its
character
depends more than on any other individual.
You may deem such a desire as this whimsical;
and, perhaps, with respect to the lady, not
altogether
delicate. But it is surely natural that I should
be desirous to see the mother of the future
Barrymores
.
From the lady my desire may be kept
concealed; consequently no wound will be given to
her delicacy. Her father, without any
impropriety
,
may introduce her to your mother and
sister, as a friend; and I am sure he would not
object
to do so if he knew how ardently I wish it.
Edward conceived that it would be fruitless as well
as cruel to oppose this strange fancy of his uncle.
Besides he was secretly pleased with the
opportunity
it afforded of soliciting Sir Francis to bring
his daughter to this part of the country. To the
North, said he to himself, my thoughts every
day, every hour, every minute, direct themselves.
But, if Ellen were here, I should not think of the
North.
The next day he rode into the city; and stated
simply to Sir Francis, his uncle's request, together
with its motives. Sir Francis made no hesitation
in soliciting his daughter and O'Halloran to visit
the metropolis, which they did in little more than
a week afterwards. In a few days, he drove them
Vol. II. s 2
to Barrymount, on a visit to the old Earl's, with
whom he had of late became intimate.
Edward had received intelligence of the day on
which they were to arrive. How did his heart
beat with joyful impatience! He rose that
morning
earlier than usual; for he could not sleep. The
day which he had thus rendered longer than
ordinary
,
appeared to him preternaturally so. Many
an anxious look he cast at his watch. The deuce
take it, it will never be the afternoon, thought he.
He was almost tempted to move the hands of the
watch forward; but he reflected that such a
measure
would add no velocity to the wheels of Sir
Francis's coach. He then tried to read; but it
would not do. He then tried to walk, but it
was equally vain. He next had recourse to
writing
a letter to Martin, but he dated it wrong;
took another sheet of paper, wrote my dear Sir,
twice; and, in the first line, instead of the word
pleasure, wrote perplexity; and, in the second,
for the words, I learn you are still at home, he
substituted, I think she will surely soon come.
He dashed the pen across the lines, execrated his
stupidity, and gave it up as an impracticable task.
He then threw himself on a sofa; and bravely
determined
,
since he could not get rid of his
impatience
,
to bear it like a man. He lay for about
five minutes quiet enough; and then looked around.
Charlotte, said he to his sister, who was
present
,
Charlotte, my dear, what o'clock is it?
Why, Edward, you have asked me that
question
,
I believe, ten times since breakfast.
Is it two, my dear?
No, I believe it is scarcely one. But consult
your watch.
I have consulted it twenty times to-day; but I
cannot think it right. It goes very slow. Well, well,
if it were two, and it wants but an hour and twenty
minutes of it, it would then be only three hours till
five.But, Charlotte, wont you take a ride? I shall
order the chaise.
I shall go with you in an hour, Edward.
In short they took their ride, met Sir Francis's
coach, returned in company with it to the Earl's;
and Edward's time for about ten days, the duration
of Ellen's visit, flew with the rapidity of a delicious
dream.
It is needless to say that the Earl was well
pleased
,
when he beheld the lovely mother of the
future
Barrymores
.
Upon my honour, said he to Edward, the
evening after Ellen had left them, you are a
happy
young man. No wonder you spent so much
time in the North, where you discovered such a
beautious flower ripening into perfection. If
Providence
would only spare me to behold your eldest
son, I think that there might yet be attractions for
me even in this world. But no, I must hasten to
your father and my brother, to my God, his God,
and your God.
Accordingly in less than three weeks afterwards,
he resigned his spirit into the hands of him who
made it, and his earthly remains were deposited
amidst his kindred dust, along side of his brother.
CHAP. XXIV.
Enough of this. To deal in wordy compliment
Is much against the plainness of my nature;
I judge you by myself, a clear true spirit,
And as such join you to my bosom
Farewell, and be my friend.
Rowe
.
The
deceased Earl had never possessed any
children. His title, therefore, together with his
immense property, devolved on Edward, who in a
very short period, took occasion, in company with
nis mother and sister, to visit the North, and lay
them at the feet of Ellen.
My lord! said she, as he warmly pressed for
an immediate union, it would be mere affectation
in me to deny what you already know, that my
heart pleads in your favour. But I am at my
father's disposal, and must request you to wait till
his consent be obtained in form.
Then, my love, you may name the happy day,
he replied, for before I left Dublin, I obtained Sir
Francis's promise that he would follow me here,
in a few days, to be present at our nuptials.
Then, my lord, she answered, when he
comes we may permit him to name it.
When she had said this, her countenance
changed
,
she blushed deeply, and looking to the ground,
almost burst into tears.
What is the matter, my Ellen? enquired the
young Earl, who was himself considerably agitated.
Oh! said she, the word has passed my lips.
I have committed my liberty into your hands. I
cannot now recall it. The change is awful!
Surely, sweetest Ellen, you do not wish to
recall
it.
No, my lord, otherwise I should not have
said it. I have said it deliberately, willingly, and
without scruple. But it brings to my mind the
recollection
of the freedom I have hitherto enjoyed,
in parting with which I cannot help shedding a few
natural tears. Besides, I cannot without concern,
contemplate the high responsibility of the station
I am about to fill. Should I fail in any part of my
duty
My Ellen! he interrupted her, my treasure,
be comforted. It is impossible that one of your
goodness of heart and understanding, can fail in
any duty. As to the station, you will adorn it.
You will be an example to our peeresses of all that
is virtuous, lovely, dignified, and wise. In the eyes
of your Edward, station cannot exalt you. He
found you among these rocks, on this romantic
shore, a jewel of perfection, valuable beyond all
price, and such a one as in his estimation, no
change of scene or circumstance, neither
humiliation
nor exaltation, can alter. He will soon move
you to a more busy and brilliant sphere, where,
while every eye admires your lustre, and every
heart acknowledges your value, you will still be to
him, as you have been here, the pride, the delight
of his soul, the dearest part of himself.
But it would be tedious to detail the whole of his
love conversation, which lasted nearly three hours,
as every one in the Castle, who knew they were
together, felt unwilling to disturb them; and Mrs.
Brown had the good nature to postpone making
tea for a whole hour after the usual time, rather
than interrupt their agreeable
tete-a-tete
. Tea was,
however, at length, got ready; and when the lovers
were summoned to attend, they could scarcely be
convinced that the old lady had not prepared it
much earlier than usual. On their entering the
parlour, Edward's sister maliciously consulted her
watch.
It is past seven o'clock, said she.
Past seven o'clock! cried his lordship. Why,
Charlotte, your watch must be wrong. I cannot
suppose it to be more than five.
That is owing to your having been in pleasant
company, said she. Time does not now lag with
your lordship, as it did at Barrymount one day,
when you insisted that it was two o'clock when it
was hardly past twelve; and in sheer pity, I had to
drive away in a chaise with you, to try to make it
move faster.
Ah! Charlotte, you may now laugh;but, I
hope, I shall yet have my revenge, by observing
your little heart beating impatiently for the arrival
of an esteemed friend.
And a
dearly beloved
one too, added she, with
emphasis.
Yes, my sister, said he, and may he who
can excite similar emotions in your heart, be as
worthy of love, as the object who occasioned that
day's impatience in mine!
Amen, she replied.
The tea-table was scarcely removed, when Miss
Barrymore, looking from a window, exclaimed,
Why, my lord, I declare, yonder is the old
beggar
woman you left an invalid on our hands, when
you set off so hastily from Dublin in June last.
His lordship looked out, and beheld Peg Dornan
advancing briskly up the avenue.
She had become perfectly convalescent, and
had returned from Dublin during the time that
Edward
was employed in Cornwallis's army; and was
now a fund of great entertainment to the whole
neighbourhood, for several miles round, by her
inexhaustible
descriptions of the great city, and the
great folks in it.
She was soon heard addressing one of the
servants
.
I'm tauld he's come, said she, an' I'll wait
here till I see him, for I hae na cast an ee on him
syne the day he left me in sic a hurry, in his
father's
hoose, a perfect cripple, wi' my twa shanks
as thick as butter-firkins, an' my feet blistered like
broiled herrin's. An' the bit lassie, his sisterGude
bless her bonnie face. She gied me baith wine an'
plenty o' sweetmeats every day, whilk was a great
comfort to a puir body in a muckle wild toon sae
far frae hame.
Old Peg has a good heart, said Edward. I
must go to speak with her.
O'Halloran went with him.
Fare fa' you! quoth she, making a low
courtesy
as soon as she saw them. I may be owre
bauld; but I wished to see his honour, wha, they
tell me, is noo a young lord, yince mair.
Well, Peg, how have you been, since we
parted
?
asked his lordship.
Weel enough for a poor body like me; but I'm
still better noo since I see you whare you oucht to
be; an' since I hear you're sune gaun to get wha'
I aye thoucht you should get.
Peg! replied Edward, you have rendered
us many and great services. I shall have a little
cottage built for you, in which you can spend your
old days in comfort.
I thank you, kindly, she said, but you need
na be at the pains. His honour there, my auld
master an' frien', has already gi'en me a snug yin;
an' he lets me besides hae a hantel o' siller every
week; indeed mair than I ken weel what to do wi',
for I can neither wear it, nor eat it; an' ye ken it
wad na be richt to drink it. But, gin it wad na be
makin' owre free, I would like to see the bonny
bairn your sister, wha was sae kind to me when I
was a bedrill in Dublin.
At that instant Miss Barrymore made her
appearance
.
My bonnie lady, said Peg, courtesying to her,
I was unco troublesome to you up the country,
an' I just wanted to thank you, noo when I'm won
back to my ain country.
I'm glad to see you so stout, Peg! said the
young lady.
If it would na affront you, returned Peg,
abruptly, to tak' a gift frae an auld beggar wife,
I would fain gie you a pretty thing I fan' among
the stanes near the Point Rock, yestreen, as I was
saunterin' alang gathering limpits.
While saying this, she unfolded a piece of old
rag, and presented to view a handsome gold broach,
set with diamonds, of great value. Edward
instantly
recognised it as one that he had lost when
struggling with the waves on the evening which had
so nearly proved fatal to him. His sister also
knew it to be his.
Why, Peg, you have been fortunate
yesterday
,
said his lordship. That broach was once
mine. It was valued at two hundred guineas, and
you are entitled to that sum. How will you
dispose
of it?
Dispose of it! In trowth, I'll no dispose of it
at all, she replied; for I'll no hae't at all. Gin
the breest-pin be yours, you maun get it. But I
thoucht to pay the debt I owed to this bonnie
lassie, wi' it.
She shall have it since you desire it, said his
lordship, but you must also derive some benefit
from your good fortune in finding it. Mention any
thing I can do for you.
Weel, since I think o't, maybe you'll no'
object
to tak' Jock Dornan, my poor gomerill sin
but he's a sturdy chielinto your service; an'
try to mak' a man o' him, whilk is mair than ever
his mither could.
It shall be so, said his lordship; and he
shall be amply provided for. And now, Charlotte,
you may take the broach, as a present, from Peg.
I shall, she said, but Peg must receive from
me in return, a new bonnet and a new cloak every
year.
Whate'er you like! replied Peg. I'll refuse
naething o' that sort. But I'll awa an' sen' Jock
Dornan to you in the mornin'. Guid een, an' the
blessing o' an auld woman be wi' you a'.
When she was gone, O'Halloran informed his
lordship that after her return from Dublin, in
consequence
of her active instrumentality in saving
his life, he felt himself bound to provide for her
future comfort; and had bestowed her a cottage,
and settled on her a weekly allowance during her
life, which, considering her careless and
wandering
disposition, he observed was a more effectual
way of rewarding her, than by the actual donation
of a more considerable sum of money, or a larger
piece of property.
Edward being desirous to see M`Nelvin,
O'Halloran
and he walked to Jemmy Hunter's with the
expectation of finding him there. It was a fine
moonlight evening, about the middle of October.
The grain harvest was all gathered in; and the
country people had been busied during the day in
raising and securing the potatoes, and as our
friends went along, they passed many
car-loads
of
this wholesome and agreeable root, so precious to
the Irish, on their way to the farm-houses. The
peasantry were cheerful and civil, and seemed to
have completely recovered their spirits after the
late disastrous events.
Vol. II. T
On arriving at Jemmy Hunter's, all was quiet
around the dwelling house, for it was now dark,
and candles were lighted within. After the
capture
of the French, Jemmy, whose habits of life
were not formed for dependence on the great, and
whose domestic attachments were too strong to
permit his long continuance from his family,
relinquished
his situation under Sir Francis
Hamilton
,
and returned home.
On Barrymore and O'Halloran approaching close
to the house, the cheering sounds of rustic mirth
and happiness saluted their ears. Come here,
said O'Halloran, who had advanced to the
unscreened
window of the apartment in which the
contented group were sitting round a large blazing
turf fire, Come here, my lord, and behold a true
specimen of the winter-night enjoyments of our
Northern peasantry.
Barrymore looked, and his heart swelled with joy
to behold a number of as healthy, honest and
happy
human countenances, as any family group in
Christendom could exhibit. Between the window
and the fire-place, sat four women, busily
employed
at the spinning wheel, the chief engine of the
Northern Irish industry and prosperity. These
were Jemmy Hunter's mother, his two sisters,
and his wife. On the other side of the hearth,
in a large arm chair, sat William Caldwell, who,
from the staff in his hand, and the great coat
that hung loosely on his shoulders, appeared to
have just come on an evening visit to his
son-in-law
.
M`Nelvin, Jemmy Hunter, and a decent
looking young man whom Barrymore did not know,
but who, it will be no harm to suppose, was a
suitor to one of the Miss Hunters, sat in front of
the hearth; while on a long bench between the
hearth and a stone wall, which ran across the
apartment, sat two ruddy faced youths, younger
brothers to Jemmy, one of whom had the
house-dog
,
which was of the large black species, called
in that part of the country, the Collie, between
his knees.
To some remark of M`Nelvin, which Edward did
not hear, old Caldwell replied, I'm very happy
at the turn things hae ta'en; an' I'm sure a' the
country will be rejoiced at it, for he's a guid
youth.
Father, said Jemmy, Peggy can sing you
yin o' the best sangs ye hae heard this lang time;
an' its a new yin. She gat it frae M`Nelvin here. I
listened to her singing it last nicht, till I amaist
grat, it touched me sae much. Come, Peggy, let
your father hear it; it will do his heart guid.
After some little hesitation, Peggy complied, and
sang as follows:
A BALLAD.
Oh! thousands shall mourn, and thousands shall fall,
And ruin shall light upon castle and hall;
And our chieftain shall forfeit his bonnie estate,
And be sentenced to die at his own castle gate;
And the Flower of the North, her sire shall wail,
And the Pride of the South shall hear the tale,
And, with speed, shall hasten our chief to free,
For the sake of the Flower of the North country.
I fear not death, our brave chieftain said,
But my daughter is fair, and I fear for the maid:
To be friendless and lovely, are evils in store,
To work her misfortune, when I am no more.
Then burst from her bosom the heart-breaking sighs,
And the tears fall fast from her lovely black eyes;
As she said to her father, O grieve not for me,
For, to peace, in the grave, I shall soon follow thee!
The guards move slow, for their errand is death,
While the foes of our chieftain are foaming with wrath;
But the noble youth follows on mercy's swift wings,
And life and estate to our chieftain he brings.
Now the land rejoices, our bosoms beat high,
And maids and their lovers sing songs of joy;
For the Pride of the South soon married shall be,
To Ellen, the Flower of the North country.
Why, M`Nelvin! said Jemmy, clapping the
poet on the knee, when the song was ended, you
deserve a fairin' for making it. I wonder man hoo
you can gar the words clink sae?
But before the poet could reply, a rapping at
the door drew the attention of the party.
Come in, frien's! cried Jemmy, rising at the
same time, to open the door. The next moment
Edward and O'Halloran advanced, and saluted the
company. They all rose. The women made
courtesies
,
and the men bows.
Ah! how are you, M`Nelvin! cried Edward,
ardently shaking the poet by the hand. Your
friend, Sir Francis, sent his kind respects to you.
I expect him to follow me here in a few days.
My lord, I am really rejoiced to see you,
replied
the bard. I need not say that the present
prospects of both you and that best of my friends,
afford me much happiness.
Edward now turned to salute William Caldwell
and the rest of the company. Mr. Caldwell,
said he, it gives me true pleasure to witness your
good fortune, in being surrounded by such an
amiable and happy group of relatives.
We maun thank your lordship for some o' our
happiness, replied the old man. What you
did for his honour there, will no' sune be forgotten
amang us.
By this time Peggy had her neat little parlour
lighted; and, with all the winning sweetness of
rural modesty, invited her guests to step ben to it,
as she said, it was a decenter place for the like
o' them than the kitchen, the apartment in which
they had met.
A pitcher of warm whiskey punch soon diffused
its inspiring fumes through the room.
How did you like the city, Jemmy? asked
Lord Barrymore. You seemed very anxious to
leave it.
I liked it weel enough; an' had it no' been for
twa folk, an' there is yin o' them, said he,
pointing
to his blushing Peggy, an' the ither is in the
craddle yonder, I wadna hae left Sir Francis sae
sune.Peggy, bring here the wean, till his lordship
sees it. It's a bonnie bit thing, an' I hae ca'd it for
you, my lord.
His spouse, now, with an almost trembling
fondness
,
produced the young Hunter to view.
Eddy, Eddy! cried its father, catching its
little hand, look up, my boy, an' see your
namesake
.
His lordship took the child in his arms. It is
a fine boy, Jemmy, said he; its features are
extremely like your own. I do not wonder that
you were impatient to return to objects so
attractive
as such a wife and such a son. I thought, my
friend, to add to your happiness for the many great
services you have rendered me, but I find it
impossible
;
for these treasures make you happier than
man can make you. Yet you will permit me to
make my little namesake a present, in token of my
esteem for his parents, and my affection for
himself
.
He then returned the child to its mother, and
requested
some writing materials, with which being
supplied, he drew forth a valuable gold watch, and
cutting a piece of paper into a circular form, so as
to fit the inside of the watch, he wrote on it as
follows:
Oct. 17, 1798. The gift of Edward, earl of
Barrymore
,
to Edward Hunter. The earl hereby binds
himself and his heirs forever, to pay annually fifty
pounds sterling to the said Edward Hunter and his
heirs.
He enclosed the paper within the watch, and
Vol. II. T 2
handing it to Peggy, Receive this in trust for your
child, said he; it is but a small recompense for
the numerous and important services his father has
rendered to me, and those dear to me.
When Jemmy understood the nature of the gift,
Na, na, said he, we'll no' hae't: it is owre
muckle, my lord. It was na for ony such thing
that I helped you in your pinches. It was for mere
frien'ship; an' I would hae done the same for ony
frien' in the country.
This disinterestedness, observed his lordship,
makes you still the more entitled to recompense.
But if you will not receive this gift, as a reward,
you will gratify me by receiving it as a token of
friendship, for I am proud of being capable of
exciting
such friendship as you have shown for me.
Besides, Jemmy, it is scarcely in your power to
refuse
it, for it is not to you, but to your son, my young
namesake here, that I give it.
Weel, weel, gin it maun be sae, let it be sae,
replied Jemmy. But I think the young rascal
has got owre mony presents already; for Miss
O'Halloran has gien him hale trunkfu's o' cleas an'
ither things, mair, I believe, than we ken weel hoo
to use. An' I'll no' hide it, though it is a secret she
does na hersel' ken; it was mair to please her than
to compliment ony body else, that we ca'd him
Edward.
Candidly confessed! cried lord Barrymore,
much pleased with Jemmy's simplicity; but, at
the same time, more delighted with the idea that
Ellen had displayed such attention to a child that
was named after himself.
I canna weel tell what to think o' ye,
gentlemen
,
remarked Jemmy. Ye seem to care
naething
o' the warld's gear. His honour, there, Mr.
O'Halloran, has gien me the farm rent free forever;
an' would insist on me that it was paying a debt he
owed me, whereas I only did for either o' you, what
yae neighbour should be aye ready to do for anither.
But let us hae anither glass. Wi' your leave, I'll
drink lang life to you, Mr. O'Halloran; an' lang
life to your lordship, an' may ye sune be married
to her ye like best!
Having thanked Jemmy for his good wishes, and
emptied their glasses to a toast expressive of theirs
for him and his interesting family, O'Halloran and
lord Barrymore arose, and, accompanied by M`
Nelvin
and Jemmy, proceeded towards the castle.
On their way, the poet and his lordship having
fallen somewhat behind their companions, Mr.
M`Nelvin, said the latter, the obligations I lie
under to you, for your ardent and effective services
in the behalf of me, and those I love, demand my
sincere acknowledgments, and embolden me to
make a request, your compliance with which will
afford me much satisfaction, as it will give me an
opportunity of making some return for the
numerous
favours you have conferred on me.
Any service I have rendered your lordship,
replied M`Nelvin, brought with it its own reward,
in the gratification I experienced in the
performance
;
and if there be any I can yet render you, let
me know it, and, with the same zeal and pleasure,
it shall be done.
In the county of Cavan, said his lordship, I
have an estate, the manager of which died a few
months ago. I should like you to fill his place, for
I want it filled with a man in whose honesty to
myself, and attention to the comforts and
happiness
of my tenantry, I can confide. The
compensation
of the late agent was 500 per annum; yours
shall be 300.
I see, my lord, your motive for this generous
offer, returned M`Nelvin. You wish to make me
independent as to worldly matters; and your
friendship
and delicacy have suggested this method. I
thank you, sincerely do I thank you. But, my lord,
my affections are rooted to this part of the country.
The neighbourhood for about ten miles round us,
is all the world to me. It is all I ever enjoyed or
ever wish to enjoy. In an adjoining valley I had
my birth; amidst these hills I was educated; every
thing that has interested me from the days of
childhood
to this very hour, has appeared within these
limits; and, if I were to remove from them, I should
remove from that portion of the world, which could
alone yield me enjoyment by interesting my
affections
.
On your estate, I should feel as if I were
exiled from my native land; and although it would
yield me pleasure to afford you any assistance in
my power in managing your affairs, yet, as I know
that your lordship can sustain no injury by my
present refusal, there being numerous individuals
who would be thankful for such an employment,
better qualified both from experience and
disposition
to fulfil its duties than I am, I decline your
friendly offer, with the less reluctance. My lord,
while I refuse your kindness in this instance, I
trust that you are too fully aware of the nature of
my motives for so doing, to take them amiss.
Indeed
,
I assure your lordship, that the governorship
of the richest of his majesty's colonies, would not
tempt me to forego the pleasure of every day
beholding
my native hills and vallies; the pleasure of
wandering, in my hours of meditation, along those
streamlets, or concealing myself amidst those well
known groves and glens; or of enjoying in my hours
of sociability, the cheerful hospitality, and kindly,
though rustic conversation, of those beloved friends
and neighbours, to whom I have been long
accustomed
and endeared.
Is there no other way, my romantic friend,
inquired
his lordship, by which I can manifest my
gratitude for what you have done for me?
There is no other way, replied the poet,
than by continuing to favour me with your good
opinion. As to pecuniary matters, they are of little
or no consideration with me. I need but little, and
that little I can easily earn. To possess more,
might only produce cares and perplexities with
which I wish not to be encumbered. My days may
be few or many, as Providence shall please to
order
,
but they shall be spent in the indulgence of
affections which wealth cannot excite, and in the
enjoyment of those luxuries of mind it cannot
purchase.
Happy M`Nelvin, exclaimed his lordship,
since you have thus the making of your own
happiness
,
independent of the frowns or the smiles of
a fickle world! I shall not urge you further on this
subject. But assure yourself of my lasting
friendship
and gratitude; and of my sincere wish that you
may long live to enjoy the intellectual blessings of
which you are enamoured, amidst the interesting
scenery of your native vales, and in possession of
the esteem and admiration of their honest
inhabitants
.
Having now arrived at the avenue to the Castle,
they separated, and the poet returned with
Hunter
to the rural dwelling of the latter, which had of
late become his favourite place of residence.
CHAP. XXV.
The most delightful lot beneath the sun,
Is when two faithful hearts that fondly love,
By sacred rites are made for ever one,
While bounteous fortune smiles, and friends approve.
Their's are the exalted joys of saints above,
Each word, each look, imparting mutual bliss:
On rapturous wings their golden moments move;
Nor can they wish a happier world than this,
For holy wedded love, turns earth to Paradise.
Irish Soothsayer
.
As this history is drawing to a close, it may not
be amiss to take notice of the great lesson for the
inclucation of which, it has been written; namely,
that intimidation and vengeance are, and ever will
be, unsuccessful in preserving the peace of a
country
;
whereas conciliation and kindness will
scarcely
ever fail.
The blood of martyrs has been truly said to be
like seed to the cause for which they suffer; and
perhaps, in no portion of the history of nations, has
this truth been more clearly illustrated, than in that
we have just recited. The unnecessary, unjust,
impolitic, and cruel execution of William Orr,
almost
instantaneously resulted in thousands of
William Orrs, or rather of characters such as he
was accused of being, starting into existence, and
vowing revenge upon his persecutors.
While Camden governed in Ireland, the system
which occasioned that irritating execution, was
continued
until it involved the country into all the
horrors of which we have in the preceding pages,
given a faint sketch. How long these horrors would
have continued, had he continued to govern, is
happily now only matter of conjecture.
The realization of the evils, which the most
enlightened
statesmen of both England and Ireland,
predicted would be the consequence of his
coercive
measures, brought at length conviction of
their impropriety home to the minds of the
British
ministers; and he was suddenly, and
fortunately
superseded in his office, by a man of a more
enlightened
understanding and a more humane
temper
.
The almost immediate consequence of this
happy change we have seen. In the course of a
few months, rebellion was converted into
submission
,
and disaffection into loyalty. With the
restoration
of the ordinary laws, confidence in the
government, tranquillity, industry, and national
prosperity were also restored.
It is true that the flames of the civil war had been
too extensive for its dying embers to be all at once
extinguished; and amidst a numerous population,
it could not be expected, but that some would
fanatically
continue to urge the prosecution of
desperate
measures, even after their abandonment by
the general mass Besides the government,
comparatively
mild and merciful, as it was still, displayed,
in some instances, a harshness towards several
proscribed individuals, which kept alive, for a
considerable
time, a soreness in the minds of many,
who would otherwise have returned at once to their
former habits and feelings of loyalty.
But as these unfortunate individuals, against
whom the national authority continued to direct
its vengeance with unabated rigour, were all, in the
course of some months, either taken and executed,
or died in their coverts from the hardships they
endured
,
or else found means to fly from the country,
this source of irritation and danger, became also,
before the expiration of the year, removed.
Indeed
,
about that period, so evidently had the
majority
of the people of the North became loyal,
that it seemed, by their conduct and expressions,
as if a species of re-action had taken place in their
feelings; and the government appeared so much
convinced that these professions were sincere, that
it scrupled not to entrust arms into the hands of
thousands who had been active in the rebellion.
A species of military force, denominated
Yeomanry
,
the members of which could not be taken
out of their own county, were not liable to military
law, and had the privilege of withdrawing
whenever
they pleased, from the service, had been
projected
sometime previous to the insurrection; but,
on account of the general disaffection, had been
joined but by few. Its ranks, however, were now
swelled by multitudes, eager to evince their
reawakened
fidelity to the government, which was
therefore soon enabled to withdraw the regular
troops from the country, and despatch them against
the foreign enemy.
It is true that, previous to the arrival of
Cornwallis
,
and the adoption of healing measures,
although
the insurrection had been nearly suppressed,
the minds of the people were still much agitated;
and there existed in the country such causes of
irritation
,
as would, in all probability, have
occasioned
it to become once more a scene of bloodshed
and terror; and, on the first favourable
opportunity
,
there is scarcely a doubt that another
rising
would have taken place, if a period had not been
put to Camden's coercive system of government.
They know very little of the temper and feelings
of men, especially of Irishmen, who suppose that
the mere danger of losing life will compel them to
look quietly on, while their friends are suffering,
and they themselves are in the daily danger of
suffering
,
all the evils of a needless and relentless
persecution
.
The persecutors may, it is true, by an
overwhelming military power, enforce an occasional
and temporary submission; but human fears
commonly
yield to resentment and exasperation; and,
although disunion, or want of warlike means, may
deprive the persecuted of all hopes of success, their
very despair, which will be thus excited, may
become
dreadful, perhaps fatal, to their adversaries.
But to proceed with our story. On the day
following
the occurrences related in the last chapter,
Ellen's favourite and faithful friend, Miss Agnew,
arrived at the castle. Ellen had sent for this young
lady shortly after consenting that her father should
name the wedding-day, in order that she, who had
shared so sensibly in her afflictions, should now
have an opportunity of sharing in her joys. Into
her bosom she poured all her feelings, her hopes,
her joys, her wishes, her anxieties, the intensity of
her love and admiration for the generous youth
who had done so much for her, who already
possessed
her heart, and into whose keeping she, with
so much fondness and delight, was so soon to
commit
her destiny. Then, with a species of transient
fear, she would revert to the awful change that was
about to take place in her situation, and the high
responsibility as a wife, as a peeress, and, perhaps,
as a mother, she was about to incur. Then
reflecting
on her removal from the scenes, and the
friends of her youth, she would say:
And when I am married, I must also reside at
a distance from these haunts, so endeared to me by
a thousand recollections; and from my youthful
friends; and from thee too, Maria, the earliest and
best beloved of them all, I must separate. But,
she would add, without my Edward, the
enjoyment
of friends, country, and every thing else I
have hitherto prized, could not make me happy.
Ah! I feel that the possession of such a husband is
Vol. II. u
worth every sacrifice. Oh, Maria! rejoice with
your friend, for I am indeed happy! Heaven, in
giving me him, gives me the highest boon earth can
afford.
Miss Agnew would often rally her on these bursts
of love and joy, but with such visible satisfaction in
her looks, as showed that in her heart she rejoiced
in her friend's happiness, and consequently
contributed
to increase it. It is not to be supposed that
in these confidential conversations, the gallant, gay
Charles Martin was altogether forgotten. Miss
Agnew delighted to talk of him.
I confess I love him, she would say. He is
so sweet in his looks, so tender in his manner, that,
during the day, I can scarcely ever withdraw my
thoughts from him; and, during the night, I can do
nothing but dream of him. But I hope I shall yet
get the better of such folly. He wrote to my
father lately, requesting permission to visit me, and
the old man was silly enough to ask my opinion on
the subject. I told him to act as he thought
proper
,
for I would not have him, on my account, to
forbid the coming of any respectable person to
our house.
We expect him here every day, said Ellen.
Lord Barrymore has written him an invitation to
attend our marriage. I wish we could have a double
wedding. What say you, Maria?
Hush! cried Maria. One uproar of the kind
is enough at one time.
Thus passed several days, which, to our heroine,
flew on the wings of love and friendship, when her
father arrived, accompanied with Sir Philip Martin
and his son Charles. It would be wrong to stop at
present to describe the joyful welcome they
received
at the Castle, for the reader must be impatient
to come to the grand conclusion of the whole affair,
the making our hero and heroine husband and wife.
The important day arrived sometime in the
middle
of November. The wedding garments were
prepared, the wedding guests were invited, and the
wedding feast was provided.But hold! we must
have no formal descriptions of such trifles.They
are unfashionable, and in these days, any thing
unfashionable
,
is as intolerable in a novel as in a
drawing
room.
But it ought to be known that, on this occasion,
O'Halloran regulated the proceedings according to
his own fancy, which was somewhat old fashioned.
He accordingly managed it so that the whole scene
was almost a repetition of what took place when he
himself was married to Ellen's grandmother.
The party consisted of about twenty four
persons
,
comprising a tolerably well proportioned
assortment
of males and females. Among the former,
as a most essential personage on the occasion, was
the Rev. Mr. Nichols, who was O'Halloran's
spiritual
teacher, and with whose character the reader
has already had some acquaintance.
At about five in the afternoon the company sat
down to a very comfortable dinner, after
partaking
of which, at the usual time, the ladies withdrew,
and the gentlemen remained behind, perhaps so
long that each had a reasonable time to drink two
glasses of port, and one goblet of Jamaica rum
punch. Some them betook themselves to
backgammon
,
some to the library, and some to the ladies
for amusement.
Why, this was only an ordinary dinner! What
appearance of a wedding is there in all this?
Have patience, dear reader, we are not yet come
to the wedding. But I trust we soon shall, although
O'Halloran must have his own old jog-trot way.
Great people do things of this kind far more
dashingly
now-a-daysthat is, when their fathers and
mothers, or guardians happen to give their consent.
They roll to church and back again, with a long
splendid train of carriages behind them, driving
with as much velocity as if they had lost their
senses, or were running for a wager, causing the
streets and highways to tremble, and the gaping
multitude to stare with astonishment, as they pass
along. But O'Halloran was none of those dashing
people; and as to Lord Barrymore, provided the
knot was made firm and legal, he cared not how
small a degree of pomp and pageantry
attended
the tying of it. He wanted his Ellen to be
his wife, and if the forms that made her so, were
agreeable to both divine and human laws, the mere
embellishing accompaniments were to him matters of
indifference. But let us haste to the wedding.
At about seven o'clock the whole party
assembled
to tea in the usual sitting room. The task of
presiding at this repast was assigned to Miss Agnew,
as Ellen's thoughts were supposed to be too much
occupied with more important concerns, to
undertake
it. She sat at Miss Agnew's right hand. Her
lover sat beside her; and attended to all her wants
with punctilious delicacy and solicitude. Ah! is
there a youth in Christendom, who would not have
envied his situation?
After the tea table was removed, and the
company
promiscuously seated around the room, while
all, except the lovers who engrossed in mutual
fondness sat beside each other on a sofa, were
engaged
in a lively desultory conversation,
O'Halloran
whispered something to Sir Francis, who
immediately
rising, advanced to his daughter. The
clergymen perceiving what was intended, rose also,
and standing behind a large arm chair on which he
had been sitting, pronounced the words, let us
proceed.At once, the whole company stood up.
Sir Francis then led his blushing daughter,
accompanied
by her lover, forward, saying, I here
bestow
you, my Ellen, to a man, whom I think, in
every respect, worthy of such a gift. Receive her,
my lord, and may God bless you both!
With a graceful bow, and an exulting heart, the
young lord received possession of the long-loved
maid thus presented to him; and the two stood
before
the clergyman. That holy man then
proceeded
with the ceremony according to the form
observed by the reverend ministers of the Synod
of Ulster, being nearly the same as that prescribed
by the church of Scotland. After some appropriate
observations on the nature and design of the
institution
of marriage, and the duties and
obligations
which it imposes on the parties who engage
in it, he administered to our lovers those solemn
vows, whose miraculous power can form two into
one; and having declared them to be husband and
wife, he addressed heaven in a short prayer suited
to the occasion, and concluded by desiring Lord
Barrymore to embrace his wife.
My wife! O blessed sound! thought the young
bridegroom, as, with an enraptured heart, he
imprinted
the ardent embrace on her glowing lips.
After spending a reasonable time in courtship,
Charles Martin followed the example of his friend
Barrymore, and, in due form, exchanged
matrimonial
vows with the sprightly and laughter-loving
Miss Agnew.
It is unnecessary to pursue the history of these
personages further. It may be mentioned,
however
,
that
the Insurgent Chief
, lived to see several
of his great grand-children; and then calmly
withdrew
to his fathers, leaving behind him a memory
which will be long honoured by the warm-hearted
people of the romantic country, for whose
independence
he had, in vain, contended so bravely,
and suffered so much.
THE END.Belfast
,
June 4th
, 1798.
The signal is given. The mail coach has
not
arrived. Our informant says it was stopped
yesterday
at Swords. The south is in armsWexford is
taken. Let the
rising
be on the 7th
inst
. The
general
rendezvous for this county is Donegore hill.
The small parties of the military quartered in the
country towns must be captured, if possible, by
surprise. The bearer will proceed with intelligence
along the coast. You will despatch messengers
through the interior, by Ballynure, Ballyclare,
Ballyeaston, Ballymena, &c. Expedition is
requisite
.
HENRY M`CRACKEN.
To Henry O'Halloran, Esq. &c.I am now a prisoner in the hands of the
insurgents
;
and you may be sure I am well treated,
when I inform you that I have had influence
enough to persuade them to postpone an attack,
which, just as I was brought here, they were on
the point of making upon you.
I know your gallantry would induce you to
make a brave and persevering resistance; but their
numbers, (they are now about sixteen hundred
strong) and their enthusiasm, make them
formidable
,
and would ensure them ultimate success,
although
,
doubtless, at the expense of many lives.
However, I will not assume the responsibility of
advising you to an absolute surrender. Your duty
forbids such an alternative, until resistance is
proved
beyond doubt, to be useless. But I entreat you
to open a door for negociation. Something short
of unconditional submission may probably be
obtained
.
The cause of humanity will be consulted,
and, perhaps, his majesty's interests also, by means
of a treaty the terms of which it may be in your
power honourably to accept.
I have just witnessed an instance of magnanimity
which speaks much for the humane dispositions of
those people; and renders them entitled to more
indulgence, than, as rebels, they would otherwise
deserve.
I have the honour to be, &c.
GEORGE M`CLAVERTY.
To Captain James Small,
company of Tay Fencibles.To Captain Small.
Sir, we are to the number of sixteen hundred
men in arms, prepared to attack the garrison
under
your command. But to give you an
opportunity
of saving your soldiers from destruction, we
have thought proper, first, to apprize you of our
intention
,
and to summon you in the name of our
country, to surrender your party, both military
and others, with all your warlike stores, into our
hands. As our prisoners your lives will be safe,
and as much attention as possible paid to your
comforts. The lives, families and properties of
such of our town's-men as have joined you, shall
also remain unmolested. Our attack shall be
suspended
,
in expectation of your compliance, for three
quarters of an hour, but no longer.
We have the honour to be,
Your obedient humble servants.
HENRY O'HALLORAN,
JOHN M`CAULEY,
WILLIAM JOHNSTON,To George M`Claverty, Esq.
Sir, enclosed is my reply to the rebel
chieftains
.
By it you will see that you anticipated truly,
when you supposed that I would not agree to an
unconditional surrender. I am sorry that you are
in their power; but it is pleasing to find that they
are not disposed to abuse their good fortune, by
acts of wantonness or cruelty. It may yet be in
my power to show that I can esteem humanity,
even in such an enemy.
I have the honour to be, &c.
JAMES SMALL, Capt. &c.Gentlemen,
In answer to your message, I have to inform
you that rather than comply with your demands,
my party and myself are resolved to meet
destruction
amidst the ruins of the place, which it is our
duty to defend. Do not, however, suppose that we
shall fall an easy prey. It is true, your number
exceed ours by ten to one; but were they a
hundred
to one, as we are fully supplied with the
means of defence, we know too well how to use
them, not to make our enemies deplore the
dearness
of any victory they may gain over us. In
your case, it is apparent that victory is at least
doubtful. Some traits of humanity displayed by
you have been communicated to me, in
consideration
of which I give you my promise, and all the
gentlemen of the town, who have so gallantly come
to my assistance, will guarantee its performance,
that if you lay down your arms, and return
peaceably
to your allegiance, all that you have yet done
shall be overlooked, and pardoned, and the full
and free protection of the laws of your country
shall once more be extended towards you. Should
you reject this offer, I can only deplore your
infatuation
;
I must resist you unto destruction, and
the blood of those who may fall on both sides, be
upon your heads.
JAMES SMALL, Capt. &c.June 7th
, 1798.
Dear SirIt has fallen to my lot to
communicate
to you the unfortunate news of the forces we
assembled this morning, being completely defeated
and dispersed, after a severe conflict with a large
body of the king's troops, near Ballynahinch, in
which it is supposed, that we lost upwards of one
thousand men.
According to previous arrangement we began
about midnight to assemble in the neighbourhood
of Saintfield, where we had a slight skirmish with
a small body of militia stationed there, over whom
we obtained the advantage, having, with only the
loss of one man, killed six of theirs, and compelled
the rest to retreat.
We then proceeded to Ballynahinch, and
encamped
on lord Moira's demesne adjoining the
town. Here our numbers increased so rapidly,
that before noon, we were nearly twelve thousand
strong. Colonel Munroe joined us about ten o'clock
with a large body from the neighbourhood of
Lisburn
and Hilsborough. About one o'clock the
king's troops arrived from the camp at
Blarrismoor
,
and halted on a hill opposite, part of the
town being between us.
They soon commenced a cannonade, which we
attempted to return, having three small field-pieces,
but we could not manage them to much
advantage
,
whereas their fire annoyed us extremely.
Being
conscious of our superiority in point of
numbers
,
it was, therefore, agreed that we should rush
over the intermediate ground, and charge them
with pikes. For this purpose, we had completed
the necessary arrangements, and were proceeding
forward, when we were attacked with a volley of
musketry from behind, by a party, which,
unnoticed
by us, they had detached round the hill, and
which thus took us in the rear by surprise. Many
of our men immediately fled; but the greater
number
rushed on to the intended attack.
When within thirty yards of our opponents,
we received a dreadful discharge of musketry,
which checked us for an instant by levelling
hundreds
of us to the ground. My left arm was
broken
on this occasion; but I was impelled along
by the press of the multitude, which had resumed
its motion forwards.
We soon reached our adversaries, and made
on them a very effective charge, for in a few
minutes
they were compelled to retreat some distance
from the hill, but there, facing about, they poured
upon us another fire so destructive that hundreds
Vol. II. E 2
fell to the ground, while hundreds more threw
down their arms and fled.
At this important crisis, the troops behind us
also repeated their fire and increased our
confusion
.
To prevent our rallying, for though much
broken, some of us would still have made a stand,
their cavalry now galloped furiously amongst us
and completed our defeat.
The cavalry in continuing the pursuit,
committed
dreadful havoc throughout the country. The
greater part of Ballynahinch, the whole of
Saintfield
,
and country houses without number, have been
consigned to flames, and are now only smoking
ruins.
The destruction is not yet over. From the hill
on which I am concealed, we can see every
moment
new volumes of conflagration arising. My
heart sickens at the disasters of the day. I trust
in God, you have been more fortunate in your
county. If not, I much fear that the cause for
which we have been so long and so anxiously
preparing
to make this struggle, is indeed lost, and that
we shall now have, each of us to await with what
fortitude we can, the fate which an oppressive, cruel
and highly incensed government, may think fit to
award us.
The unfortunate religious jealousy that exists
among the people has been one great cause of our
failure. Some accounts of the misconduct of the
Catholics in the South arrived here the day
before
yesterday, which cooled the ardour of the
Presbyterians, in whom consisted our main strength.
Not one in ten of that persuasion, in whom we
confided
,
have joined us; and although, as you well
know, the Catholic population of the county is not
one to twenty, yet more than the half of those who
took arms were of that body.
If you be yet in force, endeavour all you can,
I bessech you, to prevent the poison of the Wexford
news from infecting the minds of your men,
otherwise
all hopes of liberty for poor Ireland will
indeed
soon be over. It is to put you on your guard
in this matter, that I make such haste to dispatch
this courier, who, as he is acquainted with the
country, and has the advantage of the night to
travel in, will, I hope, reach you in safety.
Munroe and several of our leaders have been
captured. Death, no doubt, will be their portion.
Their doom is perhaps already awarded, for our
merciless pursuers will lose no time, when they
seize any of us, in glutting their vengeance.
May heaven preserve you from such
misfortunes
as we have experienced! I am, with an
aching
heart,
Your friend,
M. RY.To the Governor of the town and castle of
Carrickfergus
.
Phnix Park
,
June
14, 1798.
Sir, being informed that you have the rebel
chief, O'Halloran, in custody, I am induced, in
consequence of some representations made to me
in his favour, by a person well acquainted with
him, to pardon his offence, on condition that he
shall pay a fine to be assessed by you to any
amount, not exceeding ten thousand pounds, which
sum shall be appropriated to the relief of those
royalists who have suffered from the rebellion in
the county of Antrim.
The prisoner may be given over to the custody
of the Hon. Edward Barrymore, who is chargeable
with his safety until the fine be paid, and who will
with any other person you may approve, enter
into recognisance for his subsequent good
behaviour
.
CAMDEN.Dear BarrymoreI have at length followed
you. Excited by my ardent desire to see the
peerless
beauty, who could so completely subdue a
heart which was impregnable to all the attacks of
the Dublin fair, I eagerly embraced the first
moment
,
in which I could, with propriety, undertake
the journey. The day before I left the city, I
waited on the Lord Lieutenant, with the letter you
enclosed from the Recluse, who, I understand, is to
be no longer a mendicant, but is to appear in
society
in his own proper character of Francis
Hamilton
,
Esq. of Hamilton-hall, in the county of Tyrone.
His excellency was much pleased to hear from
him; and, without delay, not only granted to him
his request, but wrote to him a long letter, which
on finding I was about to take a Northern trip, he
entrusted to my care.
Your favourite, Peg Dornan, had a pretty smart
fever, and was unable to walk for nearly a couple
of weeks: but she was in a convalescent state
when I left Dublin, and as she was getting very
home-sick, I suppose she will, in imitation of your
humble servant, speedily honour the Northern
folks with her presence. Your father informed me
that he would send her in the stage. Both he and
your mother have been as attentive to her as you
could desire.
By means of lord Camden, your father has
become
acquainted with your intercession for the
Insurgent
Chief. He is pleased enough with your
conduct in that affair, only he thought you might
have made him your confidant. But I told him you
had not
time;
which settled the point.I will give
you no more city news till I see you. Indeed I should
not have given you so much in this way, but
having
to send you a letter, I could not properly do so
without putting something in it, and news answered
the purpose as well as any thing else. I shall only
add that I am impatient to see the old chief, with
the fame of whose exploits, the whole city rang
for some days before I left it.
Yours, &c.
CHARLES MARTIN.Dear SirIt is with great satisfaction that I
acknowledge the receipt of your's of this morning,
covering the commands of his excellency, the Lord
Lieutenant, respecting you, which, of course, it is
my duty, as well as my pleasure, to obey. I shall
make the agreeable communication known without
delay to all the justices of the peace, jailers, and
other officers, whom it concerns, so that you will
be in no danger of personal molestation; and may
appear in public whenever you think proper.
I have the honour to be, &c.My SonA few days ago, I received from you
a very foolish letter, requesting me to consent to
your marriage with a woman I never saw, nor,
until
that very moment, ever heard of. I took, of
course, some pains to inquire concerning her, and
her connexions. The only person from whom I
could obtain much information, is your old
mendicant
protagee, who praises her in a style that I
cannot well understand; but from which I can
gather that she is a great beauty. I presume,
therefore, that in the ardour of your admiration,
you have endowed her with angelic qualities, for
in the eyes of every love-sick young man who has
a handsome mistress, she cannot be aught else
than an angel.
But, sir, how does it happen that you could
suppose your father as easily blinded as yourself
on such a subject? or how could you imagine that
bright eyes and a fine complexion, could make up
in my estimation for obscurity of birth, and
rebellious
connexions;for I understand that the lady in
question, is daughter to an outlaw, and
granddaughter
to a rebel; and a rebel too of the very worst
stamp; one whose influence in the country has been
wilfully perverted from preserving its tranquillity to
promoting its destruction. How could the loyal,
the virtuous, the patriotic Edward Barrymore, he
of whose promising talents and acquirements, his
friends have been hitherto so proud, degrade
himself
,
and the family whose representative he is, by
such a connexion?
I speak nothing of the lady's want of fortune,
although I am informed that her grandfather, on
whom she totally depends, has mortgaged his
property
for more than it is worth, for the wicked
purpose
too of procuring supplies for the rebel armies.
If ever the fomenter of a country's ruin deserved
death, this jacobinical old man, according to all
accounts
,
did so. But your boyish and imprudent
attachment for a handsome face, interfered and
snatched him from justice. When I first heard of
that affair, I was silly enough to approve of your
conduct, as I ascribed it to a generous impulse of
humanity and gratitude for one who had, as it is
reported, saved your life. But I now see that a
foolish passion for a pretty girl, was at the bottom
of your apparent benevolence. What your uncle
will say on this subject, I cannot tell, for I have not
yet communicated it to him. But as he scarcely
approved of your interference in behalf of the old
rebel, I presume he will utterly disapprove of your
intention to contaminate the purity of your
family
blood, by marrying the granddaughter.But
enough on this subject.
Ah! sir, is it a time for any of the house of
Barrymore to bask indolently in the rays of
beauty
,
or in the enjoyment of female blandishments,
when the fabric of society is tottering to its very
foundations? When your country is assailed at
once by domestic traitors and foreign invaders,
ought you, in the vigour of youth and activity, to
desert her cause, and lie supinely sunk under the
fascinations of love and luxury?
I call on you, I order you, to throw off your
disgraceful chains and fly to the standard of your
king and country. The French have landed, in
what force it is not exactly known, on the
Connaught
coast. But it is certain that they will form
a rallying point for insurrection. It is said that
the peasantry have already swelled their ranks to
a countless multitude. I take the field to-morrow,
as commander of a regiment of cavalry, in which
I have preserved for you the rank of a captain.
Cornwallis has placed himself at the head of the
troops; and I trust that we shall all exhibit a zeal
and soldier-like conduct, worthy of our cause, and
of such a renowned commander.
I shall expect you to join us, wherever we
may be encamped, in a week at farthest from this
date; and, if you do your duty on this occasion,
as becomes you, your late errors will be forgiven,
by your indulgent father,
THOMAS BARRYMORE.* * * * * * * * * At what an awful crisis,
said he, have I been entrusted with the
government
of this unfortunate country? Treason,
rebellion
,
massacre, and invasion, have shaken her to
pieces, and have prostrated her into the depth of
misery.
I remember you were ever proud of being an
Irishman. Show yourself now worthy of the name,
and fly to the standard which is raised for the
preservation of whatever your country yet
possesses
of law, order, civilization, and rational
freedom
.
I want such men as you about me. Your
counsels whether as a statesman or a soldier, to
me will be valuable; and they will be the more
acceptable, as I know that they will be given with
uprightness, and with the feelings not only of a wise
man, but of an Irishman, anxious for the safety
and welfare of his country.
I hope you have, before this time, availed
yourself
of the exertion of the executive prerogative
which I made in your favour. I need not say how
happy I felt at being thus able to pay the debt of
gratitude under which you laid me on that terrible
night at Yorktown, when the furious American
colonel
,
Scammel, made his desperate attack on our
defences. On that dreadful night, his brandished
weapon hovered over my head, and would have
cut short my existence, had you not heroically
interposed
and clove him to the earth.
I could, with much gratification, dwell longer
on those trans-atlantic subjects; but with me time
is now precious; and I hasten to request you to
lose none in coming to resume your former station
in my military household, as my confidential
aid-de-camp
.
I have with true and undiminished esteem, the
honour to be, &c.
CORNWALLIS.